CHAPTER I.
Good morrow,coz.
Good morrow, sweet Hero.
Shakspeare
.
When
Mr. Effingham determined to return home,
he sent orders to his agent to prepare his town-house
in New-York for his reception, intending to pass a
month or two in it, then to repair to Washington for a
few weeks, at the close of its season, and to visit his
country residence when the spring should fairly open.
Accordingly, Eve now found herself at the head
of one of the largest establishments, in the largest
American town, within an hour after she had landed
from the ship. Fortunately for her, however, her father
was too just to consider a wife, or a daughter, a mere
upper servant, and he rightly judged that a liberal
portion
of his income should be assigned to the procuring
of that higher quality of domestic service, which can
alone relieve the mistress of a household from a burthen
so heavy to be borne. Unlike so many of those around
him, who would spend on a single pretending and
comfortless
entertainment, in which the ostentatious folly
of one contended with the ostentatious folly of another,
a sum that, properly directed, would introduce order
and system into a family for a twelvemonth, by
commanding
the time and knowledge of those whose study
they had been, and who would be willing to devote
themselves to such objects, and then permit their wives
and daughters to return to the drudgery to which the
sex seems doomed in this country, he first bethought
him of the wants of social life before he aspired to its
parade. A man of the world, Mr. Effingham
possessed
the requisite knowledge, and a man of justice,
the requisite fairness, to permit those who depended on
him so much for their happiness, to share equitably in
the good things that Providence had so liberally
bestowed
on himself. In other words, he made two
people
comfortable, by paying a generous price for a
housekeeper; his daughter, in the first place, by
releasing
her from cares that, necessarily, formed no
more a part of her duties than it would be a part of
her duty to sweep the pavement before the door; and,
in the next place, a very respectable woman who was
glad to obtain so good a home on so easy terms. To
this simple and just expedient, Eve was indebted for
being at the head of one of the quietest, most truly
elegant, and best ordered establishments in America,
with no other demands on her time than that which
was necessary to issue a few orders in the morning,
and to examine a few accounts once a week.
One of the first and the most acceptable of the visits
that Eve received, was from her cousin, Grace Van
Cortlandt, who was in the country at the moment of
her arrival, but who hurried back to town to meet her
old school-fellow and kinswoman, the instant she heard
of her having landed. Eve Effingham and Grace Van
Cortlandt were sisters' children, and had been born
within a month of each other. As the latter was
without
father or mother, most of their time had been passed
together, until the former was taken abroad, when a
separation unavoidably ensued. Mr. Effingham
ardently
desired, and had actually designed, to take his
niece with him to Europe, but her paternal grandfather,
who was still living, objected his years and affection,
and the scheme was reluctantly abandoned. This
grandfather was now dead, and Grace had been left,
with a very ample fortune, almost entirely the mistress
of her own movements.
The moment of the meeting between these two
warm-hearted and sincerely attached young women,
was one of great interest and anxiety to both. They
retained for each other the tenderest love, though the
years that had separated them had given rise to so
many new impressions and habits that they did not
prepare
themselves for the interview without apprehension.
This interview took place about a week after Eve was
established in Hudson Square, and at an hour earlier
than was usual for the reception of visits. Hearing a
carriage stop before the door, and the bell ring, our
heroine stole a glance from behind a curtain and
recognized
her cousin as she alighted.
Qu'avez-vous, ma chere?
demanded Mademoiselle
Viefville, observing that her
lve
trembled and grew
pale.
It is my cousin, Miss Van Cortlandtshe whom
I loved as a sisterwe now meet for the first time in
so many years!
Bienc'est une trs jolie jeune personne!
returned
the governess, taking a glance from the spot Eve had
just quitted.
Sur le rapport de la personne, ma chere,
vous devriez tre contente, au moins
.
If you will excuse me, Mademoiselle, I will go down
aloneI think I should prefer to meet Grace without
witnesses in the first interview.
Trs volontiers. Elle est parente, et c'est bien
naturel
.
Eve, on this expressed approbation, met her maid at
the door, as she came to announce that
Mademoiselle
de Cortlandt
was in the library, and descended slowly
to meet her. The library was lighted from above by
means of a small dome, and Grace had unconsciously
placed herself in the very position that a painter would
have chosen, had she been about to sit for her
portrait
.
A strong, full, rich light fell obliquely on her
as Eve entered, displaying her fine person and
beautiful
features to the very best advantage, and they were
features and a person that are not seen every day,
even in a country where female beauty is so common.
She was in a carriage dress, and her toilette was rather
more elaborate than Eve had been accustomed to see,
at that hour, but still Eve thought she had seldom seen
a more lovely young creature. Some such thoughts,
also, passed through the mind of Grace herself, who,
though struck, with a woman's readiness in such
matters
,
with the severe simplicity of Eve's attire, as well
as with its entire elegance, was more struck with the
charms of her countenance and figure. There was,
in truth, a strong resemblance between them, though
each was distinguished by an expression suited to her
character, and to the habits of her mind.
Miss Effingham! said Grace, advancing a step to
meet the lady who entered, while her voice was
scarcely
audible and her limbs trembled.
Miss Van Cortlandt! said Eve, in the same low,
smothered tone.
This formality caused a chill in both, and each
unconsciously
stopped and curtsied. Eve had been so
much struck with the coldness of the American
manner
,
during the week she had been at home, and Grace
was so sensitive on the subject of the opinion of one
who had seen so much of Europe, that there was great
danger, at that critical moment, the meeting would
terminate
unpropitiously.
Thus far, however, all had been rigidly decorous,
though the strong feelings that were glowing in the
bosoms of both, had been so completely suppressed.
But the smile, cold and embarrassed as it was, that
each gave as she curtsied, had the sweet character of
her childhood in it, and recalled to both the girlish and
affectionate intercourse of their younger days.
Grace! said Eve, eagerly, advancing a step or
two impetuously, and blushing like the dawn.
Eve!
Each opened her arms, and in a moment they were
locked in a long and fervent embrace. This was the
commencement of their former intimacy, and before
night Grace was domesticated in her uncle's house. It
is true that Miss Effingham perceived certain
peculiarities
about Miss Van Cortlandt, that she had rather
were absent; and Miss Van Cortlandt would have felt
more at her ease, had Miss Effingham a little less
reserve of manner, on certain subjects that the latter
had been taught to think interdicted. Notwithstanding
these slight separating shades in character, however,
the natural affection was warm and sincere; and if Eve,
according to Grace's notions, was a little stately and
formal, she was polished and courteous, and if Grace,
according to Eve's notions, was a little too easy and
unreserved, she was feminine and delicate.
We pass over the three or four days that succeeded,
during which Eve had got to understand something of
her new position, and we will come at once to a
conversation
between the cousins, that will serve to let the
reader more intimately into the opinions, habits and
feelings of both, as well as to open the real subject of
our narrative. This conversation took place in that
very library which had witnessed their first interview,
soon after breakfast, and while the young ladies were
still alone.
I suppose, Eve, you will have to visit the Green's.
They are Hajjis, and were much in society last
winter
.
Hajjis!You surely do not mean, Grace, that they
have been to Mecca?
Not at all: only to Paris, my dear; that makes
a Hajji in New-York.
And does it entitle the pilgrim to wear the green
turban? asked Eve, laughing.
To wear any thing, Miss Effingham; green, blue,
or yellow, and to cause it to pass for elegance.
And which is the favourite colour with the family
you have mentioned?
It ought to be the first, in compliment to the name,
but, if truth must be said, I think they betray an
affection
for all, with not a few of the half-tints in addition.
I am afraid they are too
prononces
for us, by this
description. I am no great admirer, Grace, of
walking
rainbows.
Too
Green, you would have said, had you dared;
but you are a Hajji too, and even the Greens know
that a Hajji never puns, unless, indeed, it might be one
from Philadelphia. But you will visit these people?
Certainly, if they are in society and render it
necessary
by their own civilities.
They
are
in society, in virtue of their rights as
Hajjis; but, as they passed three months at Paris, you
probably know something of them.
They may not have been there at the same time
with ourselves, returned Eve, quietly, and Paris is a
very large town. Hundreds of people come and go,
that one never hears of. I do not remember those you
have mentioned.
I wish you may escape them, for, in my
untravelled
judgment, they are anything but agreeable,
notwithstanding
all they have seen, or pretend to have
seen.
It is very possible to have been all over
christendom
,
and to remain exceedingly disagreeable; besides
one may see a great deal, and yet see very little of a
good quality.
A pause of two or three minutes followed, during
which Eve read a note, and her cousin played with the
leaves of a book.
I wish I knew your real opinion of us, Eve, the
last suddenly exclaimed. Why not be frank with so
near a relative; tell me honestly, noware you
reconciled
to your country?
You are the eleventh person who has asked me
Vol. I.  2
this question, which I find very extraordinary, as I
have never quarrelled with my country.
Nay, I do not mean exactly that. I wish to hear
how our society has struck one who has been educated
abroad.
You wish, then, for opinions that can have no great
value, since my experience at home, extends only to a
fortnight. But you have many books on the country,
and some written by very clever persons; why not
consult them?
Oh! you mean the travellers. None of them are
worth a second thought, and we hold them, one and
all, in great contempt.
Of that I can have no manner of doubt, as one
and all, you are constantly protesting it, in the
highways
and bye-ways. There is no more certain sign
of contempt, than to be incessantly dwelling on its
intensity!
Grace had great quickness, as well as her cousin,
and though provoked at Eve's quiet hit, she had the
good sense and the good nature to laugh.
Perhaps we do protest and disdain a little too
strenuously
for good taste, if not to gain believers; but
surely, Eve, you do not support these travellers in all
that they have written of us?
Not in half, I can assure you. My father and
cousin
Jack have discussed them too often in my presence
to leave me in ignorance of the very many political
blunders they have made in particular.
Political blunders!I know nothing of them, and
had rather thought them right, in most of what they
said about our politics. But, surely, neither your father
nor Mr. John Effingham corroborates what they say
of our society!
I cannot answer for either, on that point.
Speak then for yourself. Do
you
think them right?
You should remember, Grace, that I have not yet
seen any society in New-York.
No society, dear!Why you were at the
Henderson's
,
and the Morgan's, and the Drewett's; three of
the greatest
runions
that we have had in two
winters
!
I did not know that you meant those unpleasant
crowds, by society.
Unpleasant crowds! Why, child, that
is
society,
is it not?
Not what I have been taught to consider such; I
rather think it would be better to call it company.
And is not this what is called society in Paris?
As far from it as possible; it may be an
excrescence
of society; one of its forms; but, by no means,
society itself. It would be as true to call cards, which
are sometimes introduced in the world, society, as to
call a ball given in two small and crowded rooms,
society. They are merely two of the modes in which
idlers endeavour to vary their amusements.
But we have little else than these balls, the
morning
visits, and an occasional evening, in which there is
no dancing.
I am sorry to hear it; for, in that case, you can
have no society.
And is it different at Parisor Florence, or
Rome?
Very. In Paris there are many houses open every
evening to which one can go, with little ceremony.
Our sex appears in them, dressed according to what a
gentleman I overheard conversing at Mrs. Henderson's
would call their ulterior intentions, for the night;
some attired in the simplest manner, others dressed for
concerts, for the opera, for court even; some on the
way from a dinner, and others going to a late ball.
All this matter of course variety, adds to the ease and
grace of the company, and coupled with perfect good
manners, a certain knowledge of passing events, pretty
modes of expression, an accurate and even utterance,
the women usually find the means of making them
selves agreeable. Their sentiment is sometimes a little
heroic, but this one must overlook, and it is a taste,
moreover, that is falling into disuse, as people read
better
books.
And you prefer this heartlessness, Eve, to the
nature of your own country!
I do not know that quiet,
retenue
and a good tone,
are a whit more heartless than flirting, giggling and
childishness. There may be more nature in the latter,
certainly, but it is scarcely as agreeable, after one has
fairly got rid of the nursery.
Grace looked vexed, but she loved her cousin too
sincerely to be angry. A secret suspicion that Eve
was right, too, came in aid of her affection, and while
her little foot moved, she maintained her good-nature,
a task not always attainable for those who believe that
their own superlatives scarcely reach to other
people's
positives. At this critical moment, when there
was so much danger of a jar in the feelings of these
two young females, the library door opened and Pierre,
Mr. Effingham's own man, announced
Monsieur Bragg.
Monsieur who? asked Eve, in surprise.
Monsieur Bragg, returned Pierre, in French,
desires to see Mademoiselle.
You mean my father,I know no such person.
He inquired first for Monsieur, but understanding
Monsieur was out, he next asked to have the honour
of seeing Mademoiselle.
Is it what they call a
person
in England, Pierre?
Old Pierre smiled, as he answered
He has the air, Mademoiselle, though he esteems
himself a
personnage
, if I might take the liberty of
judging.
Ask him for his card,there must be a mistake, I
think.
While this short conversation took place, Grace Van
Cortlandt was sketching a cottage with a pen, without
attending to a word that was said. But, when Eve
received the card from Pierre and read aloud, with the
tone of surprise that the name would be apt to excite
in a novice in the art of American nomenclature, the
words Aristabulus Bragg, her cousin began to laugh.
Who can this possibly be, Grace?Did you ever
hear of such a person, and what right can he have to
wish to see me?
Admit him, by all means; it is your father's land
agent, and he may wish to leave some message for my
uncle. You will be obliged to make his acquaintance,
sooner or later, and it may as well be done now as at
another time.
You have shown this gentleman into the front
drawing-room
,
Pierre?
Oui, Mademoiselle.
I will ring when you are wanted.
Pierre withdrew, and Eve opened her secretary, out
of which she took a small manuscript book, over the
leaves of which she passed her fingers rapidly.
Here it is, she said, smiling, Mr. Aristabulus
Bragg, Attorney and Counsellor at Law, and the agent
of the Templeton estate. This precious little work,
you must understand, Grace, contains sketches of the
characters of such persons as I shall be the most likely
to see, by John Effingham, A. M. It is a sealed volume,
of course, but there can be no harm in reading the part
that treats of our present visiter, and, with your
permission
,
we will have it in common.`Mr. Aristabulus
Bragg was born in one of the western counties of
Massachusetts
,
and emigrated to New-York, after
receiving
his education, at the mature age of nineteen; at
twenty-one he was admitted to the bar, and for the last
seven years he has been a successful practitioner in all
the courts of Otsego, from the justice's to the circuit.
His talents are undeniable, as he commenced his
education
at fourteen and terminated it at twenty-one, the
law-course included. This man is an epitome of all
2 *
that is good and all that is bad, in a very large class
of his fellow citizens. He is quick-witted, prompt in
action, enterprising in all things in which he has
nothing
to lose, but wary and cautious in all things in
which he has a real stake, and ready to turn not only
his hand, but his heart and his principles to any thing
that offers an advantage. With him, literally,
nothing
is too high to be aspired to, nothing too low to
be done. He will run for Governor, or for
town-clerk
,
just as opportunities occur, is expert in all the
practices
of his profession, has had a quarter's
dancing
,
with three years in the classics, and turned his
attention towards medicine and divinity, before he
finally settled down into the law. Such a compound
of shrewdness, impudence, common-sense, pretension,
humility, cleverness, vulgarity, kind-heartedness,
duplicity
,
selfishness, law-honesty, moral fraud and mother
wit, mixed up with a smattering of learning and much
penetration in practical things, can hardly be described,
as any one of his prominent qualities is certain to be
met by another quite as obvious that is almost its
converse
.
Mr. Bragg, in short, is purely a creature of
circumstances, his qualities pointing him out for either
a member of congress or a deputy sheriff, offices that
he is equally ready to fill. I have employed him to
watch over the estate of your father, in the absence
of the latter, on the principle that one practised in
tricks is the best qualified to detect and expose them,
and with the certainty that no man will trespass with
impunity, so long as the courts continue to tax bills of
costs with their present liberality.' You appear to
know the gentleman, Grace; is this character of him
faithful?
I know nothing of bills of costs and deputy
sheriffs
,
but I do know that Mr. Aristabulus Bragg is an
amusing mixture of strut, humility, roguery and
cleverness
.
He is waiting all this time in the
drawing-room
,
and you had better see him, as he may, now, be
almost considered part of the family. You know he
has been living in the house at Templeton, ever since
he was installed by Mr. John Effingham. It was there
I had the honour first to meet him.
First!  Surely you have never seen him any
where else!
Your pardon, my dear. He never comes to town
without honouring me with a call. This is the price I
pay for having had the honour of being an inmate of
the same house with him for a week.
Eve rang the bell, and Pierre made his
appearance
.
Desire Mr. Bragg to walk into the library.
Grace looked demure while Pierre was gone to usher
in their visiter, and Eve was thinking of the medley
of qualities John Effingham had assembled in his
description
,
as the door opened, and the subject of her
contemplation entered.
Monsieur Aristabule
, said Pierre, eyeing the card,
but sticking at the first name.
Mr. Aristabulus Bragg was advancing with an easy
assurance to make his bow to the ladies, when the
more finished air and quiet dignity of Miss Effingham,
who was standing, so far disconcerted him, as
completely
to upset his self-possession. As Grace had
expressed it, in consequence of having lived three
years in the old residence at Templeton, he had begun
to consider himself a part of the family, and at home
he never spoke of the young lady without calling her
Eve, or Eve Effingham. But he found it a very
different thing to affect familiarity among his associates,
and to practise it in the very face of its subject; and,
although seldom at a loss for words of some sort or
another, he was now actually dumb-founded. Eve
relieved his awkwardness by directing Pierre, with her
eye, to hand a chair, and first speaking.
I regret that my father is not in, she said, by way
of turning the visit from herself; but he is to be
expected
every moment. Are you lately from
Templeton
?
Aristabulus drew his breath, and recovered enough
of his ordinary tone of manner to reply with a decent
regard to his character for self-command. The
intimacy
that he had intended to establish on the spot, was
temporarily defeated, it is true, and without his exactly
knowing how it had been effected; for it was merely
the steadiness of the young lady, blended as it was with
a polished reserve, that had thrown him to a distance
he could not explain. He felt immediately, and with
taste that did his sagacity credit, that his footing in
this quarter was only to be obtained by unusually slow
and cautious means. Still, Mr. Bragg was a man of
great decision, and, in his way, of very far-sighted
views; and, singular as it may seem, at that
unpropitious
moment, he mentally determined that, at no very
distant day, he would make Miss Eve Effingham his
wife.
I hope Mr. Effingham enjoys good health, he said,
with some such caution as a rebuked school-girl enters
on the recitation of her taskhe enjoyed bad health
I hear, (Mr. Aristabulus Bragg, though so shrewd, was
far from critical in his modes of speech) when he went
to Europe, and after travelling so far in such bad
company
,
it would be no more than fair that he should
have a little respite as he approaches home and old
age.
Had Eve been told that the man who uttered this
nice sentiment, and that too in accents as uncouth and
provincial as the thought was finished and lucid,
actually
presumed to think of her as his bosom companion,
it is not easy to say which would have predominated
in her mind, mirth or resentment. But Mr. Bragg was
not in the habit of letting his secrets escape him
prematurely
,
and certainly this was one that none but a
wizard could have discovered without the aid of a
direct
oral or written communication.
Are you lately from Templeton? repeated Eve,
a little surprised that the gentleman did not see fit to
answer the question, which was the only one that, as
it seemed to her, could have a common interest with
them both.
I left home the day before yesterday, Aristabulus
now deigned to reply.
It is so long since I saw our beautiful mountains,
and I was then so young, that I feel a great impatience
to revisit them, though the pleasure must be deferred
until spring.
I conclude they are the handsomest mountains in
the known world, Miss Effingham!
That is much more than I shall venture to claim
for them; but, according to my imperfect recollection,
and, what I esteem of far more importance, according
to the united testimony of Mr. John Effingham and my
father, I think they must be very beautiful.
Aristabulus looked up, as if he had a facetious thing
to say, and he even ventured on a smile, while he made
his answer.
I hope Mr. John Effingham has prepared you for
a great change in the house?
We know that it has been repaired and altered
under his directions. That was done at my father's
request.
We consider it denationalized, Miss Effingham,
there being nothing like it, west of Albany at least.
I should be sorry to find that my cousin has
subjected
us to this imputation, said Eve smiling
perhaps
a little equivocally; the architecture of America
being generally so simple and pure. Mr. Effingham
laughs at his own improvements, however, in which,
he says, he has only carried out the plans of the
original
artiste
, who worked very much in what was
called the composite order.
You allude to Mr. Hiram Doolittle, a gentleman I
never saw; though I hear he has left behind him many
traces of his progress in the newer states.
Ex pede,
Herculem
, as we say, in the classics, Miss Effingham.
I believe it is the general sentiment that Mr. Doolittle's
designs have been improved on, though most people
think that the Grecian or Roman architecture, which
is so much in use in America, would be more
republican
.
But every body knows that Mr. John
Effingham
is not much of a republican.
Eve did not choose to discuss her kinsman's opinions
with Mr. Aristabulus Bragg, and she quietly remarked
that she did not know that the imitations of the
ancient
architecture, of which there are so many in the
country, were owing to attachment to republicanism.
To what else can it be owing, Miss Eve?
Sure enough, said Grace Van Cortlandt; it is
unsuited to the materials, the climate, and the uses;
and some very powerful motive, like that mentioned
by Mr. Bragg, could alone overcome these obstacles.
Aristabulus started from his seat, and making
sundry
apologies, declared his previous unconsciousness
that Miss Van Cortlandt was present; all of which
was true enough, as he had been so much occupied
mentally, with her cousin, as not to have observed her,
seated as she was partly behind a screen. Grace
received
the excuses favourably, and the conversation
was resumed.
I am sorry that my cousin should offend the taste
of the country, said Eve, but as we are to live in
the house, the punishment will fall heaviest on the
offenders.
Do not mistake me, Miss Eve, returned
Aristabulus
,
in a little alarm, for he too well understood the
influence and wealth of John Effingham, not to wish
to be on good terms with him; do not mistake me.
I
admire the house, and know it to be a perfect
specimen
of a pure architecture in its way, but then public
opinion is not yet quite up to it.
I
see all its beauties,
I would wish you to know, but then there are many,
a majority perhaps, who do not, and these persons
think they ought to be consulted about such matters.
I believe Mr. John Effingham thinks less of his
own work than you seem to think of it yourself, sir,
for I have frequently heard him laugh at it, as a mere
enlargement of the merits of the composite order. He
calls it a caprice, rather than a taste: nor do I see
what concern a majority, as you term them, can have
with a house that does not belong to them.
Aristabulus was surprised that any one could
disregard
a majority; for, in this respect, he a good deal
resembled
Mr. Dodge, though running a different career;
and the look of surprise he gave was natural and open.
I do not mean that the public has a legal right to
control the tastes of the citizen, he said, but in a
republican
government, you undoubtedly understand,
Miss Eve, it
will
rule in all things.
I can understand that one would wish to see his
neighbour use good taste, as it helps to embellish a
country; but the man who should consult the whole
neighbourhood before he built, would be very apt to
cause a complicated house to be erected, if he paid
much respect to the different opinions he received;
or, what is quite as likely, apt to have no house at
all.
I think you are mistaken, Miss Effingham, for the
public sentiment, just now, runs almost exclusively
and popularly into the Grecian school. We build
little besides temples for our churches, our banks, our
taverns, our court-houses, and our dwellings. A friend
of mine has just built a brewery on the model of the
Temple of the Winds.
Had it been a mill, one might understand the
conceit
,
said Eve, who now began to perceive that her
visiter had some latent humour, though he produced it
in a manner to induce one to think him any thing but
a droll. The mountains must be doubly beautiful, if
they are decorated in the way you mention. I
sincerely
hope, Grace, that I shall find the hills as
pleasant
as they now exist in my recollection!
Should they not prove to be quite as lovely as you
imagine, Miss Effingham, returned Aristabulus, who
saw no impropriety in answering a remark made to
Miss Van Cortlandt, or any one else, I hope you
will have the kindness to conceal the fact from the
world.
I am afraid that would exceed my power, the
disappointment
would be so strong. May I ask why you
show so much interest in my keeping so cruel a
mortification
to myself?
Why, Miss Eve, said Aristabulus, looking grave,
I am afraid that
our
people would hardly bear the
expression of such an opinion from
you
.
From
me!
and why not from
me
, in particular?
Perhaps it is because they think you have
travelled
,
and have seen other countries.
And is it only those who have
not
travelled, and
who have no means of knowing the value of what
they say, that are privileged to criticise?
I cannot exactly explain my own meaning,
perhaps
,
but I think Miss Grace will understand me. Do
you not agree with me, Miss Van Cortlandt, in
thinking
it would be safer for one who never saw any
other mountains to complain of the tameness and
monotony of our own, than for one who had passed a
whole life among the Andes and the Alps?
Eve smiled, for she saw that Mr. Bragg was
capable
of detecting and laughing at provincial pride, even
while he was so much under its influence; and Grace
coloured, for she had the consciousness of having
already betrayed some of this very silly sensitiveness,
in her intercourse with her cousin, in connexion with
other subjects. A reply was unnecessary, however,
as the door just then opened, and John Effingham
made his appearance. The meeting between the two
gentlemen, for we suppose Aristabulus must be
included
in the category by courtesy, if not of right,
was more cordial than Eve had expected to witness,
for each really entertained a respect for the other, in
reference to a merit of a particular sort; Mr. Bragg
esteeming Mr. John Effingham as a wealthy and
caustic cynic, and Mr. John Effingham regarding Mr.
Bragg much as the owner of a dwelling regards a
valuable house-dog. After a few moments of
conversation
,
the two withdrew together, and just as the
ladies were about to descend to the drawing-room,
previously to dinner, Pierre announced that a plate
had been ordered for the land agent.
CHAPTER II.
I know that Deformed; he has been a vile thief this seven year;
he goes up and down like a gentleman.
Much Ado About Nothing
.
Eve
, and her cousin, found Sir George Templemore
and Captain Truck in the drawing-room, the former
having lingered in New-York, with a desire to be near
his friends, and the latter being on the point of sailing
for Europe, in his regular turn. To these must be
added Mr. Bragg and the ordinary inmates of the
house, when the reader will get a view of the whole
party.
Aristabulus had never before sat down to as brilliant
a table, and for the first time in his life, he saw candles
lighted at a dinner; but he was not a man to be
disconcerted
at a novelty. Had he been a European of
the same origin and habits, awkwardness would have
betrayed him fifty times, before the dessert made its
appearance; but, being the man he was, one who
overlooked
a certain prurient politeness that rather
illustrated
Vol. I.  3
his deportment, might very well have permitted
him to pass among the
oi polloi
of the world, were it
not for a peculiar management in the way of providing
for himself. It is true, he asked every one near him
to eat of every thing he could himself reach, and that
he used his knife as a coal-heaver uses a shovel; but
the company he was in, though fastidious in its own
deportment, was altogether above the silver-forkisms,
and this portion of his demeanour, if it did not escape
undetected, passed away unnoticed. Not so, however,
with the peculiarity already mentioned as an
exception
.
This touch of deportment, (or management,
perhaps
,
is the better word,) being characteristic of the
man, it deserves to be mentioned a little in detail.
The service at Mr. Effingham's table was made in
the quiet, but thorough manner that distinguishes a
French dinner. Every dish was removed, carved by
the domestics, and handed in turn to each guest. But
there were a delay and a finish in this arrangement
that suited neither Aristabulus's go-a-head-ism, nor his
organ of acquisitiveness. Instead of waiting,
therefore
,
for the more graduated movements of the
domestics
,
he began to take care of himself, an office that
he performed with a certain dexterity that he had
acquired by frequenting ordinariesa school, by the
way, in which he had obtained most of his notions of
the proprieties of the table. One or two slices were
obtained in the usual manner, or by means of the
regular service; and, then, like one who had laid the
foundation of a fortune, by some lucky windfall in the
commencement of his career, he began to make
accessions, right and left, as opportunity offered.
Sundry
entremets
, or light dishes that had a peculiarly
tempting appearance, came first under his grasp. Of
these he soon accumulated all within his reach, by
taxing his neighbours, when he ventured to send his
plate, here and there, or wherever he saw a dish that
promised to reward his trouble. By such means,
which were resorted to, however, with a quiet and
unobtrusive assiduity that escaped much observation,
Mr. Bragg contrived to make his own plate a sample
epitome of the first course. It contained in the centre,
fish, beef, and ham; and around these staple articles,
he had arranged
croquettes, rognons, rgouts
,
vegetables
,
and other light things, until not only was the
plate completely covered, but it was actually covered
in double and triple layers; mustard, cold butter, salt,
and even pepper, garnishing its edges. These
different
accumulations were the work of time and address,
and most of the company had repeatedly changed
their plates before Aristabulus had eaten a mouthful,
the soup excepted. The happy moment when his
ingenuity was to be rewarded, had now arrived, and
the land agent was about to commence the process
of mastication, or of deglutition rather, for he troubled
himself very little with the first operation, when the
report of a cork drew his attention towards the
champaigne
.
To Aristabulus this wine never came amiss,
for, relishing its piquancy, he had never gone far
enough into the science of the table to learn which
were the proper moments for using it. As respected
all the others at table, this moment had in truth
arrived, though, as respected himself, he was no nearer
to it, according to a regulated taste, than when he
first took his seat. Perceiving that Pierre was serving
it, however, he offered his own glass, and enjoyed a
delicious instant, as he swallowed a beverage that
much surpassed any thing he had ever known to issue
out of the waxed and leaded nozles that, pointed like
so many enemies' batteries, loaded with headaches
and disordered stomachs, garnished sundry village
bars of his acquaintance.
Aristabulus finished his glass at a draught, and
when he took breath, he fairly smacked his lips. That
was an unlucky instant, his plate, burthened with
all its treasures, being removed, at this unguarded
moment; the man who performed the unkind office,
fancying that a dislike to the dishes could alone have
given rise to such an omnium-gatherum.
It was necessary to commence
de novo
, but this
could no longer be done with the first course, which
was removed, and Aristabulus set-to, with zeal,
forthwith
,
on the game. Necessity compelled him to eat, as
the different dishes were offered; and, such was his
ordinary assiduity with the knife and fork, that, at the
end of the second remove, he had actually disposed
of more food than any other person at table. He now
began to converse, and we shall open the
conversation
at the precise point in the dinner, when it was in
the power of Aristabulus to make one of the
interlocutors
.
Unlike Mr. Dodge, he had betrayed no peculiar
interest in the baronet, being a man too shrewd and
worldly to set his heart on trifles of any sort; and Mr.
Bragg no more hesitated about replying to Sir George
Templemore, or Mr. Effingham, than he would have
hesitated about answering one of his own nearest
associates
.
With him age and experience formed no
particular
claims to be heard, and, as to rank, it is true
he had some vague ideas about there being such a
thing in the militia, but as it was unsalaried rank, he
attached no great importance to it. Sir George
Templemore
was inquiring concerning the recording of
deeds, a regulation that had recently attracted
attention
in England; and one of Mr. Effingham's replies
contained some immaterial inaccuracy, which
Aristabulus
took occasion to correct, as his first appearance
in the general discourse.
I ask pardon, sir, he concluded his explanations
by saying, but I ought to know these little niceties,
having served a short part of a term as a county
clerk, to fill a vacancy occasioned by a death.
You mean, Mr. Bragg, that you were employed
to
write
in a county clerk's office, observed John
Effingham, who so much disliked untruth, that he did
not hesitate much about refuting it; or what he now
fancied to be an untruth.
As county clerk, sir. Major Pippin died a year
before his time was out, and I got the appointment.
As regular a county clerk, sir, as there is in the
fifty-six
counties of New-York.
When I had the honour to engage you as Mr.
Effingham's agent, sir, returned the other, a little
sternly, for he felt his own character for veracity
involved in that of the subject of his selection, I
believe, indeed, that you were writing in the office,
but I did not understand it was as
the
clerk.
Very true, Mr. John, returned Aristabulus,
without
discovering the least concern, I was
then
engaged by my successor as
a
clerk; but a few
months earlier, I filled the office myself.
Had you gone on, in the regular line of
promotion
,
my dear sir, pithily inquired Captain Truck,
to what preferment would you have risen by this
time?
I believe I understand you, gentlemen, returned
the unmoved Aristabulus, who perceived a general
smile. I know that some people are particular about
keeping pretty much on the same level, as to office:
but I hold to no such doctrine. If one good thing
cannot be had, I do not see that it is a reason for
rejecting another. I ran that year for sheriff, and
finding I was not strong enough to carry the county,
I accepted my successor's offer to write in the office,
until something better might turn up.
You practised all this time, I believe, Mr. Bragg,
observed John Effingham.
I did a little in that way, too, sir; or as much as
I could. Law is flat with us, of late, and many of
the attorneys are turning their attention to other
callings.
And pray, sir, asked Sir George, what is the
favourite pursuit with most of them, just now?
3 *
Some our way have gone into the horse-line; but
much the greater portion are, just now, dealing in
western cities.
In western cities! exclaimed the baronet, looking
as if he distrusted a mystification.
In such articles, and in mill-seats, and rail-road
lines, and other expectations.
Mr. Bragg means that they are buying and
selfing
lands on which it is hoped all these conveniences
may exist, a century hence, explained John
Effingham
.
The
hope
is for next year, or next week, even, Mr.
John, returned Aristabulus, with a sly look, though
you may be very right as to the
reality
. Great
fortunes
have been made on a capital of hopes, lately, in
this country.
And have you been able, yourself, to resist these
temptations? asked Mr. Effingham. I feel doubly
indebted to you, sir, that you should have continued
to devote your time to my interests, while so many
better things were offering.
It was my duty, sir, said Aristabulus, bowing so
much the lower, from the consciousness that he had
actually deserted his post for some months, to
embark in the western speculations that were then so
active in the country, not to say my pleasure. There
are many profitable occupations in this country, Sir
George, that have been overlooked in the eagerness to
embark in the town-trade
Mr. Bragg does not mean trade in town, but trade
in towns, explained John Effingham.
Yes, sir, the traffic in cities. I never come this
way, without casting an eye about me, in order to see
if there is any thing to be done that is useful; and I
confess that several available opportunities have
offered, if one had capital. Milk is a good business.
Le lait!
exclaimed Mademoiselle Viefville,
involuntarily
.
Yes, ma'am, for ladies as well as gentlemen.
Sweet potatoes I have heard well spoken of, and
peaches are really making some rich men's fortunes.
All of which are honester and better occupations
than the traffic in cities, that you have mentioned,
quietly observed Mr. Effingham.
Aristabulus looked up in a little surprise, for with
him every thing was eligible that returned a good
profit, and all things honest that the law did not
actually
punish. Perceiving, however, that the company
was disposed to listen, and having, by this time,
recovered
the lost ground, in the way of food, he
cheerfully
resumed his theme.
Many families have left Otsego, this and the last
summer, Mr. Effingham, as emigrants for the west.
The fever has spread far and wide.
The fever! Is
old
Otsego, for so its inhabitants
loved to call a county of half a century's existence,
it being venerable by comparison, is
old
Otsego losing
its well established character for salubrity?
I do not allude to an animal fever, but to the
western
fever.
Ce pays de l'ouest, est-il bien malsain?
whispered
Mademoiselle Viefville.
Apparemment, Mademoiselle, sur plusieurs
rapports
.
The western fever has seized old and young, and
it has carried off many active families from our part
of the world, continued Aristabulus, who did not
understand
the little aside just mentioned, and who, of
course, did not heed it; most of the counties
adjoining
our own have lost a considerable portion of their
population.
And they who have gone, do they belong to the
permanent families, or are they merely the floating
inhabitants
?
inquired Mr. Effingham.
Most of them belong to the regular movers.
Movers! again exclaimed Sir Georgeis there
any material part of your population who actually
deserve
this name?
As much so as the man who shoes a horse ought
to be called a smith, or the man who frames a house a
carpenter, answered John Effingham.
To be sure, continued Mr. Bragg, we have a
pretty considerable leaven of them in our political
dough, as well as in our active business. I believe,
Sir George, that in England, men are tolerably
stationary
.
We love to continue for generations on the same
spot. We love the tree that our forefathers planted,
the roof that they built, the fire-side by which they sat,
the sods that cover their remains.
Very poetical, and I dare say there are situations
in life, in which such feelings come in without much
effort. It must be a great check to business
operations
,
however, in your part of the world, sir!
Business operations!what is business, as you
term it, sir, to the affections, to the recollections of
ancestry
,
and to the solemn feelings connected with history
and tradition?
Why, sir, in the way of history, one meets with
but few incumbrances in this country, but he may do
very much as interest dictates, so far as that is
concerned
,
at least. A nation is much to be pitied that is
weighed down by the past, in this manner, since its
industry
and enterprize are constantly impeded by
obstacles
that grow out of its recollections. America
may, indeed, be termed a happy and a free country,
Mr. John Effingham, in this, as well as in all other
things!
Sir George Templemore was too well-bred to utter
all he felt at that moment, as it would unavoidably
wound the feelings of his hosts, but he was rewarded
for his forbearance by intelligent smiles from Eve and
Grace, the latter of whom the young baronet fancied,
just at that moment, was quite as beautiful as her
cousin, and if less finished in manners, she had the
most interesting
naivet
.
I have been told that most old nations have to
struggle
with difficulties that we escape, returned John
Effingham
,
though I confess this is a superiority on our
part, that never before presented itself to my mind.
The political economists, and even the geographers
have overlooked it, but practical men see and feel its
advantages, every hour in the day. I have been told,
Sir George Templemore, that in England, there are
difficulties in running high-ways and streets through
homesteads and dwellings; and that even a rail-road,
or a canal, is obliged to make a curve to avoid a
church-yard or a tomb-stone?
I confess to the sin, sir.
Our friend Mr. Bragg, put in John Effingham,
considers life as all
means
and no
end
.
An end cannot be got at without the means, Mr.
John Effingham, as I trust you will, yourself, admit.
I am for the end of the road, at least, and must say
that I rejoice in being a native of a country in which
as few impediments as possible exist to onward
impulses
.
The man who should resist an improvement,
in our part of the country, on account of his forefathers,
would fare badly among his contemporaries.
Will you permit me to ask, Mr. Bragg, if you feel
no local attachments yourself, enquired the baronet,
throwing as much delicacy into the tones of his voice,
as a question that he felt ought to be an insult to a
man's heart, would allowif one tree is not more
pleasant than another; the house you were born in
more beautiful than a house into which you never
entered; or the altar at which you have long
worshipped
,
more sacred than another at which you never
knelt?
Nothing gives me greater satisfaction than to
answer the questions of gentlemen that travel through
our country, returned Aristabulus, for I think, in
making nations acquainted with each other, we
encourage
trade and render business more secure. To
reply to your inquiry, a human being is not a cat, to
love a locality rather than its own interests. I have
found some trees much pleasanter than others, and the
pleasantest tree I can remember was one of my own,
out of which the sawyers made a thousand feet of
clear stuff, to say nothing of middlings. The house I
was born in was pulled down, shortly after my birth,
as indeed has been its successor, so I can tell you
nothing
on that head; and as for altars, there are none
in my persuasion.
The church of Mr. Bragg has stripped itself as
naked as he would strip every thing else, if he could,
said John Effingham. I much question if he ever
knelt even; much less before an altar.
We are of the standing order, certainly, returned
Aristabulus, glancing towards the ladies to discover
how they took his wit, and Mr. John Effingham is as
near right as a man need be, in a matter of faith. In
the way of houses, Mr. Effingham, I believe it is the
general opinion you might have done better with your
own, than to have repaired it. Had the materials been
disposed of, they would have sold well, and by running
a street through the property, a pretty sum might have
been realized.
In which case I should have been without a home,
Mr. Bragg.
It would have been no great matter to get another
on cheaper land. The old residence would have made
a good factory, or an inn.
Sir, I
am
a cat, and like the places I have long
frequented.
Aristabulus, though not easily daunted, was awed by
Mr. Effingham's manner, and Eve saw that her father's
fine face had flushed. This interruption, therefore,
suddenly changed the discourse, which has been
related
at some length, as likely to give the reader a
better insight into a character that will fill some space
in our narrative, than a more laboured description.
I trust your owners, Captain Truck, said John
Effingham, by way of turning the conversation into
another channel, are fully satisfied with the manner
in which you saved their property from the hands of
the Arabs?
Men, when money is concerned, are more disposed
to remember how it was lost than how it was
recovered
,
religion and trade being the two poles, on such a
point, returned the old seaman, with a serious face.
On the whole, my dear sir, I have reason to be
satisfied
,
however; and so long as you, my passengers and
my friends, are not inclined to blame me, I shall feel
as if I had done at least a part of my duty.
Eve rose from table, went to a side-board and
returned
,
when she gracefully placed before the master
of the Montauk a rich and beautifully chased
punchbowl
,
in silver. Almost at the same moment, Pierre
offered a salver that contained a capital watch, a pair
of small silver tongs to hold a coal, and a deck
trumpet
,
in solid silver.
These are so many faint testimonials of our
feelings
,
said Eveand you will do us the favour to
retain them, as evidences of the esteem created by
skill, kindness, and courage.
My dear young lady! cried the old tar, touched
to the soul by the feeling with which Eve acquitted
herself of this little duty, my dear young ladywell,
God bless youGod bless you allyou too, Mr. John
Effingham, for that matterand Sir Georgethat I
should ever have taken that runaway for a gentleman
and a baronetthough I suppose there are some silly
baronets, as well as silly lordsretain them?
glancing
furiously at Mr. Aristabulus Bragg, may the Lord
forget me, in the heaviest hurricane, if I ever forget
whence these things came, and why they were given.
Here the worthy captain was obliged to swallow
some wine, by way of relieving his emotions, and
Aristabulus, profiting by the opportunity, coolly took
the bowl, which, to use a word of his own, he
hefted
in his hand, with a view to form some tolerably
accurate
notion of its intrinsic value. Captain Truck's eye
caught the action, and he reclaimed his property quite
as unceremoniously as it had been taken away, nothing
but the presence of the ladies preventing an
outbreaking
that would have amounted to a declaration of war.
With your permission, sir, said the captain, drily,
after he had recovered the bowl, not only without the
other's consent, but, in some degree, against his will;
this bowl is as precious in my eyes as if it were
made of my father's bones.
You may indeed think so, returned the land-agent,
for its cost could not be less than a hundred dollars.
Cost, sir!But, my dear young lady, let us talk
of the real value. For what part of these things am I
indebted to you?
The bowl is my offering, Eve answered,
smilingly
,
though a tear glistened in her eye, as she witnessed
the strong unsophisticated feeling of the old tar. I
thought it might serve sometimes to bring me to your
recollection, when it was well filled in honour of
`sweethearts and wives.'
It shallit shall, by the Lord; and Mr. Saunders
needs look to it, if he do not keep this work as bright
as a cruising frigate's bottom. To whom do I owe
the coal-tongs?
Those are from Mr. John Effingham, who insists
that he will come nearer to your heart than any of us,
though the gift be of so little cost.
He does not know me, my dear young lady
nobody
ever got as near my heart as you; no, not even
my own dear pious old mother. But I thank Mr. John
Effingham from my inmost spirit, and shall seldom
smoke without thinking of him. The watch I know
is Mr. Effingham's, and I ascribe the trumpet to Sir
George.
The bows of the several gentlemen assured the
captain
he was right, and he shook each of them cordially
by the hand, protesting, in the fulness of his heart, that
nothing would give him greater pleasure than to be
able to go through the same perilous scenes as those
from which they had so lately escaped, in their good
company again.
While this was going on, Aristabulus,
notwithstanding
the rebuke he had received, contrived to get
each article, in succession, into his hands, and by dint
of poising it on a finger, or by examining it, to form
some approximative notion of its inherent value. The
watch he actually opened, taking as good a survey of
its works as the circumstances of the case would very
well allow.
I respect these things, sir, more than you respect
your father's grave, said Captain Truck sternly, as
he rescued the last article from what he thought the
impious grasp of Aristabulus again, and cat or no
cat, they sink or swim with me for the remainder of
the cruise. If there is any virtue in a will, which I
am sorry to say I hear there is not any longer, they
shall share my last bed with me, be it ashore or be it
afloat. My dear young lady, fancy all the rest, but
depend on it, punch will be sweeter than ever taken
from this bowl, and `sweethearts and wives' will
never be so honoured again.
We are going to a ball this evening, at the house
of one with whom I am sufficiently intimate to take
the liberty of introducing a stranger, and I wish,
gentlemen
,
said Mr. Effingham, bowing to Aristabulus
and the captain, by way of changing the conversation,
you would do me the favour to be of our party.
Mr. Bragg acquiesced very cheerfully, and quite as
a matter of course; while Captain Truck, after
protesting
his unfitness for such scenes, was finally
prevailed
on by John Effingham, to comply with the
request
also. The ladies remained at table but a few
Vol. I.4
minutes longer, when they retired, Mr. Effingham
having dropped into the old custom of sitting at the
bottle, until summoned to the drawing-room, a usage
that continues to exist in America, for a reason no
better than the fact that it continues to exist in England;
it being almost certain that it will cease in New-York,
the season after it is known to have ceased in London.
CHAPTER III.
Thou art as wise as thou art beautiful!
Shakspeare
.
As Captain Truck asked permission to initiate the
new coal-tongs by lighting a cigar, Sir George
Templemore
contrived to ask Pierre, in an aside, if the
ladies
would allow him to join them. The desired
consent
having been obtained, the baronet quietly stole
from table, and was soon beyond the odours of the
dining-room.
You miss the censer and the frankincense, said
Eve, laughing, as Sir George entered the
drawing-room
;
but you will remember we have no church
establishment, and dare not take such liberties with the
ceremonials of the altar.
That is a short-lived custom with us, I fancy,
though far from an unpleasant one. But you do me
injustice in supposing I am merely running away from
the fumes of the dinner.
No, no; we understand perfectly well that you
have something to do with the fumes of flattery, and
we will at once fancy all has been said that the
occasion
requires. Is not our honest old captain a jewel
in his way?
Upon my word, since you allow me to speak of
your father's guests, I do not think it possible to have
brought together two men who are so completely the
opposites of each other, as Captain Truck and this Mr.
Aristabulus Bragg. The latter is quite the most
extraordinary
person in his way, it was ever my good
fortune
to meet with.
You call him a
person
, while Pierre calls him a
personnage;
I fancy he considers it very much as a
matter of accident, whether he is to pass his days in
the one character or in the other. Cousin Jack assures
me, that, while this man accepts almost any duty that
he chooses to assign him, he would not deem it at all
a violation of the
convenances
to aim at the throne in
the White House.
Certainly with no hopes of ever attaining it!
One cannot answer for that. The man must
undergo
many essential changes, and much radical
improvement
,
before such a climax to his fortunes can
ever occur; but the instant you do away with the
claims of hereditary power, the door is opened to a
new chapter of accidents. Alexander of Russia styled
himself
un heureux accident;
and should it ever be our
fortune to receive Mr. Bragg as President, we shall
only have to term him
un malheureux accident
. I
believe that will contain all the difference.
Your republicanism is indomitable, Miss Effingham,
and I shall abandon the attempt to convert you to safer
principles, more especially as I find you supported by
both the Mr. Effinghams, who, while they condemn so
much at home, seem singularly attached to their own
system at the bottom.
They condemn, Sir George Templemore, because
they know that perfection is hopeless, and because
they feel it to be unsafe and unwise to eulogize defects,
and they are attached, because near views of other
countries have convinced them that, comparatively at
least, bad as we are, we are still better than most of
our neighbours.
I can assure you, said Grace, that many of the
opinions of Mr. John Effingham, in particular, are not
at all the opinions that are most in vogue here; he
rather censures what we like, and likes what we
censure
.
Even my dear uncle is thought to be a little
heterodox on such subjects.
I can readily believe it, returned Eve, steadily.
These gentlemen, having become familiar with better
things, in the way of the tastes, and of the purely
agreeable, cannot discredit their own knowledge so
much as to extol that which their own experience tells
them is faulty, or condemn that which their own
experience
tells them is relatively good. Now, Grace, if
you will reflect a moment, you will perceive that
people
necessarily like the best of their own tastes, until
they come to a knowledge of better; and that they as
necessarily quarrel with the unpleasant facts that
surround
them; although these facts, as consequences of
a political system, may be much less painful than those
of other systems of which they have no knowledge.
In the one case, they like their own best, simply because
it is their own best; and they dislike their own worst,
because it is their own worst. We cherish a taste, in
the nature of things, without entering into any
comparisons
,
for when the means of comparison offer, and
we find improvements, it ceases to be a taste at all;
while to complain of any positive grievance, is the
nature of man, I fear!
I think a republic odious!
Le republique est une horreur!
Grace thought a republic odious, without knowing
any thing of any other state of society, and because
it contained odious things; and Mademoiselle Viefville
called a republic
une horreur
, because heads fell and
anarchy prevailed in her own country, during its early
struggles for liberty. Though Eve seldom spoke more
sensibly, and never more temperately, than while
delivering
the foregoing opinions, Sir George Templemore
doubted whether she had all that exquisite
finesse
and
delicacy of features, that he had so much admired; and
when Grace burst out in the sudden and senseless
exclamation we have recorded, he turned towards her
sweet and animated countenance, which, for the
moment
,
he fancied the loveliest of the two.
Eve Effingham had yet to learn that she had just
entered into the most intolerant society, meaning purely
as society, and in connexion with what are usually
called liberal sentiments, in christendom. We do not
mean by this, that it would be less safe to utter a
generous
opinion in favour of human rights in America than
in any other country, for the laws and the institutions
become active in this respect, but simply, that the
resistance
of the more refined to the encroachments of the
unrefined, has brought about a state of feelinga
feeling
that is seldom just and never philosophicalwhich
has created a silent but almost unanimous bias against
the effects of the institutions, in what is called the
world. In Europe, one rarely utters a sentiment of
this nature, under circumstances in which it is safe to
do so at all, without finding a very general sympathy
in the auditors; but in the circle into which Eve had
now fallen, it was almost considered a violation of the
proprieties. We do not wish to be understood as
saying
more than we mean, however, for we have no
manner of doubt that a large portion of the dissentients
even, are so idly, and without reflection; or for the
very natural reasons already given by our heroine;
but we do wish to be understood as meaning that such
is the outward appearance which American society
presents to every stranger, and to every native of the
country too, on his return from a residence among
other people. Of its taste, wisdom and safety we
shall not now speak, but content ourselves with merely
saying that the effect of Grace's exclamation on Eve
was unpleasant, and that, unlike the baronet, she
thought her cousin was never less handsome than
while her pretty face was covered with the pettish
frown it had assumed for the occasion.
4 *
Sir George Templemore had tact enough to perceive
there had been a slight jar in the feelings of these two
young women, and he adroitly changed the
conversation
.
With Eve he had entire confidence on the score
of provincialisms, and, without exactly anticipating
the part Grace would be likely to take in such a
discussion
,
he introduced the subject of general society
in New-York.
I am desirous to know, he said, if you have
your sets, as we have them in London and Paris.
Whether you have your
Faubourg St. Germain
and
your
Chausse d'Antin;
your Piccadilly, Grosvenor
and Russel Squares.
I must refer you to Miss Van Cortlandt for an
answer to that question, said Eve.
Grace looked up blushing, for there were both
novelty
and excitement in having an intelligent foreigner
question her on such a subject.
I do not know that I rightly understand the
allusion
,
she said, although I am afraid Sir George
Templemore
means to ask if we have distinctions in
society
?
And why
afraid
, Miss Van Cortlandt?
Because it strikes me such a question would imply
a doubt of our civilization.
There are frequently distinctions made, when
the differences are not obvious, observed Eve. Even
London and Paris are not above the imputation of this
folly. Sir George Templemore, if I understand him,
wishes to know if we estimate gentility by streets, and
quality by squares.
Not exactly that either, Miss Effinghambut,
whether
among those, who may very well pass for
gentlemen
and ladies, you enter into the minute distinctions
that are elsewhere found. Whether you have your
exclusives, and your
lgants
and
lgantes;
or
whether
you deem all within the pale as on an equality.
Les femmes Americaines sont bien jolies!
exclaimed
Mademoiselle Viefville.
It is quite impossible that
coteries
should not form
in a town of three hundred thousand souls.
I do not mean exactly even that. Is there no
distinction
between
coteries;
is not one placed by opinion,
by a silent consent, if not by positive ordinances, above
another?
Certainly, that to which Sir George Templemore
alludes, is to be found, said Grace, who gained
courage
to speak, as she found the subject getting to be
more clearly within her comprehension. All the old
families, for instance, keep more together than the
others; though it is the subject of regret that they are
not more particular than they are.
Old families! exclaimed Sir George Templemore,
with quite as much stress as a well-bred man could
very well lay on the words, in such circumstances.
Old families, repeated Eve, with all that
emphasis
which the baronet himself had hesitated about
giving
.
As old, at least, as two centuries can make
them; and this, too, with origins beyond that period,
like those of the rest of the world. Indeed, the
American
has a better gentility than common, as, besides
his own, he may take root in that of Europe.
Do not misconceive me, Miss Effingham; I am
fully aware that the people of this country are exactly
like the people of all other civilized countries, in this
respect; but my surprise is that, in a republic, you
should have such a term even as that of `old families.'
The surprise has arisen, I must be permitted to say,
from not having sufficiently reflected on the real state
of the country. There are two great causes of
distinction
every where, wealth and merit. Now, if a
race of Americans continue conspicuous in their own
society, through either or both of these causes, for a
succession of generations, why have they not the same
claims to be considered members of old families, as
Europeans under the same circumstances? A
republican
history is as much history as a monarchical
history; and a historical name in one, is quite as much
entitled to consideration, as a historical name in
another
.
Nay, you admit this in your European
republics
,
while you wish to deny it in ours.
I must insist on having proofs; if we permit these
charges to be brought against us without evidence,
Mademoiselle Viefville, we shall finally be defeated
through our own neglect.
C'est une belle illustration, celle de l'antiquit
,
observed
the governess, in a matter of course tone.
If you insist on proof, what answer can you urge
to the
Capponi? `Sonnez vos trompettes, et je vais faire
sonner mes cloches
,'or to the
Von Erlachs
, a family
that has headed so many resistances to oppression and
invasion, for five centuries?
All this is very true, returned Sir George, and
yet I confess it is not the way in which it is usual with
us to consider American society.
A descent from Washington, with a character and
a social position to correspond, would not be
absolutely
vulgar, notwithstanding!
Nay, if you press me so hard, I must appeal to
Miss Van Cortlandt for succour.
On this point you will find no support in that
quarter. Miss Van Cortlandt has an historical name
herself, and will not forego an honest pride, in order
to relieve one of the hostile powers from a dilemma.
While I admit that time and merit must, in a certain
sense, place families in America in the same situation
with families in Europe, I cannot see that it is in
conformity
with your institutions to lay the same stress on
the circumstance.
In that we are perfectly of a mind, as I think the
American has much the best reason to be proud of his
family, said Eve, quietly.
You delight in paradoxes, apparently, this evening,
Miss Effingham, for I now feel very certain you can
hardly make out a plausible defence of this new
position
.
If I had my old ally, Mr. Powis, here, said Eve,
touching the fender unconsciously with her little foot,
and perceptibly losing the animation and pleasantry of
her voice, in tones that were gentler, if not melancholy,
I should ask him to explain this matter to you, for he
was singularly ready in such replies. As he is absent,
however, I will attempt the duty myself. In Europe,
office, power, and consequently, consideration, are all
hereditary; whereas, in this country, they are not, but
they depend on selection. Now, surely, one has more
reason to be proud of ancestors who have been chosen
to fill responsible stations, than of ancestors who have
filled them through the accidents,
heureux ou
malheureux
,
of birth. The only difference between England
and America, as respects family, is that you add
positive
rank to that to which we only give consideration.
Sentiment is at the bottom of our nobility, and the
great seal at the bottom of yours. And now, having
established the fact that there are families in America,
let us return whence we started, and enquire how far
they have an influence in every-day society.
To ascertain which, we must apply to Miss Van
Cortlandt.
Much less than they ought, if my opinion is to be
taken, said Grace, laughing, for the great inroad of
strangers has completely deranged all the
suitablenesses
,
in that respect.
And yet, I dare say, these very strangers do good,
rejoined Eve. Many of them must have been
respectable
in their native places, and ought to be an
acquisition
to a society that, in its nature, must be, Grace,
tant soit peu
, provincial.
Oh! cried Grace, I can tolerate any thing but
the Hajjis!
The what? asked Sir George, eagerlywill you
suffer me to ask an explanation, Miss Van Cortlandt.
The Hajjis, repeated Grace laughing, though she
blushed to the eyes.
The baronet looked from one cousin to the other,
and then turned an inquiring glance on Mademoiselle
Viefville. The latter gave a slight shrug, and seemed
to ask an explanation of the young lady's meaning
herself.
A Hajji is one of a class, Sir George
Templemore
,
Eve at length said, to which you and I have
both the honour of belonging.
No, not Sir George Templemore, interrupted
Grace, with a precipitation that she instantly regretted;
he is not an American.
Then I, alone, of all present, have that honour. It
means the pilgrimage to Paris, instead of Mecca; and
the Pilgrim must be an American, instead of a
Mahommedan
.
Nay, Eve,
you
are not a Hajji, neither.
Then there is some qualification with which I am
not yet acquainted. Will you relieve our doubts,
Grace, and let us know the precise character of the
animal.
You
stayed too long to be a Hajjione must get
innoculated merely; not take the disease and become
cured, to be a true Hajji.
I thank you, Miss Van Cortlandt, for this
description
,
returned Eve in her quiet way. I hope, as I
have gone through the malady, it has not left me
pitted
.
I should like to see one of these Hajjis, cried Sir
George.Are they of both sexes?
Grace laughed and nodded her head.
Will you point it out to me, should we be so
fortunate
as to encounter one this evening?
Again Grace laughed and nodded her head.
I have been thinking, Grace, said Eve, after a
short pause, that we may give Sir George
Templemore
a better idea of the sets about which he is so
curious, by doing what is no more than a duty of our
own, and by letting him profit by the opportunity.
Mrs. Hawker receives this evening without ceremony;
we have not yet sent our answer to Mrs. Jarvis, and
might very well look in upon her for half an hour,
after which we shall be in very good season for Mrs.
Houston's ball.
Surely, Eve, you would not wish to take Sir
George Templemore to such a house as that of Mrs.
Jarvis!
I
do not wish to take Sir George Templemore any
where, for your Hajjis have opinions of their own on
such subjects. But, as cousin Jack will accompany
us,
he
may very well confer that important favour. I
dare say, Mrs. Jarvis will not look upon it as too great
a liberty.
I will answer for it, that nothing Mr. John
Effingham
can do will be thought
mal  propos
by Mrs.
Jared Jarvis. His position in society is too well
established, and hers is too equivocal, to leave any
doubt on that head.
This, you perceive, settles the point of
cteries
,
said Eve to the baronet. Volumes might be written
to establish principles; but when one can do any thing
he or she pleases, any where that he or she likes, it is
pretty safe to say that he or she is privileged.
All very true, as to the fact, Miss Effingham; but
I should like exceedingly to know the reason.
Half the time, such things are decided without a
reason at all. You are a little exacting in requiring
a reason in New-York for that which is done in
London
without even the pretence of such a thing. It is
sufficient that Mrs. Jarvis will be delighted to see you
without an invitation, and that Mrs. Houston would,
at least, think it odd, were you to take the same
liberty with her.
It follows, said Sir George, smiling, that Mrs.
Jarvis is much the most hospitable person of the two.
But, Eve, what shall be done with Captain Truck
and Mr. Bragg? asked Grace. We cannot take
them
to Mrs. Hawker's!
Aristabulus would, indeed, be a little out of place
in such a house, but as for our excellent, brave,
straight-forward, old captain, he is worthy to go any
where. I shall be delighted to present
him
to Mrs.
Hawker, myself.
After a little consultation between the ladies, it was
settled that nothing should be said of the two first
visits to Mr. Bragg, but that Mr. Effingham should be
requested to bring him to the ball, at the proper hour,
and that the rest of the party should go quietly off to
the other places, without mentioning their projects.
As soon as this was arranged the ladies retired to
dress, Sir George Templemore passing into the library
to amuse himself with a book the while; where,
however
,
he was soon joined by John Effingham. Here
the former revived the conversation on distinctions in
society, with the confusion of thought that usually
marks a European's notions of such matters.
CHAPTER IV.
Ready.
And I.
And I.
Where shall we go?
Midsummer-night's Dream
.
Grace Van Cortlandt
was the first to make her
appearance after the retreat from the drawing-room.
It has often been said that, pretty as the American
females incontestably are, as a whole they appear
better in
demi-toilette
, than when attired for a ball.
With what would be termed high dress in other parts
of the world, they are little acquainted; but reversing
the rule of Europe, where the married bestow the
most care on their personal appearance, and the single
are taught to observe a rigid simplicity, Grace now
seemed sufficiently ornamented in the eyes of the
fastidious
baronet, while, at the same time, he thought
her less obnoxious to the criticism just mentioned,
than most of her young countrywomen, in general.
An
embonpoint
that was just sufficient to
distinguish
her from most of her companions, a fine colour,
brilliant eyes, a sweet smile, rich hair, and such feet
and hands as Sir George Templemore had, somehow
he scarcely knew how, himselffancied could only
belong to the daughters of peers and princes, rendered
Grace so strikingly attractive this evening, that the
young baronet began to think her even handsomer
than her cousin. There was also a charm in the
unsophisticated simplicity of Grace, that was
particularly
alluring to a man educated amidst the coldness
and mannerism of the higher classes of England. In
Grace, too, this simplicity was chastened by perfect
decorum and
retenue
of deportment; the
exuberance
of the new school of manners not having helped
to impair the dignity of her character, or to weaken
the charm of diffidence. She was less finished in her
manners than Eve, certainly; a circumstance, perhaps,
that induced Sir George Templemore to fancy her
a shade more simple, but she was never unfeminine
or unladylike; and the term vulgar, in despite of all
the capricious and arbitrary rules of fashion, under
no circumstances, could ever be applied to Grace
Van Cortlandt. In this respect, nature seemed to
have aided her; for had not her associations raised
her above such an imputation, no one could believe
that she would be obnoxious to the charge, had her
lot in life been cast even many degrees lower than it
actually was.
It is well known that, after a sufficient similarity
Vol. I.  5
has been created by education to prevent any violent
shocks to our habits or principles, we most affect
those whose characters and dispositions the least
resemble our own. This was probably one of the
reasons why Sir George Templemore, who, for some
time, had been well assured of the hopelessness of his
suit with Eve, began to regard her scarcely less
lovely cousin, with an interest of a novel and lively
nature. Quick-sighted and deeply interested in Grace's
happiness, Miss Effingham had already detected this
change in the young baronet's inclinations, and though
sincerely rejoiced on her own account, she did not
observe it without concern; for she understood better
than most of her countrywomen, the great hazards
of destroying her peace of mind, that are incurred by
transplanting an American woman into the more
artificial
circles of the old world.
I shall rely on your kind offices, in particular,
Miss Van Cortlandt, to reconcile Mrs. Jarvis and
Mrs. Hawker to the liberty I am about to take, cried
Sir George, as Grace burst upon them in the library,
in a blaze of beauty that, in her case, was aided by
her attire; and cold-hearted and unchristian-like
women they must be, indeed, to resist such a
mediator
!
Grace was unaccustomed to adulation of this sort;
for though the baronet spoke gaily, and like one half
trifling, his look of admiration was too honest to
escape the intuitive perception of woman. She
blushed deeply, and then recovering herself instantly,
said with a
naivet
that had a thousand charms with
her listener
I do not see why Miss Effingham and myself
should hesitate about introducing you at either place.
Mrs. Hawker is a relative and an intimatean
intimate
of mine, at leastand as for poor Mrs. Jarvis,
she is the daughter of an old neighbour, and will be
too glad to see us, to raise objections. I fancy any
one of a certain Grace hesitated and laughed.
Any one of a certain? said Sir George,
inquiringly.
Any one from this house, resumed the young lady,
correcting the intended expression, will be welcome
in Spring street.
Pure, native aristocracy! exclaimed the baronet,
with an air of affected triumph. This you see, Mr.
John Effingham, is in aid of my argument.
I am quite of your opinion, returned the
gentleman
addressedas much native aristocracy as you
please, but no hereditary.
The entrance of Eve and Mademoiselle Viefville
interrupted this pleasantry, and the carriages being
just then announced, John Effingham went in quest of
Captain Truck, who was in the drawing-room with
Mr. Effingham and Aristabulus.
I have left Ned to discuss trespass suits and leases
with his land-agent, said John Effingham, as he
followed
Eve to the street-door. By ten o'clock, they
will have taxed a pretty bill of costs between them!
Mademoiselle Viefville followed John Effingham;
Grace came next, and Sir George Templemore and
the Captain brought up the rear. Grace wondered the
young baronet did not offer her his arm, for she had
been accustomed to receive this attention from the
other sex, in a hundred situations in which it was rather
an incumbrance than a service; while on the other
hand, Sir George himself would have hesitated about
offering such assistance, as an act of uncalled-for
familiarity
.
Miss Van Cortlandt, being much in society, kept a
chariot for her own use, and the three ladies took their
seats in it, while the gentlemen took possession of Mr.
Effingham's coach. The order was given to drive to
Spring street, and the whole party proceeded.
The acquaintance between the Effinghams and Mr.
Jarvis had arisen from the fact of their having been
near, and, in a certain sense, sociable neighbours in the
country. Their town associations, however, were as
distinct as if they dwelt in different hemispheres, with
the exception of an occasional morning call, and, now
and then, a family dinner given by Mr. Effingham.
Such had been the nature of the intercourse previously
to the family of the latter's having gone abroad, and
there were symptoms of its being renewed on the same
quiet and friendly footing as formerly. But no two
beings
could be less alike, in certain essentials, than Mr.
Jarvis and his wife. The former was a plain
painstaking
,
sensible man of business, while the latter had
an itching desire to figure in the world of fashion.
The first was perfectly aware that Mr. Effingham, in
education, habits, associations and manners, was, at
least, of a class entirely distinct from his own; and
without troubling himself to analyze causes, and
without
a feeling of envy, or unkindness of any sort, while
totally exempt from any undue deference or unmanly
cringing, he quietly submitted to let things take their
course. His wife expressed her surprise that any one
in New-York should presume to be
better
than
themselves
;
and the remark gave rise to the following short
conversation, on the very morning of the day she gave
the party, to which we are now conducting the reader.
How do you know, my dear, that any one does
think himself our
better?
demanded the husband.
Why do they not all visit us then!
Why do you not visit everybody yourself? A
pretty household we should have, if you did nothing
but visit every one who lives even in this street!
You surely would not have
me
visiting the
grocers'
wives at the corners, and all the other rubbish of
the neighbourhood. What I mean is that all the
people
of a certain sort ought to visit all the other people
of a certain sort, in the same town.
You surely will make an exception, at least on
account of numbers. I saw number three thousand
six hundred and fifty this very day on a cart, and if
the wives of all these carmen should visit one another,
each would have to make ten visits daily in order to
get through with the list in a twelvemonth.
I have always bad luck in making you
comprehend
these things, Mr. Jarvis.
I am afraid, my dear, it is because you do not very
clearly comprehend them yourself. You first say that
everybody ought to visit everybody, and then you insist
on it,
you
will visit none but those you think good
enough to be visited by Mrs. Jared Jarvis.
What I mean is, that no one in New-York has a
right to think himself, or herself, better than ourselves.
Better?In what sense better?
In such a sense as to induce them to think
themselves
too good to visit us.
That may be your opinion, my dear, but others
may judge differently. You clearly think yourself too
good to visit Mrs. Onion, the grocer's wife, who is a
capital woman in her way; and how do we know that
certain people may not fancy we are not quite refined
enough for them? Refinement is a positive thing, Mrs.
Jarvis, and one that has much more influence on the
pleasures of association than money. We may want
a hundred little perfections that escape our ignorance,
and which those who are trained to such matters deem
essentials.
I never met with a man of so little social spirit,
Mr. Jarvis! Really, you are quite unsuited to be a
citizen of a republican country.
Republican!I do not really see what republican
has to do with the question. In the first place, it is a
droll word for
you
to use in this sense at least; for,
taking your own meaning of the term, you are as
anti-republican
as any woman I know. But a republic does
not necessarily infer equality of condition, or even
equality of rights,it meaning merely the substitution
5 *
of the right of the commonwealth for the right of a
prince. Had you said a democracy there would have
been some plausibility in using the word, though even
then its application would have been illogical. If I am
a freeman and a democrat, I hope I have the justice
to allow others to be just as free and democratic as I
am myself.
And who wishes the contrary?all I ask is a claim
to be considered a fit associate for anybody in this
countryin these United States of America.
I would quit these United States of America next
week, if I thought there existed any necessity for such
an intolerable state of things.
Mr. Jarvis!and you, too, one of the Committee
of Tammany Hall!
Yes, Mrs. Jarvis, and I one of the Committee of
Tammany Hall! What, do you think I want the three
thousand six hundred and fifty carmen running in and
out of my house, with their tobacco saliva and pipes,
all day long?
Who is thinking of your carmen and grocers!I
speak now only of genteel people.
In other words, my dear, you are thinking only
of those whom you fancy to have the advantage of
you, and keep those who think of you in the same
way, quite out of sight. This is not my democracy
and freedom. I believe that it requires two people to
make a bargain; and although I may consent to dine
with A, if A will not consent to dine with
me, there is an end of the matter.
Now, you have come to a case in point. You
often dined with Mr. Effingham before he went abroad,
and yet you would never allow me to ask Mr.
Effingham
to dine with us. That is what I call meanness.
It might be so, indeed, if it were done to save my
money. I dined with Mr. Effingham because I like
him; because he was an old neighbour; because he
asked me, and because I found a pleasure in the quiet
elegance of his table and society; and I did not ask
him to dine with me, because I was satisfied he would
be better pleased with such a tacit acknowledgement
of his superiority in this respect, than by any bustling
and ungraceful efforts to pay him in kind. Edward
Effingham has dinners enough, without keeping a
debtor and credit account with his guests, which is
rather too New-Yorkish, even for me.
Bustling and ungraceful! repeated Mrs. Jarvis,
bitterly; I do not know that you are at all more
bustling and ungraceful than Mr. Effingham himself.
No, my dear, I am a quiet, unpretending man, like
the great majority of my countrymen, thank God.
Then why talk of these sorts of differences in a
country in which the law establishes none?
For precisely the reason that I talk of the river
at the foot of this street, or because there is a river.
A thing may exist without there being a law for it.
There is no law for building this house, and yet it is
built. There is no law for making Dr. Verse a better
preacher than Dr. Prolix, and yet he is a much better
preacher; neither is there any law for making Mr.
Effingham a more finished gentleman than I happen to
be, and yet I am not fool enough to deny the fact. In
the way of making out a bill of parcels, I will not
turn my back to him, I can promise you.
All this strikes me as being very spiritless, and as
particularly anti-republican, said Mrs. Jarvis, rising
to quit the room; and if the Effinghams do not come
this evening, I shall not enter their house this winter.
I am sure they have no right to pretend to be our
betters
,
and I feel no disposition to admit the impudent
claim.
Before you go, Jane, let me say a parting word,
rejoined the husband, looking for his hat, which is
just this. If you wish the world to believe you the
equal of any one, no matter whom, do not be always
talking about it, lest they see you distrust the fact
yourself. A positive thing will surely be seen, and
they who have the highest claims are the least disposed
to be always pressing them on the attention of the
world. An outrage may certainly be done those
social
rights which have been established by common
consent, and then it may be proper to resent it; but
beware betraying a consciousness of your own
inferiority
,
by letting every one see you are jealous of
your station. Now, kiss me; here is the money to pay
for your finery this evening, and let me see you as
happy to receive Mrs. Jewett from Albion Place, as
you would be to receive Mrs. Hawker herself.
Mrs. Hawker! cried the wife, with a toss of her
head, I would not cross the street to invite Mrs.
Hawker and all her clan. Which was very true, as
Mrs. Jarvis was thoroughly convinced the trouble
would be unavailing, the lady in question being as near
the head of fashion in New-York, as it was possible
to be in a town that, in a moral sense, resembles an
encampment, quite as much as it resembles a
permanent
and a long-existing capital.
Notwithstanding a great deal of management on the
part of Mrs. Jarvis to get showy personages to attend
her entertainment, the simple elegance of the two
carriages
that bore the Effingham party, threw all the
other equipages into the shade. The arrival, indeed,
was deemed a matter of so much moment, that
intelligence
was conveyed to the lady, who was still at her
post in the inner drawing-room, of the arrival of a
party altogether superior to any thing that had yet
appeared in her rooms. It is true, this was not
expressed
in words, but it was made sufficiently obvious
by the breathless haste and the air of importance of
Mrs. Jarvis' sister, who had received the news from a
servant, and who communicated it
propri person
to
the mistress of the house.
The simple, useful, graceful, almost indispensable
usage of announcing at the door, indispensable to those
who receive much, and where there is the risk of
meeting people known to us by name and not in
person
,
is but little practised in America. Mrs. Jarvis
would have shrunk from such an innovation, had she
known that elsewhere the custom prevailed, but she
was in happy ignorance on this point, as on many
others that were more essential to the much-coveted
social
clat
at which she aimed. When Mademoiselle
Viefville appeared, therefore, walking unsupported, as
if she were out of leading-strings, followed by Eve
and Grace and the gentlemen of their party, she at
first supposed there was some mistake, and that her
visiters had got into the wrong house; there being an
opposition party in the neighbourhood.
What brazen people! whispered Mrs. Abijah
Gross, who having removed from an interior
New-England
village, fully two years previously, fancied
herself
au fait
of all the niceties of breeding and social
tact. There are positively two young ladies actually
walking about without gentlemen!
But it was not in the power of Mrs. Abijah Gross,
with her audible whisper and obvious sneer and laugh,
to put down two such lovely creatures as Eve and her
cousin. The simple elegance of their attire, the
indescribable
air of polish, particularly in the former, and
the surpassing beauty and modesty of mien of both,
effectually silenced criticism, after this solitary
outbreaking
of vulgarity. Mrs. Jarvis recognized Eve
and John Effingham, and her hurried compliments and
obvious delight proclaimed to all near her, the
importance
she attached to their visit. Mademoiselle Viefville
she had not recollected in her present dress, and even
she was covered with expressions of delight and
satisfaction
.
I wish particularly to present to you a friend that
we all prize exceedingly, said Eve, as soon as there
was an opportunity of speaking. This is Captain
Truck, the gentleman who commands the Montauk,
the ship of which you have heard so much. Ah! Mr.
Jarvis, offering a hand to him with sincere cordiality,
for Eve had known him from childhood, and always
sincerely respected him
you
will receive my friend
with a cordial welcome, I am certain.
She then explained to Mr. Jarvis who the honest
captain was, when the former, first paying the proper
respect to his other guests, led the old sailor aside, and
began an earnest conversation on the subject of the
recent passage.
John Effingham presented the baronet, whom Mrs.
Jarvis, out of pure ignorance of his rank in his own
country, received with perfect propriety and
self-respect
.
We have very few people of note in town at
present
,
I believe, said Mrs. Jarvis to John Effingham.
A great traveller, a most interesting man, is the only
person of that sort I could obtain for this evening, and
I shall have great pleasure in introducing you. He is
there in that crowd, for he is in the greatest possible
demand; he has seen so much.Mrs. Snow, with your
permissionreally the ladies are thronging about him
as if he were a Pawnee,have the goodness to step a
little this way, Mr. EffinghamMiss EffinghamMrs.
Snow, just touch his arm and let him know I wish to
introduce a couple of friends.Mr. Dodge, Mr. John
Effingham, Miss Effingham, Miss Van Cortlandt. I
hope you may succeed in getting him a little to
yourselves
,
ladies, for he can tell you all about Europe
saw the king of France riding out to Nully, and has a
prodigious knowledge of things on the other side of the
water.
It required a good deal of Eve's habitual
self-command
to prevent a smile, but she had the tact and
discretion
to receive Steadfast as an utter stranger. John
Effingham bowed as haughtily as man can bow, and
then it was whispered that he and Mr. Dodge were
rival travellers. The distance of the former, coupled
with an expression of countenance that did not invite
familiarity, drove nearly all the company over to the
side of Steadfast, who, it was soon settled, had seen
much the most of the world, understood society the
best, and had moreover travelled as far as Timbuctoo
in Africa. The
clientle
of Mr. Dodge increased
rapidly, as these reports spread in the rooms, and those
who had not read the delightful letters published in
the Active Inquirer, furiously envied those who had
enjoyed that high advantage.
It is Mr. Dodge, the great traveller, said one
young lady, who had extricated herself from the crowd
around the `lion,' and taken a station near Eve and
Grace, and who, moreover, was a `blue' in her own
set; his beautiful and accurate descriptions have
attracted great attention in England, and it is said they
have actually been republished!
Have you read them, Miss Brackett?
Not the letters themselves, absolutely; but all the
remarks on them in the last week's Hebdomad. Most
delightful letters, judging from those remarks; full of
nature and point, and singularly accurate in all their
facts. In this respect they are invaluable, travellers
do fall into such extraordinary errors!
I hope, ma'am, said John Effingham, gravely,
that the gentleman has avoided the capital mistake
of commenting on things that actually exist.
Comments
on its facts are generally esteemed by the people
of a country, impertinent and unjust; and your true
way to succeed, is to treat as freely as possible its
imaginary peculiarities.
Miss Brackett had nothing to answer to this
observation
,
the Hebdomad having, among its other
profundities
,
never seen proper to touch on the subject.
She went on praising the Letters, however, not one of
which had she read, or would she read; for this young
lady had contrived to gain a high reputation in her
own
coteric
for taste and knowledge in books, by
merely skimming the strictures of those who do not
even skim the works they pretend to analyze.
Eve had never before been in so close contact with
so much flippant ignorance, and she could not but
wonder
at seeing a man like her kinsman overlooked, in
order that a man like Mr. Dodge should be preferred.
All this gave John Effingham himself no concern, but
retiring a little from the crowd, he entered into a short
conversation with the young baronet.
I should like to know your real opinions of this
set, he said; not that I plead guilty to the childish
sensibility that is so common in all provincial circles
to the judgments of strangers, but with a view to aid
you in forming a just estimate of the real state of the
country.
As I know the precise connexion between you and
our host, there can be no objection to giving a
perfectly
frank reply. The women strike me as being
singularly delicate and pretty; well dressed, too, I
might add; but, while there is a great air of decency,
there is very little high finish; and what strikes me as
being quite odd, under such circumstances, scarcely
any downright vulgarity, or coarseness.
A Daniel come to judgment! One who had passed
a life here, would not have come so near the truth,
simply because he would not have observed
peculiarities
,
that require the means of comparison to be
detected. You are a little too indulgent in saying
there is no downright vulgarity; for some there is;
though surprisingly little for the circumstances. But
of the coarseness that would be so prominent
elsewhere
,
there is hardly any. True, so great is the
equality in all things, in this country, so direct the
tendency to this respectable mediocrity, that what you
now see here, to-night, may be seen in almost every
village in the land, with a few immaterial exceptions
in the way of furniture and other city appliances, and
not much even in these.
Certainly, as a mediocrity, this is respectable,
though a fastidious taste might see a multitude of
faults.
I shall not say that the taste would be merely
fastidious
,
for much is wanting that would add to the
grace and beauty of society, while much that is
wanting would be missed only by the
over-sophisticated
.
Those young men, who are sniggering over
some bad joke in the corner, for instance, are
positively
vulgar, as is that young lady who is indulging
in practical coquetry; but, on the whole, there is little
of this; and, even our hostess, a silly woman, devoured
with the desire of being what neither her social
position
,
education, habits nor notions fit her to be, is less
obtrusive, bustling, and offensive, than a similar person,
elsewhere.
I am quite of your way of thinking, and intended
to ask you to account for it.
The Americans are an imitative people of
necessity
,
and they are apt at this part of imitation, in
particular
.
Then they are less artificial in all their
practices
,
than older and more sophisticated nations; and
this company has got that essential part of good
breeding, simplicity, as it were
per force
. A step
higher in the social scale, you will see less of it; for
greater daring and bad models lead to blunders in
matters that require to be exceedingly well done, if
done at all. The faults here would be more apparent,
by an approach near enough to get into the tone of
mind, the forms of speech, and the attempts at wit.
Which I think we shall escape to-night, as I see
the ladies are already making their apologies and
taking leave. We must defer this investigation to
another time.
It may be indefinitely postponed, as it would
scarcely reward the trouble of an inquiry.
The gentlemen now approached Mrs. Jarvis, paid
their parting compliments, hunted up Captain Truck,
Vol. I.  6
whom they tore by violence from the good-natured
hospitality of the master of the house, and then saw
the ladies into their carriage. As they drove off, the
worthy mariner protested that Mr. Jarvis was one of
the honestest men he had ever met, and announced
that he intended giving him a dinner on board the
Montauk, the very next day.
The dwelling of Mrs. Hawker was in Hudson
Square; or in a portion of the city that the lovers of
the grandiose are endeavouring to call St. John's
Park; for it is rather an amusing peculiarity among a
certain portion of the emigrants who have flocked into
the Middle States, within the last thirty years, that
they are not satisfied with permitting any family, or
thing, to possess the name it originally enjoyed, if there
exists the least opportunity to change it. There was
but a carriage or two before the door, though the
strong lights in the house showed that company had
collected.
Mrs. Hawker is the widow and the daughter of
men of long established New-York families; she is
childless, affluent, and universally respected where
known, for her breeding, benevolence, good sense,
and heart, said John Effingham, while the party was
driving from one house to the other. Were you to
go into most of the sets of this town, and mention
Mrs. Hawker's name, not one person in ten would
know there is such a being in their vicinity; the
ple
mle
of a migratory population keeping persons of her
character and condition in life, quite out of view.
The very persons who will prattle by the hour, of the
establishments of Mrs. Peleg Pond, and Mrs. Jonah
Twist, and Mrs. Abiram Wattles, people who first
appeared on this island five or six years since, and,
who having accumulated what to them are relatively
large fortunes, have launched out into vulgar and
uninstructed finery, would look with surprise at
hearing
Mrs. Hawker mentioned as one having any claims
to social distinction. Her historical names are
over-shadowed
in their minds by the parochial glories of
certain local prodigies in the townships whence they
emigrated; her manners would puzzle the
comprehension
of people whose imitation has not gone beyond
the surface, and her polished and simple mind would
find little sympathy among a class who seldom rise
above a common-place sentiment without getting upon
stilts.
Mrs. Hawker, then, is a lady, observed Sir George
Templemore.
Mrs. Hawker is a lady, in every sense of the word;
by position, education, manners, association, mind,
fortune
and birth. I do not know that we ever had more
of her class than exist to-day, but certainly we once
had them more prominent in society.
I suppose, sir, said Captain Truck, that this Mrs.
Hawker is of what is called the old school?
Of a very ancient school, and one that is likely to
continue, though it may not be generally attended.
I am afraid, Mr. John Effingham, that I shall be
like a fish out of water in such a house. I can get
along very well with your Mrs. Jarvis, and with the
dear young lady in the other carriage; but the sort of
woman you have described, will be apt to jam a plain
mariner like myself. What in nature should I do, now,
if she should ask me to dance a minuet?
Dance it agreeably to the laws of nature, returned
John Effingham, as the carriages stopped.
A respectable, quiet, and an aged black admitted the
party, though even he did not announce the visiters,
while he held the door of the drawing-room open for
them, with respectful attention. Mrs. Hawker arose,
and advanced to meet Eve and her companions, and,
though she kissed the cousins affectionately, her
reception
of Mademoiselle Viefville was so simply polite as
to convince the latter she was valued on account of
her services. John Effingham, who was ten or fifteen
years the junior of the old lady, gallantly kissed her
hand, when he presented his two male companions.
After paying the proper attention to the greatest
stranger
,
Mrs. Hawker turned to Captain Truck and said
This, then, is the gentleman to whose skill and
courage you all owe so much
we
all owe so much, I
might better have saidthe commander of the
Montauk
?
I have the honour of commanding that vessel,
ma'am, returned Captain Truck, who was singularly
awed by the dignified simplicity of his hostess, although
her quiet, natural, and yet finished manner, which
extended
even to the intonation of the voice, and the
smallest movement, were as unlike what he had
expected
as possible; and with such passengers as she
had last voyage I can only say, it is a pity that she is
not better off for one to take care of her.
Your passengers give a different account of the
matter, but, in order that I may judge impartially, do
me the favour to take this chair, and let me learn a few
of the particulars from yourself.
Observing that Sir George Templemore had followed
Eve to the other side of the room, Mrs. Hawker now
resumed her seat, and, without neglecting any to
attend
to one in particular, or attending to one in a way
to make him feel oppressed, she contrived, in a few
minutes, to make the captain forget all about the minuet,
and to feel much more at his ease than would have
been the case with Mrs. Jarvis, in a month's
intercourse
.
In the mean time, Eve had crossed the room to join
a lady whose smile invited her to her side. This was
a young, slightly framed female, of a pleasing
countenance
,
but who would not have been particularly
distinguished
,
in such a place, for personal charms. Still,
her smile was sweet, her eyes were soft, and the
expression
of her face was what might almost be called
illuminated. As Sir George Templemore followed her,
Eve mentioned his name to her acquaintance, whom
she addressed as Mrs. Bloomfield.
You are bent on perpetrating further gaiety
to-night
,
said the latter, glancing at the ball-dresses of
the two cousins; are you in the colours of the
Houston
faction, or in those of the Peabody.
Not in pea-green, certainly, returned Eve,
laughing
as
you may see; but in simple white.
You intend then to be `led a measure' at Mrs.
Houston's. It were more suitable than among the
other faction.
Is fashion, then, faction, in New-York? inquired
Sir George.
Fractions would be a better word, perhaps. But
we have parties in almost every thing, in America; in
politics, religion, temperance, speculations, and taste;
why not in fashion?
I fear we are not quite independent enough to form
parties on such a subject, said Eve.
Perfectly well said, Miss Effingham; one must
think a little originally, let it be ever so falsely, in order
to get up a fashion. I fear we shall have to admit our
insignificance on this point. You are a late arrival,
Sir George Templemore?
As lately as the commencement of this month; I
had the honour of being a fellow-passenger with Mr.
Effingham and his family.
In which voyage you suffered shipwreck, captivity,
and famine, if half we hear be true.
Report has a little magnified our risks; we
encountered
some serious dangers, but nothing
amounting
to the sufferings you have mentioned.
Being a married woman, and having passed the
crisis in which deception is not practised, I expect to
hear truth again, said Mrs. Bloomfield, smiling. I
trust, however, you underwent enough to qualify you
all for heroes and heroines, and shall content myself
with knowing that you are here, safe and happyif,
6 *
she added, looking inquiringly at Eve, one who has
been educated abroad
can
be happy at home.
One educated abroad
may
be happy at home,
though possibly not in the modes most practised by the
world, said Eve, firmly.
Without an opera, without a court, almost without
society!
An opera would be desirable, I confess; of courts
I know nothing, unmarried females being cyphers in
Europe; and I hope better things than to think I shall
be without society.
Unmarried females are considered cyphers too,
here, provided there be enough of them with a good
respectable digit at their head. I assure you no one
quarrels with the cyphers under such circumstances.
I think, Sir George Templemore, a town like this must
be something of a paradox to you.
Might I venture to inquire the reason for this
opinion!
Merely because it is neither one thing nor
another
.
Not a capital, nor yet merely a provincial place;
with something more than commerce in its bosom, and
yet with that something hidden under a bushel. A
good deal more than Liverpool, and a good deal less
than London. Better even than Edinburgh, in many
respects, and worse than Wapping, in others.
You have been abroad, Mrs. Bloomfield?
Not a foot out of my own country; scarcely a foot
out of my own state. I have been at Lake George,
the Falls, and the Mountain House; and, as one does
not travel in a balloon, I saw some of the intermediate
places. As for all else, I am obliged to go by report.
It is a pity Mrs. Bloomfield was not with us, this
evening, at Mrs. Jarvis's, said Eve, laughing. She
might then have increased her knowledge, by listening
to a few cantos from the epic of Mr. Dodge.
I have glanced at some of that author's wisdom,
returned Mrs. Bloomfield, but I soon found it was
learning backwards. There is a never-failing rule, by
which it is easy to arrive at a traveller's worth, in a
negative sense, at least.
That is a rule which may be worth knowing,
said the baronet, as it would save much useless wear
of the eyes.
When one betrays a profound ignorance of his
own country, it is a fair presumption that he cannot be
very acute in his observation of strangers. Mr. Dodge
is one of these writers, and a single letter fully
satisfied
my curiosity. I fear, Miss Effingham, very
inferior
wares, in the way of manners, have been lately
imported, in large quantities, into this country, as
having the Tower mark on them.
Eve laughed, but declared that Sir George
Templemore
was better qualified than herself to answer
such a question.
We are said to be a people of facts, rather than
a people of theories, continued Mrs. Bloomfield,
without attending to the reference of the young lady,
and any coin that offers passes, until another that is
better, arrives. It is a singular, but a very general
mistake, I believe, of the people of this country, in
supposing that they can exist under the present rgime,
when others would fail, because their opinions keep
even pace with, or precede the actual condition of
society
;
whereas, those who have thought and observed
most on such subjects, agree in thinking the very
reverse
to be the case.
This would be a curious condition for a
government
so purely conventional, observed Sir George,
with interest, and it certainly is entirely opposed to
the state of things all over Europe.
It is so, and yet there is no great mystery in it,
after all. Accident has liberated us from trammels
that still fetter you. We are like a vehicle on the top
of a hill, which, the moment it is pushed beyond the
point of resistance, rolls down of itself, without the aid
of horses. One may follow with the team, and hook
on when it gets to the bottom, but there is no such
thing as keeping company with it until it arrives
there.
You will allow, then, that there is a bottom?
There is a bottom to every thingto good and
bad; happiness and misery; hope, fear, faith and
charity; even to a woman's mind, which I have
sometimes
fancied the most bottomless thing in nature.
There may, therefore, well be a bottom even to the
institutions of America.
Sir George listened with the interest with which an
Englishman of his class always endeavours to catch a
concession that he fancies is about to favour his own
political predilections, and he felt encouraged to push
the subject further.
And you think the political machine is rolling
downwards towards this bottom? he said, with an
interest
in the answer that, living in the quiet and
forgetfulness
of his own home, he would have laughed at
himself for entertaining. But our sensibilities become
quickened by collision, and opposition is known even
to create love.
Mrs. Bloomfield was quick-witted, intelligent,
cultivated
and shrewd. She saw the motive at a glance,
and, notwithstanding she saw and felt all its abuses,
strongly attached to the governing principle of her
country's social organization, as is almost universally
the case with the strongest minds and most generous
hearts of the nation, she was not disposed to let a
stranger carry away a false impression of her
sentiments
on such a point.
Did you ever study logic, Sir George
Templemore
?
she asked, archly.
A little, though not enough I fear to influence my
mode of reasoning, or even to leave me familiar with
the terms.
Oh! I am not about to assail you with
sequiturs
and
non sequiturs,
dialectics and all the mysteries of
Denk-Lehre,
but simply to remind you there is such a
thing as the bottom of a subject. When I tell you we
are flying towards the bottom of our institutions, it is
in the intellectual sense, and not, as you have
erroneously
imagined, in an unintellectual sense. I mean
that we are getting to understand them, which, I fear,
we did not absolutely do at the commencement of the
`experiment.'
But I think you will admit, that as the civilization
of the country advances, some material changes must
occur; your people cannot always remain stationary;
they must either go backwards or forward.
Up or down, if you will allow me to correct your
phraseology. The civilization of the country, in one
sense at least, is retrogressive, and the people, as they
cannot go `up,' betray a disposition to go `down.'
You deal in enigmas, and I am afraid to think I
understand you.
I mean, merely, that gallowses are fast
disappearing
,
and that the people
le peuple
you will understand
begin to accept money. In both particulars, I think
there is a sensible change for the worse, within my
own recollection.
Mrs. Bloomfield then changed her manner, and from
using that light-hearted gaiety with which she often
rendered her conversation
piquante
, and even
occasionally
brilliant, she became more grave and explicit.
The subject soon turned to that of punishments, and
few men could have reasoned more sensibly, justly or
forcibly, on such a subject, than this slight and
fragile-looking
young woman. Without the least pedantry,
with a beauty of language that the other sex seldom
attains, and with a delicacy of discrimination, and a
sentiment that were strictly feminine, she rendered a
theme interesting, that, however important in itself, is
forbidding, veiling all its odious and revolting features
in the refinement and finesse of her own polished
mind.
Eve could have listened all night, and, at every
syllable
that fell from the lips of her friend, she felt a glow
of triumph; for she was proud of letting an intelligent
foreigner see that America did contain women worthy
to be ranked with the best of other countries, a
circumstance
that they who merely frequented what is
called the world, she thought might be reasonably
justified
in distrusting. In one respect, she even fancied
Mrs. Bloomfield's knowledge and cleverness superior
to those which she had so often admired in her own
sex abroad. It was untrammelled, equally by the
prejudices
incident to a factitious condition of society, or
by their reaction; two circumstances that often
obscured
the sense and candour of those to whom she had
so often listened with pleasure in other countries. The
singularly feminine tone, too, of all that Mrs.
Bloomfield
said or thought, while it lacked nothing in strength,
added to the charm of her conversation, and increased
the pleasure of those that listened.
Is the circle large to which Mrs. Hawker and her
friends belong? asked Sir George, as he assisted Eve
and Grace to cloak, when they had taken leave. A
town which can boast of half-a-dozen such houses need
not accuse itself of wanting society.
Ah! there is but one Mrs. Hawker in New-York,
answered Grace, and not many Mrs. Bloomfields in
the world. It would be too much to say, we have
even half-a-dozen such houses.
Have you not been struck with the admirable tone
of this drawing-room, half whispered Eve. It may
want a little of that lofty ease that one sees among the
better portion of the old
Princesses et Duchesses
, which
is a relic of a school that, it is to be feared, is going
out; but in its place there is a winning nature, with as
much dignity as is necessary, and a truth that gives
us confidence in the sincerity of those around us.
Upon my word, I think Mrs. Hawker quite fit for
a Duchess.
You mean a
Duchesse
, said Eve, and yet she is
without the manner that we understand by such a
word. Mrs. Hawker is a lady, and there can be no
higher term.
She is a delightful old woman, cried John
Effingham
,
and if twenty years younger and disposed to
change her condition, I should really be afraid to enter
the house.
My dear sir, put in the captain, I will make her
Mrs. Truck to-morrow, and say nothing of years, if
she could be content to take up with such an offer.
Why, sir, she is no woman, but a saint in petticoats!
I felt the whole time as if talking to my own mother,
and as for ships, she knows more about them than I
do!
The whole party laughed at the strength of the
captain's
admiration, and getting into the carriages
proceeded
to the last of the houses they intended visiting
that night.
CHAPTER V.
So turns she every man the wrong side out;
And never gives to truth and virtue, that
Which simpleness and merit purchaseth.
Much ado about Nothing
.
Mrs. Houston
was what is termed a fashionable
woman in New-York. She, too, was of a family of
local note, though of one much less elevated in the
olden time than that of Mrs. Hawker. Still her claims
were admitted by the most fastidious on such points,
for a few do remain who think descent indisputable to
gentility; and as her means were ample, and her tastes
perhaps superior to those of most around her, she kept
what was thought a house of better tone than
common
,
even in the highest circle. Eve had but a slight
acquaintance with her; but in Grace's eyes, Mrs.
Houston's
was the place of all others that she thought might
make a favourable impression on her cousin. Her
wish that this should prove to be the case was so
strong, that, as they drove towards the door, she could
not forbear from making an attempt to prepare Eve
for what she was to meet.
Although Mrs. Houston has a very large house for
New-York, and lives in a uniform style, you are not
to expect ante-chambers, and vast suites of rooms,
Eve, said Grace; such as you have been
accustomed
to see abroad.
It is not necessary, my dear cousin, to enter a
house of four or five windows in front, to see it is not
a house of twenty or thirty. I should be very
unreasonable
to expect an Italian palazzo, or a Parisian
hotel, in this good town.
We are not old enough for that yet, Eve; a
hundred
years hence, Mademoiselle Viefville, such things
may exist here.
Bien sr. C'est naturel
.
A hundred years hence, as the world tends, Grace,
they are not likely to exist any where, except as
taverns, or hospitals, or manufactories. But what
have we to do, coz, with a century ahead of us? young
as we both are, we cannot hope to live that time.
Grace would have been puzzled to account
satisfactorily
to herself, for the strong desire she felt that
neither
of her companions should expect to see such a
house as their senses so plainly told them did not
exist in the place; but her foot moved in the bottom
of the carriage, for she was not half satisfied with her
cousin's answer.
All I mean, Eve, she said, after a pause, is, that
one ought not to expect in a town as new as this, the
improvements that one sees in an older state of
society.
And have Mademoiselle Viefville, or I, ever been
so weak as to suppose that New-York is Paris, or
Rome, or Vienna?
Grace was still less satisfied, for, unknown to
herself
,
she
had
hoped that Mrs. Houston's ball might be
quite equal to a ball in either of those ancient capitals;
and she was now vexed that her cousin considered
it so much a matter of course that it should not be.
But there was no time for explanations, as the carriage
now stopped.
The noise, confusion, calling out, swearing, and rude
clamour before the house of Mrs. Houston, said little for
the out-door part of the arrangements. Coachmen are
nowhere a particularly silent and civil class; but the
uncouth European peasants, who have been preferred
to the honours of the whip in New-York, to the usual
feelings of competition and contention, added that
particular
feature of humility which is known to
distinguish
the beggar on horseback. The imposing
equipages of our party, however, had that effect on
most of these rude brawlers, which a display of wealth
is known to produce on the vulgar-minded; and the
ladies got into the house, through a lane of coachmen,
by yielding a little to a
chevau de frise
of whips,
without
any serious calamity.
One hardly knows which is the most terrific, said
Eve, involuntarily, as soon as the door closed on them
the noise within, or the noise without!
This was spoken rapidly, and in French, to
Mademoiselle
Viefville, but Grace heard and understood it,
and for the first time in her life, she perceived that
Mrs. Houston's company was not composed of
nightingales
.
The surprise is that the discovery should
have come so late.
I am delighted at having got into this house, said
Sir George, who, having thrown his cloak to his own
servant, stood with the two other gentlemen waiting
the descent of the ladies from the upper room, where
Vol. I.7
the bad arrangements of the house compelled them to
uncloak and to put aside their shawls, as I am told it
is the best house in town to see the other sex.
To
hear them
, would be nearer the truth, perhaps,
returned John Effingham. As for pretty women, one
can hardly go amiss in New-York; and your ears
now tell you, that they do not come into the world to
be seen only.
The baronet smiled, but he was too well bred to
contradict or to assent. Mademoiselle Viefville,
unconscious
that she was violating the proprieties, walked
into the rooms by herself, as soon as she descended,
followed by Eve; but Grace shrank to the side of
John Effingham, whose arm she took as a step
necessary
even to decorum.
Mrs. Houston received her guests with ease and
dignity. She was one of those females that the
American
world calls gay; in other words, she opened her
own house to a very promiscuous society, ten or a
dozen times in a winter, and accepted the greater part
of the invitations she got to other people's. Still, in
most other countries, as a fashionable woman, she
would have been esteemed a model of devotion to the
duties of a wife and a mother, for she paid a personal
attention to her household, and had actually taught all
her children the Lord's prayer, the creed, and the ten
commandments. She attended church twice every
Sunday, and only staid at home from the evening
lectures
,
that the domestics might have the opportunity
of going (which, by the way, they never did) in her
stead. Feminine, well-mannered, rich, pretty, of a
very positive social condition, and naturally
kind-hearted
and disposed to sociability, Mrs. Houston, supported
by an indulgent husband, who so much loved to see
people with the appearance of happiness, that he was
not particular as to the means, had found no difficulty
in rising to the pinnacle of fashion, and of having her
name in the mouths of all those who find it necessary
to talk of somebodies, in order that they may seem to
be somebodies themselves. All this contributed to
Mrs. Houston's happiness, or she fancied it did; and
as every passion is known to increase by indulgence,
she had insensibly gone on in her much-envied career,
until, as has just been said, she reached the summit.
These rooms are very crowded, said Sir George,
glancing his eyes around two very pretty little narrow
drawing-rooms, that were beautifully, not to say richly,
furnished; one wonders that the same contracted
style of building should be so very general, in a town
that increases as rapidly as this, and where fashion has
no fixed abode, and land is so abundant.
Mrs. Bloomfield would tell you, said Eve, that
these houses are types of the social state of the
country
,
in which no one is permitted to occupy more than
his share of ground.
But there are reasonably large dwellings in the
place. Mrs. Hawker has a good house, and your
father's
for instance, would be thought so, too, in London
even; and yet I fancy you will agree with me in
thinking
that a good room is almost unknown in New-York.
I do agree with you, in this particular, certainly,
for to meet with a good room, one must go into the
houses built thirty years ago. We have inherited these
snuggeries, however, England not having much to
boast of in the way of houses.
In the way of town residences, I agree with you
entirely, as a whole, though we have some capital
exceptions
.
Still, I do not think we are quite as compact
as thisdo you not fancy the noise increased in
consequence
of its being so confined?
Eve laughed and shook her head quite positively.
What would it be if fairly let out! she said. But
we will not waste the precious moments, but turn our
eyes about us in quest of the
belles
. Grace, you who
are so much at home, must be our cicerone, and tell
us which are the idols we are to worship.
Dtes moi premierement; que veut dire une belle
New-York?
demanded Mademoiselle Viefville.
Apparemment
,
tout le monde est joli
.
A
belle
, Mademoiselle, returned John Effingham,
is not necessarily beautiful, the qualifications for the
character, being various and a little contradictory.
One may be a
belle
by means of money, a tongue, an
eye, a foot, teeth, a laugh, or any other separate feature,
or grace; though no woman was ever yet a
belle
, I
believe, by means of the head, considered collectively.
But why deal in description, when the thing itself
confronts
us? The young lady standing directly before us,
is a
belle
of the most approved stamp and silvery tone.
Is it not Miss Ring, Grace?
The answer was in the affirmative, and the eyes of
the whole party turned towards the subject of this
remark. The young lady in question was about
twenty, rather tall for an American woman, not
conspicuously
handsome, but like most around her of
delicate features and frame, and with such a
physique
,
as, under proper training, would have rendered her the
beau idal
of feminine delicacy and gentleness. She
had natural spirit, likewise, as appeared in her clear
blue eye, and moreover she had the spirit to be a
belle
.
Around this young creature were clustered no less
than five young men, dressed in the height of the
fashion, all of whom seemed to be entranced with the
words that fell from her lips, and each of whom appeared
anxious to say something clever in return. They all
laughed, the lady most, and sometimes all spoke at
once. Notwithstanding these outbreakings, Miss Ring
did most of the talking, and once or twice, as a young
man would gape after a most exhilarating show of
merriment, and discover an inclination to retreat, she
managed to recall him to his allegiance, by some
remark particularly pertinent to himself, or his feelings.
Qui est cette dame?
asked Mademoiselle Viefville,
very much as one would put a similar question, on
seeing a man enter a church during service with his
hat on.
Elle est demoiselle
, returned Eve.
Quelle horreur!
Nay, nay, Mademoiselle, I shall not allow you to
set up France as immaculate on this point, neither
said John Effingham, looking at the last speaker with
an affected frownA young lady may have a tongue,
and she may even speak to a young gentleman, and
not be guilty of felony; although I will admit that five
tongues are unnecessary, and that five listeners are
more than sufficient, for the wisdom of twenty in
petticoats
.
C'est une horreur!
I dare say Miss Ring would think it a greater
horror to be obliged to pass an evening in a row of
girls, unspoken to, except to be asked to dance, and
admired only in the distance. But let us take seats on
that sofa, and then we may go beyond the pantomime,
and become partakers in the sentiment of the scene.
Grace and Eve were now led off to dance, and the
others did as John Effingham had suggested. In the
eyes of the
belle
and her admirers, they who had
passed thirty were of no account, and our listeners
succeeded in establishing themselves quietly within
ear-shotthis was almost at duelling distance, too,
without at all interrupting the regular action of the
piece. We extract a little of the dialogue, by way of
giving a more dramatic representation of the scene.
Do you think the youngest Miss Danvers
beautiful
?
asked the
belle
, while her eye wandered in quest
of a sixth gentleman to entertain, as the phrase is.
In my opinion, she is absolutely the prettiest female
in Mrs. Houston's rooms this night.
The young men, one and all, protested against this
judgment, and with perfect truth, for Miss Ring was
too original to point out charms that every one could
see.
7 *
They say it will not be a match between her and
Mr. Egbert, after every body has supposed it settled
so long. What is your opinion, Mr. Edson?
This timely question prevented Mr. Edson's retreat,
for he had actually got so far in this important
evolution
,
as to have gaped and turned his back. Recalled,
as it were by the sound of the bugle, Mr. Edson was
compelled to say something, a sore affliction to him
always.
Oh! I'm quite of your way of thinking; they have
certainly courted too long to think of marrying.
I detest long courtships; they must be perfect
antidotes
to love; are they not, Mr. Moreland?
A truant glance of Mr. Moreland's eye was rebuked
by this appeal, and instead of looking for a place of
refuge, he now merely looked sheepish. He, however,
entirely agreed with the young lady, as the surer way
of getting out of the difficulty.
Pray, Mr. Summerfield, how do you like the last
HajjiMiss Eve Effingham? To my notion, she is
prettyish, though by no means as well as her cousin,
Miss Van Cortlandt, who is really rather
good-looking
.
As Eve and Grace were the two most truly lovely
young women in the rooms, this opinion, as well as
the loud tone in which it was given, startled
Mademoiselle
Viefville quite as much as the subjects that
the belle had selected for discussion. She would have
moved, as listening to a conversation that was not
meant for their ears; but John Effingham quietly
assured
her that Miss Ring seldom spoke in company
without intending as many persons as possible to hear
her.
Miss Effingham is very plainly dressed for an only
daughter, continued the young lady, though that
lace of her cousin's is real point! I'll engage it cost
every cent of ten dollars a yard! They are both
engaged
to be married, I hear.
Ciel!
exclaimed Mademoiselle Viefville.
Oh! That is nothing, observed John Effingham,
coolly. Wait a moment, and you'll hear that they
have been privately married these six months, if,
indeed
,
you hear no more.
Of course this is but an idle tale? said Sir George
Templemore with a concern, which, in despite of his
good breeding, compelled him to put a question that,
under other circumstances, would scarcely have been
permissible.
As true as the gospel. But listen to the
bell
, it is
ringing
for the good of the whole parish.
The affair between Miss Effingham and Mr.
Morpeth
,
who knew her abroad, I understand is entirely
broken off; some say the father objected to Mr.
Morpeth's
want of fortune; others that the lady was fickle,
while some accuse the gentleman of the same vice.
Don't you think it shocking to jilt, in either sex, Mr.
Mosely?
The
retiring
Mr. Mosely was drawn again within
the circle, and was obliged to confess that he thought
it was very shocking, in either sex, to jilt.
If I were a man, continued the
belle
, I would
never think of a young woman who had once jilted a
lover. To my mind, it bespeaks a bad heart, and a
woman with a bad heart cannot make a very amiable
wife.
What an exceedingly clever creature she is,
whispered Mr. Mosely to Mr. Moreland, and he now
made up his mind to remain and be `entertained' some
time longer.
I think poor Mr. Morpeth greatly to be pitied; for
no man would be so silly as to be attentive seriously
to a lady without encouragement. Encouragement is
the
ne plus ultra
of courtship; are you not of my
opinion, Mr. Walworth?
Mr. Walworth was number five of the entertainees,
and he did understand Latin, of which the young lady,
though fond of using scraps, knew literally nothing.
He smiled an assent, therefore, and the
belle
felicitated
herself in having `entertained'
him
effectually;
nor was she mistaken.
Indeed, they say Miss Effingham had several
affairs of the heart, while in Europe, but it seems she
was unfortunate in them all.
Mais, ceci est trop fort! Je ne peux plus counter
.
My dear Mademoiselle, compose yourself. The
crisis is not yet arrived, by any means.
I understand she still corresponds with a German
Baron, and an Italian Marquis, though both
engagements
are absolutely broken off. Some people say
she walks into company alone, unsupported by any
gentleman, by way of announcing a firm
determination
to remain single for life.
A common exclamation from the young men
proclaimed
their disapprobation; and that night three of
them actually repeated the thing, as a well established
truth, and two of the three, failing of something
better
to talk about, also announced that Eve was
actually
engaged to be married.
There is something excessively indelicate in a
young lady's moving about a room without having a
gentleman's arm to lean on! I always feel as if such
a person was out of her place, and ought to be in the
kitchen.
But, Miss Ring, what well-bred person does it?
sputtered Mr. Moreland. No one ever heard of such
a thing in good society. 'Tis quite shocking!
Altogether
unprecedented.
It strikes me as being excessively coarse!
Oh! manifestly; quite rustic! exclaimed Mr.
Edson.
What can possibly be more vulgar? added Mr
Walworth.
I never heard of such a thing among the right
sort! said Mr. Mosely.
A young lady who can be so brazen as to come
into a room without a gentleman's arm to lean on, is,
in my judgment at least, but indifferently educated,
Hajji or no Hajji. Mr. Edson, have you ever felt the
tender passion? I know you have been desperately
in love, once, at least; do describe to me some of the
symptoms, in order that I may know when I am
seriously
attacked myself by the disease.
Mais, ceci est ridicule! L'enfant s'est sauve du
Charenton de New-York
.
From the nursery rather, Mademoiselle; you
perceive
she does not yet know how to walk alone.
Mr. Edson now protested that he was too stupid to
feel a passion as intellectual as love, and that he was
afraid he was destined by nature to remain as
insensible
as a block.
One never knows, Mr. Edson, said the young
lady
,
encouragingly. Several of my acquaintances,
who thought themselves quite safe, have been seized
suddenly, and, though none have actually died, more
than one has been roughly treated, I assure you.
Here the young men, one and all, protested that she
was excessively clever. Then succeeded a pause, for
Miss Ring was inviting, with her eyes, a number six to
join the circle, her ambition being dissatisfied with five
entertainees, as she saw that Miss Trumpet, a rival
belle, had managed to get exactly that number, also,
in the other room. All the gentlemen availed
themselves
of the cessation in wit to gape, and Mr. Edson
took the occasion to remark to Mr. Summerfield that
he understood lots had been sold in seven hundredth
street that morning, as high as two hundred dollars a
lot.
The
quadrille
now ended, and Eve returned towards
her friends. As she approached, the whole party
compared
her quiet, simple, feminine, and yet dignified air,
with the restless, beau-catching, and wordly look of
the belle, and wondered by what law of nature, or of
fashion, the one could possibly become the subject of
the other's comments. Eve never appeared better than
that evening. Her dress had all the accuracy and
finish
of a Parisian toilette, being equally removed from
exaggeration and neglect; and it was worn with the
ease of one accustomed to be elegantly attired, and
yet never decked with finery. Her step even was
that of a lady, having neither the mincing tread of a
Paris grisette, a manner that sometimes ascends even
to the
bourgeoise
, the march of a cockneyess, nor the
tiptoe swing of a
belle;
but it was the natural though
regulated step, of a trained and delicate woman.
Walk alone she could certainly, and always did, except
on those occasions of ceremony that demanded a
partner
.
Her countenance, across which an unworthy
thought had never left a trace, was an index, too, to
the purity, high principles and womanly self-respect
that controlled all her acts, and, in these particulars,
was the very reverse of the feverish, half-hoydenish,
half-affected expression of that of Miss Ring.
They may say what they please, muttered
Captain
Truck, who had been a silent but wondering
listener
of all that passed; she is worth as many of
them as could be stowed in the Montauk's lower hold.
Miss Ring perceiving Eve approach, was desirous
of saying something to her, for there was an
clat
about
a Hajji, after all, that rendered an acquaintance, or
even an intimacy desirable, and she smiled and
curtsied
.
Eve returned the salutation, but as she did not
care to approach a group of six, of which no less than
five were men, she continued to move towards her
own party. This reserve compelled Miss Ring to
advance
a step or two, when Eve was obliged to stop.
Curtsying to her partner, she thanked him for his
attention, relinquished his arm, and turned to meet the
lady. At the same instant the five `entertainees'
escaped in a body, equally rejoiced at their release, and
proud of their captivity.
I have been dying to come and speak to you, Miss
Effingham, commenced Miss Ring, but these
five
giants (she emphasized the word we have put in italics)
so beset me, that escape was quite impossible. There
ought to be a law that but one gentleman should speak
to a lady at a time.
I thought there was such a law already; said
Eve, quietly.
You mean in good breeding; but no one thinks of
those antiquated laws now-a-days. Are you
beginning
to be reconciled, a little, to your own country?
It is not easy to effect a reconciliation where there
has been no misunderstanding. I hope I have never
quarrelled with my country, or my country with me.
Oh! it is not exactly that I mean. Cannot one
need a reconciliation without a quarrel? What do
you say to this, Mr. Edson?
Miss Ring having detected some symptoms of
desertion
in the gentleman addressed, had thrown in this
question by way of recal; when turning to note its
effect, she perceived that all of her
clientelle
had
escaped. A look of surprise and mortification and
vexation
it was not in her power to suppress, and then
came one of horror.
How conspicuous we have made ourselves, and it
is all my fault! she said, for the first time that
evening
permitting her voice to fall to a becoming tone.
Why, here we actually are, two ladies conversing
together, and no gentleman near us!
Is that being conspicuous? asked Eve, with a
simplicity that was entirely natural.
I am sure, Miss Effingham, one who has seen as
much of society as you, can scarcely ask that
question
seriously. I do not think I have done so improper
a thing, since I was fifteen; and, dear me! dear me!
how to escape is the question. You have permitted
your partner to go, and I do not see a gentleman of
my acquaintance near us, to give me his arm!
As your distress is occasioned by my company,
said Eve, it is fortunately in my power to relieve it.
Thus saying, she quietly walked across the room, and
took her seat next to Mademoiselle Viefville.
Miss Ring held up her hands in amazement, and
then fortunately perceiving one of the truants gaping
at no great distance, she beckoned him to her side.
Have the goodness to give me your arm, Mr.
Summerfield, she said, I am dying to get out of this
unpleasantly conspicuous situation; but you are the
first gentleman that has approached me this
twelvemonth
.
I would not for the world do so brazen a
thing as Miss Effingham has just achieved; would you
believe it, she positively went from this spot to her
seat, quite alone!
The Hajjis are privileged.
They make themselves so. But every body knows
how bold and unwomanly the French females are.
One could wish, notwithstanding, that our own people
would not import their audacious usages into this
country.
It is a thousand pities that Mr. Clay, in his
compromise
,
neglected to make an exception against that
article. A tariff on impudence would not be at all
sectional.
It might interfere with the manufacture at home,
notwithstanding, said John Effingham; for the lungs
were strong, and the rooms of Mrs. Houston so small,
that little was said that evening, which was not heard
by any who chose to listen. But Miss Ring never
listened
,
it being no part of the vocation of a
belle
to
perform that inferior office, and sustained by the
protecting
arm of Mr. Summerfield, she advanced more
boldly into the crowd, where she soon contrived to
catch another group of even six entertainees. As
for Mr. Summerfield, he lived a twelvemonth on the
reputation of the exceedingly clever thing he had just
uttered.
There come Ned and Aristabulus, said John
Effingham, as soon as the tones of Miss Ring's voice
were lost in the din of fifty others, pitched to the same
key.
A present, Mademoiselle, je vais nous venger
.
As John Effingham uttered this, he took Captain
Truck by the arm, and went to meet his cousin and
the land agent. The latter he soon separated from
Mr. Effingham, and with this new recruit, he
managed
to get so near to Miss Ring as to attract her
attention. Although fifty, John Effingham was known
to be a bachelor, well connected, and to have twenty
thousand a year. In addition, he was well
preserved
and singularly handsome, besides having an air
that set all pretending gentility at defiance. These
were qualities that no
belle
despised, and ill-assorted
matches were, moreover, just coming into fashion in
New-York. Miss Ring had an intuitive knowledge
that he wished to speak to her, and she was not slow
in offering the opportunity. The superior tone of John
Effingham, his caustic wit and knowledge of the
world, dispersed the five
beaux
, incontinently; these
persons having a natural antipathy to every one of the
qualities named.
I hope you will permit me to presume on an
acquaintance
that extends back as far as your
grandfather
,
Miss Ring, he said, to present two very
intimate
friends; Mr. Bragg and Mr. Truck; gentlemen
who will well reward the acquaintance.
The lady bowed graciously, for it was a matter of
conscience with her to receive every man with a
smile. She was still too much in awe of the master
of ceremonies to open her batteries of attack, but John
Effingham soon relieved her, by affecting a desire to
speak to another lady. The
belle
had now the two
strangers to herself, and having heard that the
Effinghams
had an Englishman of condition as a companion,
who was travelling under a false name, she fancied
herself very clever in detecting him at once in the
Vol. I.  8
person of Aristabulus; while by the aid of a lively
imagination, she thought Mr. Truck was his travelling
Mentor, and a divine of the church of England. The
incognito she was too well bred to hint at, though she
wished both the gentlemen to perceive that a
belle
was
not to be mystified in this easy manner. Indeed, she
was rather sensitive on the subject of her readiness in
recognizing a man of fashion under any
circumstances
,
and to let this be known was her very first object,
as soon as she was relieved from the presence of John
Effingham.
You must be struck with the unsophisticated
nature
and the extreme simplicity of our society, Mr.
Bragg, she said, looking at him significantly; we
are very conscious it is not what it might be, but do
you not think it pretty well for beginners?
Now, Mr. Bragg had an entire consciousness that
he had never seen any society that deserved the name
before this very night, but he was supported in giving
his opinions by that secret sense of his qualifications
to fill any station, which formed so conspicuous a trait
in his character, and his answer was given with an
plomb
that would have added weight to the opinion
of the veriest
lgant
of the
Chausse d'Antin
.
It is indeed a good deal unsophisticated, he said,
and so simple that any body can understand it. I
find but a single fault with this entertainment, which
is, in all else, the perfection of elegance in my eyes,
and that is, that there is too little room to swing the
legs in dancing.
Indeed!I did not expect thatis it not the best
usage of Europe, now, to bring a quadrille into the
very minimum of space?
Quite the contrary, Miss. All good dancing
requires
evolutions. The dancing Dervishes, for instance,
would occupy quite as much space as both of these
sets that are walking before us, and I believe it is now
generally admitted that all good dancing needs room
for the legs.
We necessarily get a little behind the fashions, in
this distant country. Pray, sir, is it usual for ladies to
walk alone in society?
Woman was not made to move through life alone,
Miss, returned Aristabulus with a sentimental glance
of the eye, for he never let a good opportunity for
preferment
slip through his fingers, and, failing of Miss
Effingham, or Miss Van Cortlandt, of whose estates
and connections he had some pretty accurate notions,
it struck him Miss Ring might, possibly, be a very
eligible connection, as all was grist that came to his
mill; this I believe, is an admitted truth.
By life you mean matrimony, I suppose.
Yes, Miss, a man always means matrimony, when
he speaks to a young lady.
This rather disconcerted Miss Ring, who picked her
nosegay, for she was not accustomed to hear
gentlemen
talk to ladies of matrimony, but ladies to talk
to gentlemen. Recovering her self-possession,
however
,
she said with a promptitude that did the school
to which she belonged infinite credit,
You speak, sir, like one having experience.
Certainly, Miss; I have been in love ever since I
was ten years old; I may say I was born in love, and
hope to die in love.
This a little out-Heroded Herod, but the
belle
was
not a person to be easily daunted on such a subject.
She smiled graciously, therefore, and continued the
conversation with renewed spirit.
You travelled gentlemen get odd notions, she said,
and more particularly on such subjects. I always
feel afraid to discuss them with foreigners, though with
my own countrymen I have few reserves. Pray, Mr.
Truck, are you satisfied with America?Do you find
it the country you expected to see?
Certainly, marm; for so they pronounced this
word in the river, and the captain cherished his first
impressions; when we sailed from Portsmouth, I
expected
that the first land we should make would be the
Highlands of Navesink; and, although a little
disappointed
,
I have had the satisfaction of laying eyes on
it at last.
Disappointment, I fear, is the usual fate of those
who come from the other side. Is this dwelling of Mrs.
Houston's equal to the residence of an English
nobleman
,
Mr. Bragg?
Considerably better, Miss, especially in the way
of republican comfort.
Miss Ring, like all
belles
, detested the word
republican
,
their vocation being clearly to exclusion, and
she pouted a little affectedly.
I should distrust the quality of such comfort, sir,
she said, with point; but, are the rooms at all
comparable
with the rooms in Apsley House, for instance?
My dear Miss, Apsley House is a toll-gate lodge,
compared to this mansion! I doubt if there be a
dwelling
in all England half as magnificentindeed, I
cannot
imagine any thing more brilliant and rich.
Aristabulus was not a man to do things by halves,
and it was a point of honour with him to know
something
of every thing. It is true he no more could tell
where Apsley House is, or whether it was a tavern or
a gaol, than he knew half the other things on which
he delivered oracular opinions; but when it became
necessary to speak, he was not apt to balk
conversation
from any ignorance, real or affected. The
opinion
he had just given, it is true, had a little surpassed
Miss Ring's hopes; for the next thing, in her ambition
to being a
belle
, and of entertaining gentlemen, was
to fancy she was running her brilliant career in an
orbit
of fashion that lay parallel to that of the nobility
and gentry of Great Britain.
Well, this surpasses my hopes, she said, although
I was aware we are nearly on a level with the more
improved tastes of Europe: still, I thought we were a
little inferior to that part of the world, yet.
Inferior, Miss! That is a word that should never
pass your lips; you are inferior to nothing, whether
in Europe or America, Asia or Africa.
As Miss Ring had been accustomed to do most of
the flattering herself, as behoveth a
belle
, she began to be
disconcerted with the directness of the compliments
of Aristabulus, who was disposed to `make hay while
the sun shines;' and she turned, in a little confusion, to
the captain, by way of relief; we say confusion, for
the young lady, although so liable to be misunderstood,
was not actually impudent, but merely deceived in the
relations of things; or, in other words, by some
confusion
in usages, she had hitherto permitted herself to
do that in society, which female performers sometimes
do on the stage; enact the part of a man.
You should tell Mr. Bragg, sir, she said, with an
appealing look at the captain, that flattery is a
dangerous
vice, and one altogether unsuited to a Christian.
It is, indeed, marm, and one that I never indulge
in. No one under my orders, can accuse me of
flattery
.
By `under orders,' Miss Ring understood curates
and deacons; for she was aware the church of
England
had clerical distinctions of this sort, that are
unknown
in America.
I hope, sir, you do not intend to quit this country
without favouring us with a discourse.
Not I, marmI am discoursing pretty much from
morning till night, when among my own people, though
I own that this conversing rather puts me out of my
reckoning. Let me get my foot on the planks I love,
with an attentive audience, and a good cigar in my
mouth, and I'll hold forth with any bishop in the
universe
.
A cigar! exclaimed Miss Ring, in surprise. Do
gentlemen of your profession use cigars when on
duty?
8 *
Does a parson take his fees? Why, Miss, there
is not a man among us, who does not smoke from
morning till night.
Surely not on Sundays!
Two for one, on those days, more than on any
other.
And your people, sir, what do they do, all this
time?
Why, marm, most of them chew; and those that
don't, if they cannot find a pipe, have a dull time of it.
For my part, I shall hardly relish the good place itself,
if cigars are prohibited.
Miss Ring was surprised; but she had heard that
the English clergy were more free than our own, and
then she had been accustomed to think every thing
English of the purest water. A little reflection
reconciled
her to the innovation; and the next day, at a
dinner party, she was heard defending the usage as a
practice that had a precedent in the ancient incense of
the altar. At the moment, however, she was dying to
impart her discoveries to others; and she kindly
proposed
to the captain and Aristabulus to introduce them
to some of her acquaintances, as they must find it dull,
being strangers, to know no one. Introductions and
cigars were the captain's hobbies, and he accepted the
offer with joy, Aristabulus uniting cordially in the
proposition
,
as he fancied he had a right, under the
Constitution
of the United States of America, to be
introduced
to every human being with whom he came in
contact.
It is scarcely necessary to say how much the party
with whom the two neophytes in fashion had come,
enjoyed all this, though they concealed their
amusement
under the calm exterior of people of the world.
From Mr. Effingham the mystification was carefully
concealed by his cousin, as the former would have
felt it due to Mrs. Houston, a well-meaning, but silly
woman, to put an end to it. Eve and Grace laughed,
as merry girls would be apt to laugh, at such an
occurrence
,
and they danced the remainder of the
evening
with lighter hearts than ever. At one, the
company
retired in the same informal manner, as respects
announcements and the calling of carriages, as that in
which they had entered; most to lay their drowsy
heads on their pillows, and Miss Ring to ponder over
the superior manners of a polished young Englishman,
and to dream of the fragrance of a sermon that was
preserved in tobacco.
CHAPTER VI.
Marry, our play is the most lamentable
Comedy, and most cruel death of Pyramus and
Thisby.
Peter Quince
.
Our
task in the way of describing town society will
soon be ended. The gentlemen of the Effingham
family had been invited to meet Sir George
Templemore
at one or two dinners, to which the latter had
been invited in consequence of his letters, most of
which were connected with his pecuniary
arrangements
.
As one of these entertainments was like all
the rest of the same character, a very brief account
of it will suffice to let the reader into the secret of the
excellence of the genus.
A well-spread board, excellent viands, highly
respectable
cookery, and delicious wines, were every
where met. Two rows of men clad in dark dresses,
a solitary female at the head of the table, or, if
fortunate
,
with a supporter of the same sex near her,
invariably
composed the
convives
. The exaggerations of a
province were seen ludicrously in one particular
custom
.
The host, or perhaps it might have been the
hostess, had been told there should be a contrast
between
the duller light of the reception-room, and the
brilliancy of the table, and John Effingham actually hit
his legs against a stool, in floundering through the
obscurity of the first drawing-room he entered on one
of the occasions in question.
When seated at table, the first great duty of
restauration
performed, the conversation turned on the prices
of lots, speculations in towns, or the currency. After
this came the regular assay of wines, during which it
was easy to fancy the master of the house a dealer,
for he usually sat either sucking a syphon or
flourishing
a cork-screw. The discourse would now have
done credit to the annual meeting and dinner of the
German exporters, assembled at Rudesheim to bid for
the article.
Sir George was certainly on the point of forming a
very erroneous judgment concerning the country,
when Mr. Effingham extricated him from this set, and
introduced him properly into his own. Here, indeed,
while there was much to strike a European as
peculiar
,
and even provincial, the young baronet fared
much better. He met with the same quality of table,
relieved by an intelligence that was always
respectable
,
and a manliness of tone which, if not unmixed,
had the great merit of a simplicity and nature that are
not always found in more sophisticated circles. The
occasional incongruities struck them all, more than the
positive general faults; and Sir George Templemore
did justice to the truth, by admitting frankly, the
danger
he had been in of forming a too hasty opinion.
All this time, which occupied a month, the young
baronet got to be more and more intimate in Hudson
Square, Eve gradually becoming more frank and
unreserved
with him, as she grew sensible that he had
abandoned his hopes of success with herself, and Grace
gradually more cautious and timid, as she became
conscious
of his power to please, and the interest he took
in herself.
It might have been three days after the ball at Mrs.
Houston's that most of the family was engaged to
look in on a Mrs. Legend, a lady of what was called
a literary turn, Sir George having been asked to make
one of their party. Aristabulus was already returned
to his duty in the country, where we shall shortly have
occasion to join him, but an invitation had been sent
to Mr. Truck, under the general, erroneous impression
of his real character.
Taste, whether in the arts, literature, or any thing
else, is a natural impulse, like love. It is true both may
be cultivated and heightened by circumstances, but the
impulses must be voluntary, and the flow of feeling, or
of soul, as it has become a law to style it, is not to be
forced, or commanded to come and go at will. This
is the reason that all premeditated enjoyments
connected
with the intellect, are apt to baffle expectations,
and why academies, literary clubs, coteries and
dinners
are commonly dull. It is true that a body of
clever
people may be brought together, and, if left to their
own impulses, the characters of their mind will show
themselves; wit will flash, and thought will answer
thought spontaneously; but every effort to make the
stupid agreeable, by giving a direction of a pretending
intellectual nature to their efforts, is only rendering
dullness more conspicuous by exhibiting it in contrast
with what it ought to be to be clever, as a bad picture
is rendered the more conspicuous by an elaborate and
gorgeous frame.
The latter was the fate of most of Mrs. Legend's
literary evenings, at which it was thought an
illustration
to understand even one foreign language. But, it
was known that Eve was skilled in most of the
European
tongues, and, the good lady, not feeling that such
accomplishments are chiefly useful as a means, looked
about her in order to collect a set, among whom our
heroine might find some one with whom to converse
in each of her dialects. Little was said about it, it is
true, but great efforts were made to cause this evening
to be memorable in the annals of
conversazioni
.
In carrying out this scheme, nearly all the wits,
writers
,
artists and
literati
, as the most incorrigible
members
of the book clubs were styled, in New-York, were
pressingly invited to be present. Aristabulus had
contrived
to earn such a reputation for the captain, on the
night of the ball, that he was universally called a man
of letters, and an article had actually appeared in one
of the papers, speaking of the literary merits of the
Hon. and Rev. Mr. Truck, a gentleman travelling in
our country, from whose liberality and just views, an
account of our society was to be expected, that should,
at last, do justice to our national character. With
such expectations, then, every true American and
Americaness, was expected to be at his or her post,
for the solemn occasion. It was a rally of literature,
in defence of the institutionsno, not of the institutions,
for they were left to take care of themselvesbut of
the social character of the community.
Alas! it is easier to feel high aspirations on such
subjects, in a provincial town, than to succeed; for
merely calling a place an Emporium, is very far from
giving it the independence, high tone, condensed
intelligence
and tastes of a capital. Poor Mrs. Legend,
desirous of having all the tongues duly represented,
was obliged to invite certain dealers in gin from
Holland
,
a German linen merchant from Saxony, an Italian
Cavaliero
, who amused himself in selling beads, and a
Spanish master, who was born in Portugal, all of
whom had just one requisite for conversation in their
respective languages, and no more. But such
assemblies
were convened in Paris, and why not in
New-York
?
We shall not stop to dwell on the awful sensations
with which Mrs. Legend heard the first ring at her
door, on the eventful night in question. It was the
precursor of the entrance of Miss Annual, as regular
a devotee of letters as ever conned a primer. The
meeting was sentimental and affectionate. Before
either had time, however, to disburthen her mind of
one half of its prepared phrases, ring upon ring
proclaimed
more company, and the rooms were soon as
much sprinkled with talent, as a modern novel with
jests. Among those who came first, appeared all the
foreign corps, for the refreshments entered as
something
into the account with them; every blue of the
place, whose social position in the least entitled her to
be seen in such a house, Mrs. Legend belonging quite
positively to good society.
The scene that succeeded was very characteristic.
A professed genius does nothing like other people,
except
in cases that require a display of talents. In all
minor matters, he, or she, is
sui generis;
for sentiment
is in constant ebullition in their souls; this being what
is meant by the flow of that part of the human system.
We might here very well adopt the Homeric
method
,
and call the roll of heroes and heroines, in what
the French would term a
catalogue raisonne;
but our
limits compel us to be less ambitious, and to adopt a
simpler mode of communicating facts. Among the
ladies who now figured in the drawing-room of Mrs.
Legend, besides Miss Annual, were Miss Monthly,
Mrs. Economy, S. R. P., Marion, Longinus, Julietta,
Herodotus, D. O. V. E., and Mrs. Demonstration;
besides
many others of less note; together with at least
a dozen female Hajjis, whose claims to appear in such
society were pretty much dependent on the fact, that
having seen pictures and statues abroad, they
necessarily
must have the means of talking of them at home.
The list of men was still more formidable in numbers,
if not in talents. At its head stood Steadfast Dodge,
Esquire, whose fame as a male Hajji had so far swollen
since Mrs. Jarvis's
runion
, that, for the first time in
his life, he now entered one of the better houses of his
own country. Then there were the authors of
Lapis
Lazuli, The Aunts, The Reformed, The
Conformed, The Transformed, and The
Deformed
;
with the editors of The Hebdomad, The
Night Cap, The Chrysalis, The Real Maggot,
and The Seek no Further; as also, Junius,
Junius
Brutus, Lucius Junius Brutus, Captain Kant,
Florio, the `Author of the History of Billy
Linkum
Tweedle', the celebrated Pottawattamie Prophet,
Single Rhyme, a genius who had prudently rested
his fame in verse, on a couplet composed of one line;
besides divers
amateurs
and
connoisseurs
, Hajjis, who
must
be men of talents, as they had acquired all they
knew, very much as American Eclipse gained his
laurels
on the turf; that is to say, by a free use of the
whip and spur.
As Mrs. Legend sailed about her rooms amid such
a circle, her mind expanded, her thoughts diffused
themselves
among her guests on the principle of Animal
Magnetism, and her heart was melting with the tender
sympathies of congenial tastes. She felt herself to be
at the head of American talents, and, in the secret
recesses
of her reason, she determined that, did even the
fate of Sodom and Gomorrah menace her native town,
as some evil disposed persons had dared to insinuate
might one day be the case, here was enough to save it
from destruction.
It was just as the mistress of the mansion had come
to this consoling conclusion, that the party from Hudson
Square rang. As few of her guests came in carriages,
Mrs. Legend, who heard the rolling of wheels, felt
persuaded
that the lion of the night was now indeed at
hand; and with a view to a proper reception, she
requested
the company to divide itself into two lines, in
order that he might enter, as it were, between lanes
of genius.
It may be necessary to explain, at this point of our
narrative, that John Effingham was perfectly aware
of the error which existed in relation to the real
character
of Captain Truck, wherein he thought great
injustice
had been done the honest seaman; and, the old
man intending to sail for London next morning, had
persuaded him to accept this invitation, in order that
the public mind might be disabused in a matter of so
much importance. With a view that this might be done
naturally and without fuss, however, he did not explain
the mistake to his nautical friend, believing it most
probable that this could be better done incidentally, as
it were, in the course of the evening; and feeling
certain
of the force of that wholesome apothegm, which
says that truth is powerful and must prevail. If
this be so, added John Effingham, in his explanations
to Eve, there can be no place where the sacred
quality
will be so likely to assert itself, as in a galaxy of
geniuses, whose distinctive characteristic is `an
intuitive
perception of things in their real colours.'
When the door of Mrs. Legend's drawing-room
opened, in the usual noiseless manner, Mademoiselle
Viefville, who led the way, was startled at finding
herself
in the precise situation of one who is condemned
to run the gauntlet. Fortunately, she caught a
glimpse of Mrs. Legend, posted at the other end of the
proud array, inviting her, with smiles, to approach.
The invitation had been to a
literary fte
, and
Mademoiselle
Viefville was too much of a Frenchwoman
to be totally disconcerted at a little scenic effect on
the occasion of a
fte
of any sort. Supposing she was
now a witness of an American ceremony for the first
time, for the want of
representation
in the country had
been rather a subject of animadversion with her, she
advanced steadily towards the mistress of the house,
bestowing smile for smile, this being a part of the
programme
at which a
Parisienne
was not easily outdone.
Eve followed, as usual,
sola;
Grace came next; then
Sir George; then John Effingham; the captain
bringing
up the rear. There had been a friendly contest,
Vol. I.  9
for the precedency, between the two last, each
desiring
to yield it to the other on the score of merit; but
the captain prevailed, by declaring that he was
navigating
an unknown sea, and that he could do nothing
wiser than to sail in the wake of so good a pilot as
Mr. John Effingham.
As Hajjis of approved experience, the persons who
led the advance in this little procession, were subjects
of a proper attention and respect; but as the
admiration
of mere vulgar travelling would in itself be vulgar,
care was taken to reserve the condensed feeling of
the company for the celebrated English writer and
wit, who was known to bring up the rear. This was
not a common house, in which dollars had place, or
belles
rioted, but the temple of genius; and every one
felt an ardent desire to manifest a proper homage to
the abilities of the established foreign writer, that should
be in exact proportion to their indifference to the twenty
thousand a year of John Effingham, and to the nearly
equal amount of Eve's expectations.
The personal appearance of the honest tar was well
adapted to the character he was thus called on so
unexpectedly
to support. His hair had long been getting
grey, but the intense anxiety of the chase, of the
wreck, and of his other recent adventures, had rapidly,
but effectually, increased this mark of time; and his
head was now nearly as white as snow. The hale,
fresh, red of his features, which was in truth the result
of exposure, might very well pass for the tint of port,
and his tread, which had always a little of the
quarterdeck
swing about it, might quite easily be mistaken by
a tyro, for the human frame staggering under a load
of learning. Unfortunately for those who dislike
mystifications
,
the captain had consulted John Effingham
on the subject of the toilette, and that kind and
indulgent
friend had suggested the propriety of appearing
in black small-clothes for the occasion, a costume that
he often wore himself of an evening. Reality, in this
instance, then, did not disappoint expectation, and the
burst of applause with which the captain was received,
was accompanied by a general murmur in
commendation
of the admirable manner in which he looked
the character.
What a Byronic head, whispered the author of
The Transformed to D. O. V. E.; and was there
ever such a curl of the lip, before, to mortal man!
The truth is, the captain had thrust his tobacco into
an aside, as a monkey is known to
empocher
a spare
nut, or a lump of sugar.
Do you think him Byronic?To my eye, the cast
of his head is Shaksperian, rather; though I confess
there is a little of Milton about the forehead!
Pray, said Miss Annual, to Lucius Junius Brutus,
which is commonly thought to be the best of his
works; that on aaa,or that on eee?
Now, so it happened, that not a soul in the room,
but the lion himself, had any idea what books he had
written, and he knew only of some fifteen or twenty
log-books. It was generally understood, that he was
a great English writer, and this was more than
sufficient
.
I believe the world generally prefers the aaa,
said Lucius Junius Brutus; but the few give a
decided
preference to the eee
Oh! out of all question preferable! exclaimed
half a dozen, in hearing.
With what a classical modesty he pays his
compliments
to Mrs. Legend, observed S. R. P.One
can always tell a man of real genius, by his
tenu!
He is so English! cried Florio. Ah!
they
are
the only people, after all!
This Florio was one of those geniuses who sigh
most for the things that they least possess.
By this time Captain Truck had got through with
listening to the compliments of Mrs. Legend, when he
was seized upon by a circle of rabid literati, who
badgered him with questions concerning his opinions,
notions, inferences, experiences, associations,
sensations
,
sentiments and intentions, in a way that soon
threw the old man into a profuse perspiration. Fifty
times did he wish, from the bottom of his soul, that
soul which the crowd around him fancied dwelt so
high in the clouds, that he was seated quietly by the
side of Mrs. Hawker, who, he mentally swore, was
worth all the
literati
in Christendom. But fate had
decreed otherwise, and we shall leave him to his
fortune
,
for a time, and return to our heroine and her
party.
As soon as Mrs. Legend had got through with her
introductory compliments to the captain, she sought
Eve and Grace, with a consciousness that a few
civilities
were now their due.
I fear, Miss Effingham, after the elaborate
soires
of the literary circles in Paris, you will find our
reunions
of the same sort, a little dull; and yet I flatter
myself with having assembled most of the talents of
New-York on this memorable occasion, to do honour
to your friend. Are you acquainted with many of the
company?
Now, Eve had never seen nor ever heard of a single
being in the room, with the exception of Mr. Dodge
and her own party, before this night, although most
of them had been so laboriously employed in puffing
each other into celebrity, for many weary years; and,
as for elaborate
soires
, she thought she had never seen
one half as elaborate as this of Mrs. Legend's. As it
would not very well do, however, to express all this in
words, she civilly desired the lady to point out to her
some of the most distinguished of the company.
With the greatest pleasure, Miss Effingham, Mrs.
Legend taking pride in dwelling on the merits of her
guests.This heavy, grand-looking personage, in
whose air one sees refinement and modesty at a glance,
is Captain Kant, the editor of one of our most
decidedly
pious newspapers. His mind is distinguished
for its intuitive perception of all that is delicate,
reserved
and finished in the intellectual world, while, in
opposition to this quality, which is almost feminine, his
character is just as remarkable for its unflinching love
of truth. He was never known to publish a falsehood,
and of his foreign correspondence, in particular, he is
so exceedingly careful, that he assures me he has
every word of it written under his own eye.
On the subject of his religious scruples, added
John Effingham, he is so fastidiously exact, that I
hear he `says grace' over every thing that goes
from
his press, and `returns thanks' for every thing that
comes
to
it.
You know him, Mr. Effingham, by this remark?
Is he not, truly, a man of a vocation?
That, indeed, he is, ma'am. He may be succinctly
said to have a newspaper mind, as he reduces every
thing in nature or art to news, and commonly imparts
to it so much of his own peculiar character, that it
loses all identity with the subjects to which it
originally
belonged. One scarcely knows which to admire
most about this man, the atmospheric transparency of
his motives, for he is so disinterested as seldom even to
think of paying for a dinner when travelling, and yet
so conscientious as always to say something obliging
of the tavern as soon as he gets homehis rigid regard
to facts, or the exquisite refinement and delicacy that
he imparts to every thing he touches. Over all this,
too, he throws a beautiful halo of morality and
religion
,
never even prevaricating in the hottest discussion,
unless with the unction of a saint!
Do you happen to know Florio? asked Mrs.
Legend
,
a little distrusting John Effingham's account of
Captain Kant.
If I do, it must indeed be by accident. What are
his chief characteristics, ma'am?
Sentiment, pathos, delicacy, and all in rhyme, too.
9*
You, no doubt, have heard of his triumph over Lord
Byron, Miss Effingham?
Eve was obliged to confess that it was new to her.
Why, Byron wrote an ode to Greece, commencing
with `The Isles of Greece! the Isles of Greece!' a
very feeble line, as any one will see, for it contained a
useless and an unmeaning repetition.
And you might add vulgar, too, Mrs. Legend,
said John Effingham, since it made a palpable
allusion
to all those vulgar incidents that associate
themselves
in the mind, with these said common-place isles.
The arts, philosophy, poetry, eloquence, and even old
Homer, are brought unpleasantly to one's recollection,
by such an indiscreet invocation.
So Florio thought, and, by way of letting the
world perceive the essential difference between the
base and the pure coin,
he
wrote an ode on England,
which commenced as such an ode
should!
Do you happen to recollect any of it, ma'am?
Only the first line, which I greatly regret, as the
rhyme is Florio's chief merit. But this line is, of itself,
sufficient to immortalize a man.
Do not keep us in torment, dear Mrs. Legend, but
let us have it, of heaven's sake!
It began in this sublime strain, sir`Beyond the
wave!Beyond the wave!' Now, Miss Effingham,
that is what
I
call poetry!
And well you may, ma'am, returned the
gentleman
,
who perceived Eve could scarce refrain from
breaking out in a very unsentimental mannerSo
much pathos.
And so sententious and flowing!
Condensing a journey of three thousand miles, as
it might be, into three words, and a note of
admiration
.
I trust it was printed with a note of admiration,
Mrs. Legend?
Yes, sir, with twoone behind each waveand
such waves, Mr. Effingham!
Indeed, ma'am, you may say so. One really gets
a grand idea of them, England lying beyond each.
So much expressed in so few syllables!
I think I see every shoal, current, ripple, rock,
island, and whale, between Sandy Hook and the Land's
End.
He hints at an epic.
Pray God he may execute one. Let him make
haste, too, or he may get `behind the age,' `behind the
age.'
Here the lady was called away to receive a guest.
Cousin Jack!
Eve Effingham?
Do you not sometimes fear offending?
Not a woman who begins with expressing her
admiration
of such a sublime thing as this. You are
safe with such a person, any where short of a tweak
of the nose.
Mais, tout ceci est bien drle!
You never were more mistaken in your life,
Mademoiselle
;
every body here looks upon it as a matter
of life and death.
The new guest was Mr. Pindar, one of those
careless
,
unsentimental fellows, that occasionally throw off
an ode that passes through Christendom, as dollars are
known to pass from China to Norway, and yet, who
never fancied spectacles necessary to his appearance,
solemnity to his face, nor
soires
to his renown. After
quitting Mrs. Legend, he approached Eve, to whom
he was slightly known, and accosted her.
This is the region of taste, Miss Effingham, he
said, with a shrug of the jaw, if such a member can
shrug; and I do not wonder at finding you here.
He then chatted pleasantly a moment, with the
party
,
and passed on, giving an ominous gape, as he drew
nearer to the
oi polloi
of literature. A moment after
appeared Mr. Gray, a man who needed nothing but
taste in the public, and the encouragement that would
follow such a taste, to stand at, or certainly near, the
head of the poets of our own time. He, too, looked
shily at the galaxy, and took refuge in a corner.
Mr. Pith followed; a man whose caustic wit needs
only a sphere for its exercise, manners to portray, and
a society with strong points about it to illustrate, in
order to enrol his name high on the catalogue of
satirists
.
Another ring announced Mr. Fun, a writer of
exquisite humour, and of finished periods, but who,
having perpetrated a little too much sentiment, was
instantly seized upon by all the ultra ladies who were
addicted to the same taste in that way, in the room.
These persons came late, like those who had already
been too often dosed in the same way, to be impatient
of repetitions. The three first soon got together in a
corner, and Eve fancied they were laughing at the rest
of the company; whereas, in fact, they were merely
laughing at a bad joke of their own; their quick
perception
of the ludicrous having pointed out a hundred
odd combinations and absurdities, that would have
escaped duller minds.
Who, in the name of the twelve Csars, has Mrs.
Legend got to lionize, younder, with the white summit
and the dark base? asked the writer of odes.
Some English pamphleteer, by what I can learn,
answered he of satire; some fellow who has achieved
a pert review, or written a Minerva Pressism, and who
now flourishes like a bay tree among us. A modern
Horace, or a Juvenal on his travels.
Fun is well badgered, observed Mr. Gray.Do
you not see that Miss Annual, Miss Monthly, and that
young alphabet D. O. V. E., have got him within the
circle of their petticoats, where he will be martyred on
a sigh?
He casts longing looks this way; he wishes you
to go to his rescue, Pith.
I!Let him take his fill of sentiment! I am no
hompathist in such matters. Large doses in quick
succession, will soonest work a cure. Here comes the
lion, and he breaks loose from his cage, like a beast
that has been poked up with sticks.
Good evening, gentlemen, said Captain Truck,
wiping his face intensely, and who having made his
escape from a throng of admirers, took refuge in the
first port that offered. You seem to be enjoying
yourselves here in a rational and agreeable way. Quite
cool and refreshing in this corner.
And yet we have no doubt that both our reason
and our amusement will receive a large increase from
the addition of your society, sir, returned Mr. Pith.
Do us the favour to take a seat, I beg of you, and
rest yourself.
With all my heart, gentlemen; for, to own the
truth, these ladies make warm work about a stranger.
I have just got out of what I call a category.
You appear to have escaped with life, sir,
observed
Pindar, taking a cool survey of the other's
person.
Yes, thank God, I have done that, and it is pretty
much all, answered the captain, wiping his face. I
served in the French warTruxtun's war, as we
call itand I had a touch with the English in the
privateer trade, between twelve and fifteen; and here,
quite lately, I was in an encounter with the savage
Arabs down on the coast of Africa; and I account
them all as so much snow-balling, compared with the
yard-arm and yard-arm work of this very night. I
wonder if it is permitted to try a cigar at these
conversation-onies
,
gentlemen?
I believe it is, sir, returned Pindar, coolly. Shall
I help you to a light?
Oh! Mr. Truck! cried Mrs. Legend, following
the chafed animal to his corner, as one would pursue
any other runaway, instinct has brought you into this
good company. You are, now, in the very focus of
American talents.
Having just escaped from the focus of American
talons, whispered Pith.
I must be permitted to introduce you myself. Mr.
Truck, Mr. PindarMr. PithMr. Graygentlemen,
you must be so happy to be acquainted, being, as it
were, engaged in the same pursuits!
The captain rose and shook each of the gentlemen
cordially by the hand, for he had, at least, the
consolation
of a great many introductions that night. Mrs.
Legend disappeared to say something to some other
prodigy.
Happy to meet you, gentlemen, said the captain.
In what trade do you sail?
By whatever name we may call it, answered Mr.
Pindarwe can scarcely be said to go before the
wind.
Not in the Injee business, then, or the monsoons
would keep the stun'sails set, at least.
No, sir.But yonder is Mr. Moccasin, who has
lately set up
secundum artem
, in the Indian business,
having written two novels in that way already, and
begun a third.
Are you all regularly employed, gentlemen?
As regularly as inspiration points, said Mr. Pith.
Men of our occupation must make fair weather of it,
or we had better be doing nothing.
So I often tell my owners, but `go ahead' is the
order. When I was a youngster, a ship remained in
port for a fair wind; but, now, she goes to work and
makes one. The world seems to get young, as I get
old.
This is a
rum litterateur
, Gray whispered to
Pindar
.
It is an obvious mystification, was the answer;
poor Mrs. Legend has picked up some straggling
porpoise, and converted him, by a touch of her
magical
wand, into a Boanerges of literature. The thing
is as clear as day, for the worthy fellow smells of tar
and cigar smoke. I perceive that Mr. Effingham is
laughing out of the corner of his eyes, and will step
across the room, and get the truth, in a minute.
The rogue was as good as his word, and was soon
back again, and contrived to let his friends understand
the real state of the case. A knowledge of the
captain's
true character encouraged this trio in the
benevolent
purpose of aiding the honest old seaman in his
wish to smoke, and Pith managed to give him a lighted
paper, without becoming an open accessary to the plot.
Will you take a cigar yourself, sir, said the
captain
,
offering his box to Mr. Pindar.
I thank you, Mr. Truck, I never smoke, but am a
profound admirer of the flavour. Let me entreat you
to begin as soon as possible.
Thus encouraged, Captain Truck drew two or three
whiffs, when the rooms were immediately filled with
the fragrance of a real Havana. At the first
discovery
,
the whole literary pack went off on the scent.
As for Mr. Fun, he managed to profit by the agitation
that followed, in order to escape to the three wags in
the corner, who were enjoying the scene, with the
gravity of so many dervishes.
As I live, cried Lucius Junius Brutus, there is
the author of aaa actually smoking a cigar!
How excessively
piquant!
Do my eyes deceive me, or is not that the writer
of eee fumigating us all! whispered Miss
Annual.
Nay, this cannot certainly be right, put in Florio,
with a dogmatical manner. All the periodicals
agree that smoking is ungenteel in England.
You never were more mistaken, dear Florio,
replied D. O. V. E. in a cooing tone. The very last
novel of society has a chapter in which the hero and
heroine smoke in the declaration scene.
Do they, indeed!That alters the case. Really,
one would not wish to get behind so great a nation,
nor yet go much before it. Pray, Captain Kant, what
do your friends in Canada say; is, or is not smoking
permitted in good society there? the Canadians must,
at least, be ahead of us.
Not at all, sir, returned the editor in his softest
tones; it is revolutionary and jacobinical.
But the ladies prevailed, and, by a process that is
rather peculiar to what may be called a credulous
state of society, they carried the day. This process
was simply to make one fiction authority for another.
The fact that smoking was now carried so far in
England, that the clergy actually used cigars in the
pulpits, was affirmed on the authority of Mr. Truck
himself, and, coupled with his present occupation, the
point was deemed to be settled. Even Florio yielded,
and his plastic mind soon saw a thousand beauties in
the usage, that had hitherto escaped it. All the literati
drew round the captain in a circle, to enjoy the
spectacle
,
though the honest old mariner contrived to throw
out such volumes of vapour as to keep them at a safe
distance. His four demure-looking neighbours got
behind
the barrier of smoke, where they deemed
themselves
entrenched against the assaults of sentimental
petticoats, for a time, at least.
Pray, Mr. Truck, inquired S. R. P., is it
commonly
thought in the English literary circles, that
Byron was a development of Shakspeare, or
Shakspeare
a shadowing forth of Byron?
Both, marm, said the captain, with a coolness
that would have done credit to Aristabulus, for he had
been fairly badgered into impudence, profiting by the
occasion to knock the ashes off his cigar; all incline
to the first opinion, and most to the last.
What finesse! murmured one. How delicate!
whispered a second. A dignified reserve!
ejaculated
a third. So English! exclaimed Florio.
Do you think, Mr. Truck, asked D. O. V. E.,
that the profane songs of Little have more pathos
than the sacred songs of Moore; or that the sacred
songs of Moore have more sentiment than the profane
songs of Little?
A good deal of both, marm, and something to
spare. I think there is little in one, and more in the
other.
Pray, sir, said J. R. P., do you pronounce the
name of Byron's lady-love, Guy-kee-oh-
ly
, or,
Gwy-ky-o-
lee?
That depends on how the wind is. If on shore, I
am apt to say `oh-lee;' and if off shore, `oh-lie.'
That's capital! cried Florio, in an extasy of
admiration
.
What man in this country could have
said as crack a thing as that?
Indeed it is very witty, added Miss Monthly
what does it mean?
Mean! More than is seen or felt by common
minds. Ah! the English are truly a great nation!
How delightfully he smokes!
I think he is much the most interesting man we
have had out here, observed Miss Annual, since the
last bust of Scott!
Ask him, dear D. O. V. E., whispered Julietta,
who was timid, from the circumstance of never having
published, which he thinks the most ecstatic feeling,
hope or despair?
The question was put by the more experienced lady,
according to request, though she first said, in a hurried
tone, to her youthful sisteryou can have felt but
little, child, or you would know that it is despair, as a
matter of course.
The honest captain, however, did not treat the
matter
so lightly, for he improved the opportunity to light
a fresh cigar, throwing the still smoking stump into
Mrs. Legend's grate, through a lane of literati, as he
afterwards boasted, as coolly as he could have thrown
it overboard, under other circumstances. Luckily for
his reputation for sentiment, he mistook ecstatic, a
Vol. I.  10
word he had never heard before, for erratic; and
recollecting sundry roving maniacs that he had seen,
he answered promptly
Despair, out and out.
I knew it, said one.
It's in nature, added a second.
All can feel its truth, rejoined a third.
This point may now be set down as established,
cried Florio, and I hope no more will be said about
it.
This is encouragement to the searchers after truth,
put in Captain Kant.
Pray, Hon. and Rev. Mr. Truck, asked Lucius
Junius Brutus, at the joint suggestion of Junius Brutus
and Brutus, does the Princess Victoria smoke?
If she did not, sir, where would be the use in being
a princess. I suppose you know that all the tobacco
seized in England, after a deduction to informers, goes
to the crown.
I object to this usage, remarked Captain Kant,
as irreligious, French, and tending to
sans-culotteism
.
I am willing to admit of this distinguished instance as
an exception; but on all other grounds, I shall maintain
that it savours of infidelity to smoke. The Prussian
government, much the best of our times, never smokes.
This man thinks he has a monoply of the puffing,
himself, Pindar whispered into the captain's ear;
whiff away, my dear sir, and you'll soon throw him
into the shade.
The captain winked, drew out his box, lighted
another
cigar, and, by way of reply to the envious
remark, he put one in each corner of his mouth, and
soon had both in full blast, a state in which he kept
them for near a minute.
This is the very picturesque of social enjoyment,
exclaimed Florio, holding up both hands in a glow of
rapture. It is absolutely Homeric, in the way of
usages! Ah! the English are a great nation!
I should like to know excessively if there was
really such a person as Baron Mun-chaw-sen? said
Julietta, gathering courage from the success of her
last question.
There was, Miss, returned the captain, through
his teeth, and nodding his head in the affirmative. A
regular traveller, that; and one who knew him well,
swore to me that he hadn't related one half of what
befel him.
How very delightful to learn this from the highest
quarter! exclaimed Miss Monthly.
Is Gatty (Goethe) really dead? inquired
Longinus
,
or, is the account we have had to that effect,
merely a metaphysical apotheosis of his mighty soul?
Dead, marmstone deaddead as a door-nail,
returned the captain, who saw a relief in killing as
many as possible.
You have been in France, Mr. Truck, beyond
question? observed Lucius Junius Brutus, in the way
one puts a question.
France!I was in France before I was ten years
old. I know every foot of the coast, from Havre de
Grace to Marseilles.
Will you then have the goodness to explain to us
whether the soul of Chat-
to
-bri-
ong
is more expanded
than his reason, or his reason more expanded than his
soul?
Captain Truck had a very tolerable notion of Baron
Munchausen and of his particular merits; but
Chateaubriant
was a writer of whom he knew nothing. After
pondering a moment, and feeling persuaded that a
confession of ignorance might undo him; for the old
man had got to be influenced by the atmosphere of the
place; he answered coolly
Oh! Chat-
to
-bri-
ong
, is it you mean?As
wholesouled
a fellow as I know. All soul, sir, and lots of
reason
,
besides.
How simple and unaffected!
Crack! exclaimed Florio.
A thorough Jacobin! growled Captain Kant, who
was always offended when any one but himself took
liberties with the truth.
Here the four wags in the corner observed that head
went to head in the crowd, and that the rear rank of
the company began to disappear, while Mrs. Legend
was in evident distress. In a few minutes, all the
Romans
were off; Florio soon after vanished, grating his
teeth in a poetical frenzy; and even Captain Kant,
albeit so used to look truth in the face, beat a retreat.
The alphabet followed, and even the Annual and the
Monthly retired, with leave-takings so solemn and
precise
,
that poor Mrs. Legend was in total despair.
Eve, foreseeing something unpleasant, had gone
away first, and, in a few minutes, Mr. Dodge, who
had been very active in the crowd, whispering and
gesticulating, made his bow also. The envy of this
man had, in fact, become so intolerable, that he had
let the cat out of the bag. No one now remained but
the party entrenched behind the smoke, and the
mistress
of the house. Pindar solemnly proposed to the
captain that they should go and enjoy an
oyster-supper
,
in company; and, the proposal being cordially
accepted, they rose in a body, to take leave.
A most delightful evening, Mrs. Legend, said
Pindar
,
with perfect truth, much the pleasantest I ever
passed in a house, where one passes so many that are
agreeable.
I cannot properly express my thanks for the
obligation
you have conferred by making me acquainted
with Mr. Truck, added Gray. I shall cultivate it
as far as in my power, for a more capital fellow never
breathed.
Really, Mrs. Legend, this has been a Byronic
night! observed Pith, as he made his bow. I shall
long remember it, and I think it deserves to be
commemorated
in verse.
Fun endeavoured to look sympathetic and
sentimental
,
though the spirit within could scarcely refrain
from grinning in Mrs. Legend's face. He stammered
out a few compliments, however, and disappeared.
Well, good night, marm, said Captain Truck,
offering his hand cordially. This has been a
pleasant
evening, altogether, though it was warm work at
first. If you like ships, I should be glad to show you
the Montauk's cabins when we get back; and if you
ever think of Europe, let me recommend the London
line as none of the worst. We'll try to make you
comfortable, and trust to me to choose a state-room, a
thing I am experienced in.
Not one of the wags laughed until they were fairly
confronted with the oysters. Then, indeed, they burst
out into a general and long fit of exuberant merriment,
returning to it, between the courses from the kitchen,
like the
refrain
of a song. Captain Truck, who was
uncommonly well satisfied with himself, did not
understand
the meaning of all this boyishness, but he has
often declared since, that a heartier or a funnier set of
fellows he never fell in with, than his four companions
proved to be that night.
As for the literary
soire
, the most profound silence
has been maintained concerning it, neither of the wits
there assembled having seen fit to celebrate it in rhyme,
and Florio having actually torn up an impromptu for
the occasion, that he had been all the previous day
writing.
10 *
CHAPTER VII.
There is a history in all men's lives,
Figuring the nature of the times deceased,
The which observed, a man may prophesy
With a near aim, of the main chance of things,
As yet not come to life.
King Henry
VI.
The
following morning the baronet breakfasted in
Hudson Square. While at table, little was said
concerning
the events of the past night, though sundry smiles
were exchanged, as eye met eye, and the recollection
of the mystification returned. Grace alone looked
grave, for she had been accustomed to consider Mrs.
Legend a very discriminating person, and she had even
hoped that most of those who usually figured in her
rooms, were really the clever persons they laid claim
to be.
The morning was devoted to looking at the quarter
of the town which is devoted to business, a party having
been made for that express purpose under the auspices
of John Effingham. As the weather was very cold,
although the distances were not great, the carriages
were ordered, and they all set off about noon.
Grace had given up expecting a look of admiration
from Eve in behalf of any of the lions of New-York,
her cousin having found it necessary to tell her, that,
in a comparative sense at least, little was to be said in
behalf of these provincial wonders. Even
Mademoiselle
Viefville, now that the freshness of her feelings
were abated, had dropped quietly down into a natural
way of speaking of these things; and Grace, who was
quick-witted, soon discovered that when she did make
any allusions to similar objects in Europe, it was
always
to those that existed in some country town. A
silent convention existed, therefore, to speak no more
on such subjects; or if any thing was said, it arose
incidentally
and as inseparable from the regular thread
of the discourse.
When in Wall street, the carriages stopped and the
gentlemen alighted. The severity of the weather kept
the ladies in the chariot, where Grace endeavoured to
explain things as well as she could to her companions.
What are all these people running after, so
intently
?
inquired Mademoiselle Viefville, the conversation
being in French, but which we shall render freely into
English, for the sake of the general reader.
Dollars, I believe, Mademoiselle; am I right,
Grace?
I believe you are, returned Grace, laughing,
though I know little more of this part of the town than
yourself.
Quelle foule!
Is that building filled with dollars,
into which the gentlemen are now entering? Its steps
are crowded.
That is the
Bourse
, Mademoiselle, and it ought to
be well lined, by the manner in which some who
frequent
it live. Cousin Jack and Sir George are going
into the crowd, I see.
We will leave the ladies in their seats, a few minutes,
and accompany the gentlemen on their way into the
Exchange.
I shall now show you, Sir George Templemore,
said John Effingham, what is peculiar to this
country
,
and what, if properly improved, it is truly worth
a journey across the ocean to see. You have been
at the Royal Exchange in London, and at the
Bourse
of Paris, but you have never witnessed a scene like
that which I am about to introduce you to. In Paris,
you have beheld the unpleasant spectacle of women
gambling publicly in the funds; but it was in driblets,
compared to what you will see here.
While speaking, John Effingham led the way up
stairs into the office of one of the most considerable
auctioneers. The walls were lined with maps, some
representing houses, some lots, some streets, some
entire
towns.
This is the focus of what Aristabulus Bragg calls
the town trade, said John Effingham, when fairly
confronted
with all these wonders. Here, then, you
may suit yourself with any species of real estate that
heart can desire. If a villa is wanted, there are a
dozen. Of farms, a hundred are in market; that is
merely half-a-dozen streets; and here are towns, of
dimensions and value to suit purchasers.
Explain this; it exceeds comprehension.
It is simply what it professes to be. Mr. Hammer,
do us the favour to step this way. Are you selling
today
?
Not much, sir. Only a hundred or two lots on this
island, and some six or eight farms, with one western
village.
Can you tell us the history of this particular piece
of property, Mr. Hammer?
With great pleasure, Mr. Effingham; we know
you to have means, and hope you may be induced to
purchase. This was the farm of old Volkert Van
Brunt, five years since, off of which he and his family
had made a livelihood for more than a century, by
selling milk. Two years since, the sons sold it to
Peter
Feeler for a hundred an acre; or for the total sum
of five thousand dollars. The next spring Mr. Feeler
sold it to John Search, as keen a one as we have, for
twenty-five thousand. Search sold it, at private sale,
to Nathan Rise for fifty thousand, the next week, and
Rise had parted with it, to a company, before the
purchase
,
for a hundred and twelve thousand cash. The
map ought to be taken down, for it is now eight months
since we sold it out in lots, at auction, for the gross
sum of three hundred thousand dollars. As we have
received our commission, we look at that land as out
of the market, for a time.
Have you other property, sir, that affords the same
wonderful history of a rapid advance in value? asked
the baronet.
These walls are covered with maps of estates in
the same predicament. Some have risen two or three
thousand per cent. within five years, and some only a
few hundred. There is no calculating in the matter,
for it is all fancy.
And on what is this enormous increase in value
founded?Does the town extend to these fields?
It goes much farther, sir; that is to say, on paper.
In the way of houses, it is still some miles short of
them. A good deal depends on what you
call
a thing,
in this market. Now, if old Volkert Van Brunt's
property
had been still called a farm, it would have brought
a farm price; but, as soon as it was surveyed into lots,
and mapped
Mapped!
Yes, sir; brought into visible lines, with feet and
inches. As soon as it was properly mapped, it rose to
its just value. We have a good deal of the bottom of
the sea that brings fair prices in consequence of being
well mapped.
Here the gentlemen expressed their sense of the
auctioneer's politeness, and retired.
We will now go into the sales-room, said John
Effingham, where you shall judge of the spirit, or
energy
, as it is termed, which, at this moment, actuates
this great nation.
Descending, they entered a crowd, where scores
were eagerly bidding against each other, in the fearful
delusion of growing rich by pushing a fancied value
to a point still higher. One was purchasing ragged
rocks, another the bottom of rivers, a third a bog, and
all on the credit of maps. Our two observers
remained
some time silent spectators of the scene.
When I first entered that room, said John
Effingham
,
as they left the place, it appeared to me to be
filled with maniacs. Now, that I have been in it
several
times, the impression is not much altered.
And all those persons are hazarding their means
of subsistence on the imaginary estimate mentioned by
the auctioneer?
They are gambling as recklessly as he who places
his substance on the cast of the die. So completely
has the mania seized every one, that the obvious truth,
a truth which is as apparent as any other law of nature,
that nothing can be sustained without a foundation, is
completely overlooked, and he who should now
proclaim
,
in this building, principles that bitter experience
will cause every man to feel, within the next few years,
would be happy if he escaped being stoned. I have
witnessed many similar excesses in the way of
speculations
;
but never an instance as gross, as wide-spread,
and as alarming as this.
You apprehend serious consequences, then, from
the reaction?
In that particular, we are better off than older
nations
,
the youth and real stamina of the country
averting
much of the danger; but I anticipate a terrible
blow, and that the day is not remote when this town
will awake to a sense of its illusion. What you see
here is but a small part of the extravagance that exists,
for it pervades the whole community, in one shape or
another. Extravagant issues of paper-money,
inconsiderate
credits that commence in Europe, and extend
throughout the land, and false notions as to the value
of their possessions, in men who five years since had
nothing, has completely destroyed the usual balance of
things, and money has got to be so completely the end
of life, that few think of it as a means. The history
of the world, probably, cannot furnish a parallel
instance
,
of an extensive country that is so absolutely
under this malign influence, as is the fact with our own
at this present instant. All principles are swallowed
up in the absorbing desire for gain; national honour,
permanent security, the ordinary rules of society, law,
the constitution, and every thing that is usually so dear
to men, are forgotten, or are perverted, in order to
sustain this unnatural condition of things.
This is not only extraordinary, but it is fearful!
It is both. The entire community is in the
situation
of a man who is in the incipient stages of an
exhilarating
intoxication, and who keeps pouring down
glass after glass, in the idle notion that he is merely
sustaining nature in her ordinary functions. This
wide-spread infatuation extends from the coast to the
extremest frontiers of the west; for, while there is a
justifiable foundation for a good deal of this fancied
prosperity, the true is so interwoven with the false, that
none but the most observant can draw the distinction;
and, as usual, the false predominates.
By your account, sir, the tulip mania of Holland
was trifling compared to this?
That was the same in principle as our own, but
insignificant in extent. Could I lead you through these
streets, and let you into the secret of the interests,
hopes, infatuations and follies that prevail in the human
breast, you, as a calm spectator, would be astonished
at the manner in which your own species can be
deluded
.
But let us move, and something may still occur
to offer an example.
Mr. EffinghamI beg pardonMr. Effingham,
said a very gentlemanly-looking merchant, who was
walking about the hall of the exchange, what do
you think now of our French quarrel?
I have told you, Mr. Bale, all I have to say on that
subject. When in France, I wrote you that it was not
the intention of the French government to comply with
the treaty; you have since seen this opinion justified
in the result; you have the declaration of the French
minister of state, that, without an apology from this
government, the money will not be paid; and I have
given it as my opinion, that the vane on yonder steeple
will not turn more readily than all this policy will be
abandoned, should any thing occur in Europe to render
it necessary, or could the French ministry believe it
possible for this country to fight for a principle. These
are my opinions, in all their phases, and you may
compare
them with facts and judge for yourself.
It is all General Jackson, sirall that monster's
doings. But for his message, Mr. Effingham, we should
have had the money long ago.
But for his message, or some equally decided step,
Mr. Bale, you would never have it.
Ah, my dear sir, I know your intentions, but I fear
you are prejudiced against that excellent man, the King
of France! Prejudice, Mr. Effingham, is a sad
innovator
on justice.
Here Mr. Bale shook his head, laughed, and
disappeared
in the crowd, perfectly satisfied that John
Effingham
was a prejudiced man, and that he, himself,
was only liberal and just.
Now, that is a man who wants for neither abilities
nor honesty, and yet he permits his interests, and the
influence of this very speculating mania, to
overshadow
all his sense of right, facts plain as noon-day, and
the only principles that can rule a country in safety.
He apprehends war, and has no desire to believe
even facts, so long as they serve to increase the
danger
.
Precisely so; for even prudence gets to be a
perverted
quality, when men are living under an
infatuation
like that which now exists. These men live like
the fool who says there is no death.
Here the gentlemen rejoined the ladies, and the
carriages
drove through a succession of narrow and
crooked streets, that were lined with warehouses filled
with the products of the civilized world.
Very much of all this is a part of the same
lamentable
illusion, said John Effingham, as the
carriages
made their way slowly through the encumbered
streets. The man who sells his inland lots at a profit,
secured by credit, fancies himself enriched, and he
extends
his manner of living in proportion; the boy from
the country becomes a merchant, or what is here called
a merchant, and obtains a credit in Europe a hundred
times exceeding his means, and caters to these fancied
wants; and thus is every avenue of society thronged
with adventurers, the ephemera of the same wide-spread
spirit of reckless folly. Millions in value pass out of
these streets, that go to feed the vanity of those who
fancy themselves wealthy, because they hold some
ideal pledges for the payment of advances in price
like those mentioned by the auctioneer, and which
have some such security for the eventual payment, as
one can find in
calling
a thing, that is really worth a
dollar, worth a hundred.
Are the effects of this state of things apparent in
your ordinary associations?
In every thing. The desire to grow suddenly rich
has seized on all classes. Even women and clergymen
are infected, and we exist under the active control of
the most corrupting of all influences`the love of
money.' I should despair of the country altogether,
did I not feel certain that the disease is too violent to
last, and entertain a hope that the season of calm
reflection
and of repentance, that is to follow, will be in
proportion to its causes.
After taking this view of the town, the party
returned
to Hudson Square, where the baronet dined, it
being his intention to go to Washington on the following
day. The leave-taking in the evening was kind and
friendly; Mr. Effingham, who had a sincere regard for
his late fellow-traveller, cordially inviting him to visit
him in the mountains in June.
As Sir George took his leave, the bells began to ring
for a fire. In New-York one gets so accustomed to
these alarms, that near an hour had passed before any
of the Effingham family began to reflect on the long
Vol. I.11
continuance of the cries. A servant was then sent
out to ascertain the reason, and his report made the
matter more serious than usual.
We believe that in the frequency of these
calamities
,
the question lies between Constantinople and
New-York
.
It is a common occurrence for twenty or thirty
buildings to be burnt down, in the latter place, and for
the residents of the same ward to remain in ignorance
of the circumstance, until enlightened on the fact by
the daily prints; the constant repetition of the alarms
hardening the ear and the feelings against the appeal.
A fire of greater extent than common, had occurred
only a night or two previously to this; and a rumour
now prevailed, that the severity of the weather, and
the condition of the hoses and engines, rendered the
present danger double. On hearing this intelligence,
the Messrs. Effinghams wrapped themselves up in their
over-coats, and went together into the streets.
This seems something more than usual, Ned, said
John Effingham, glancing his eye upward at the lurid
vault, athwart which gleams of fiery light began to
shine; the danger is not distant, and it seems
serious
.
Following the direction of the current, they soon
found the scene of the conflagration, which was in the
very heart of those masses of warehouses, or stores,
that John Effingham had commented on, so lately. A
short street of high buildings was already completely
in flames, and the danger of approaching the enemy,
added to the frozen condition of the apparatus, the
exhaustion of the firemen from their previous efforts,
and the intense coldness of the night, conspired to
make the aspect of things in the highest degree
alarming.
The firemen of New-York have that superiority
over those of other places, that the veteran soldier
obtains over the recruit. But the best troops can be
appalled, and, on this memorable occasion, these
celebrated
firemen, from a variety of causes, became for a
time, little more than passive spectators of the terrible
scene.
There was an hour or two when all attempts at
checking the conflagration seemed really hopeless, and
even the boldest and the most persevering scarcely
knew which way to turn, to be useful. A failure of
water, the numerous points that required resistance,
the conflagration extending in all directions from a
common centre, by means of numberless irregular and
narrow streets, and the impossibility of withstanding
the intense heat, in the choked passages, soon added
despair to the other horrors of the scene.
They who stood the fiery masses, were freezing on
one side with the Greenland cold of the night, while
their bodies were almost blistered with the fierce flames
on the other. There was something frightful in this
contest of the elements, nature appearing to condense
the heat within its narrowest possible limits, as if
purposely
to increase its fierceness. The effects were
awful; for entire buildings would seem to dissolve at
their touch, as the forked flames enveloped them in
sheets of fire.
Every one being afoot, within sound of the alarm,
though all the more vulgar cries had ceased, as men
would deem it mockery to cry murder in a battle, Sir
George Templemore met his friends, on the margin of
this sea of fire. It was now drawing towards
morning
,
and the conflagration was at its height, having
already laid waste a nucleus of
blocks
, and it was
extending by many lines, in every possible direction.
Here is a fearful admonition for those who set
their hearts on riches, observed Sir George
Templemore
,
recalling the conversation of the previous day.
What, indeed, are the designs of man, as compared
with the will of Providence!
I foresee that this is
le commencement de la fin
,
returned John Effingham. The destruction is already
so great, as to threaten to bring down with it the usual
safe-guards against such losses, and one pin knocked
out of so frail and delicate a fabric, the whole will
become loose, and fall to pieces.
Will nothing be done to arrest the flames?
As men recover from the panic, their plans will
improve and their energies will revive. The wider
streets are already reducing the fire within more
certain
limits, and they speak of a favourable change of
wind. It is thought five hundred buildings have already
been consumed, in scarcely half a dozen hours.
That Exchange, which had so lately resembled a
bustling temple of Mammon, was already a dark and
sheeted ruin, its marble walls being cracked, defaced,
tottering, or fallen. It lay on the confines of the ruin,
and our party was enabled to take their position near
it, to observe the scene. All in their immediate vicinity
was assuming the stillness of desolation, while the
flushes of fierce light in the distance marked the
progress
of the conflagration. Those who knew the
localities, now began to speak of the natural or
accidental
barriers, such as the water, the slips, and the
broader streets, as the only probable means of
arresting
the destruction. The crackling of the flames grew
distant fast, and the cries of the firemen were now
scarcely audible.
At this period in the frightful scene, a party of
seamen
arrived, bearing powder, in readiness to blow up
various buildings, in the streets that possessed of
themselves
,
no sufficient barriers to the advance of the
flame. Led by their officers, these gallant fellows,
carrying in their arms the means of destruction, moved
up steadily to the verge of the torrents of fire, and
planted their kegs; laying their trains with the hardy
indifference that practice can alone create, and with
an intelligence that did infinite credit to their coolness.
This deliberate courage was rewarded with complete
success, and house crumbled to pieces after house,
under the dull explosions, happily without an accident.
From this time the flames became less ungovernable,
though the day dawned and advanced, and another
night succeeded, before they could be said to be got
fairly under, Weeks, and even months passed,
however
,
ere the smouldering ruins ceased to send up
smoke, the fierce element continuing to burn, like a
slumbering volcano, as it might be in the bowels of
the earth.
The day that succeeded this disaster, was
memorable
for the rebuke it gave the rapacious longing for
wealth. Men who had set their hearts on gold, and
who prided themselves on their possession, and on that
only, were made to feel its insanity; and they who had
walked abroad as gods, so lately, began to experience
how utterly insignificant are the merely rich, when
stripped of their possessions. Eight hundred buildings,
containing fabrics of every kind, and the raw material
in various forms, had been destroyed, as it were in the
twinkling of an eye.
A faint voice was heard from the pulpit, and there
was a moment when those who remembered a better
state of things, began to fancy that principles would
once more assert their ascendency, and that the
community
would, in a measure, be purified. But this
expectation
ended in disappointment, the infatuation being
too wide-spread and corrupting, to be stopped by even
this check, and the rebuke was reserved for a form
that seems to depend on a law of nature, that of
causing a vice to bring with it its own infallible
punishment
.
11 *
CHAPTER VIII.
First, tell me, have you ever been at Pisa.
Shakspeare
.
The
conflagration alluded to, rather than described,
in the proceeding chapter, threw a gloom over the
gaieties of New-York, if that ever could be properly
called gay, which was little more than a strife in
prodigality
and parade, and leaves us little more to say
of the events of the winter. Eve regretted very little
the interruption to scenes in which she had found no
pleasure, however much she lamented the cause; and
she and Grace passed the remainder of the season
quietly, cultivating the friendship of such women as
Mrs. Hawker and Mrs. Bloomfield, and devoting hours
to the improvement of their minds and tastes, without
ever again venturing however, within the hallowed
precincts of such rooms as those of Mrs. Legend.
One consequence of a state of rapacious infatuation,
like that which we have just related, is the intensity
of selfishness which smothers all recollection of the
past, and all just anticipations of the future, by
condensing
life, with its motives and enjoyments, into the
present moment. Captain Truck, therefore, was soon
forgotten, and the literati, as that worthy seaman had
termed the associates of Mrs. Legend, remained just
as vapid, as conceited, as ignorant, as imitative, as
dependent, and as provincial as ever.
As the season advanced, our heroine began to look
with longings towards the country. The town life of
an American offers little to one accustomed to a town
life in older and more permanently regulated
communities
;
and Eve was already heartily weary of
crowded
and noisy balls, (for a few were still given;)
belles
,
the struggles of an uninstructed taste, and a
representation
in which extravagance was so seldom relieved
by the elegance and convenience of a condition of
society, in which more attention is paid to the fitness
of things.
The American spring is the least pleasant of its four
seasons, its character being truly that of winter
lingering
in the lap of May. Mr. Effingham, who the
reader will probably suspect, by this time, to be a
descendant
of a family of the same name, that we have
had occasion to introduce into another work, had sent
orders to have his country residence prepared for the
reception of our party; and it was with a feeling of
delight
that Eve stepped on board a steam-boat to escape
from a town that, while it contains so much that is
worthy of any capital, contains so much more that is
unfit for any place, in order to breathe the pure air,
and to enjoy the tranquil pleasure of the country. Sir
George Templemore had returned from his southern
journey, and made one of the party, by express
arrangement
.
Now, Eve, said Grace Van Cortlandt, as the boat
glided along the wharves, if it were any person but
you, I should feel confident of having something to
show that
would
extort admiration.
You are safe enough, in that respect, for a more
imposing object in its way, than this very vessel, eye
of mine, never beheld. It is positively the only thing
that deserves the name of magnificent I have yet
seen, since our return,unless, indeed, it may be
magnificent
projects.
I am glad, dear coz, there is this one magnificent
object, then, to satisfy a taste so fastidious.
As Grace's little foot moved, and her voice betrayed
vexation, the whole party smiled; for the whole party,
while it felt the justice of Eve's observation, saw the
real feeling that was at the bottom of her cousin's
remark
.
Sir George, however, though he could not
conceal
from himself the truth of what had been said by
the one party, and the weakness betrayed by the other,
had too much sympathy for the provincial patriotism
of one so young and beautiful, not to come to the
rescue
.
You should remember, Miss Van Cortlandt, he
said, that Miss Effingham has not had the advantage
yet of seeing the Delaware, Philadelphia, the noble
bays of the south, nor so much that is to be found out
of the single town of New-York.
Very true, and I hope yet to see her a sincere
penitent
for all her unpatriotic admissions against her own
country.
You
have seen the Capitol, Sir George
Templemore
;
is it not, truly, one of the finest edifices of the
world?
You will except St. Peter's, surely, my child,
observed
Mr. Effingham, smiling, for he saw that the
baronet was embarrassed to give a ready answer.
And the Cathedral at Milan, said Eve, laughing.
Et le Louvre!
cried Mademoiselle Viefville, who
had some such admiration for every thing Parisian,
as Eve had for every thing American.
And, most especially, the north-east corner of the
south-west end of the north-west wing of Versailles,
said John Effingham, in his usual dry manner.
I see you are all against me, Grace rejoined,
but I hope, one day, to be able to ascertain for
myself
the comparative merits of things. As nature makes
rivers, I hope the Hudson, at least, will not be found
unworthy of your admiration, gentlemen and ladies.
You are safe enough, there, Grace, observed Mr.
Effingham; for few rivers, perhaps no river, offers so
great and so pleasing a variety, in so short a distance,
as this.
It was a lovely, bland morning, in the last week of
May; and the atmosphere was already getting the soft
hues of summer, or assuming the hazy and solemn calm
that renders the season so quiet and soothing, after the
fiercer strife of the elements. Under such a sky, the
Palisadoes, in particular, appeared well; for, though
wanting in the terrific grandeur of an Alpine nature,
and perhaps disproportioned to the scenery they
adorned
,
they were bold and peculiar.
The great velocity of the boat added to the charm
of the passage, the scene scarce finding time to pall
on the eye; for, no sooner was one object examined
in its outlines, than it was succeeded by another.
An extraordinary taste is afflicting this country, in
the way of architecture, said Mr. Effingham, as they
stood gazing at the eastern shore; nothing but a
Grecian
temple being now deemed a suitable residence
for a man, in these classical times. Yonder is a
structure
,
for instance, of beautiful proportions, and, at this
distance, apparently of a precious material, and yet it
seems better suited to heathen worship than to
domestic
comfort.
The malady has infected the whole nation,
returned
his cousin, like the spirit of speculation. We
are passing from one extreme to the other, in this, as
in other things. One such temple, well placed in a
wood, might be a pleasant object enough, but to see a
river lined with them, with children trundling hoops
before their doors, beef carried into their kitchens, and
smoke issuing, moreover, from those unclassical
objects
chimnies, is too much even of a high taste; one
might as well live in a fever. Mr. Aristabulus Bragg,
who is a wag in his way, informs me that there is one
town in the interior that has actually a market-house
on the plan of the Parthenon!
Il Capo di Bove
would be a more suitable model
for such a structure, said Eve, smiling. But I think
I have heard that the classical taste of our architects
is any thing but rigid.
This
was
the case, rather than
is
, returned John
Effingham, as witness all these temples. The
country
has made a quick and a great
pas, en avant
, in the
way of the fine arts, and the fact shows what might
be done with so ready a people, under a suitable
direction
.
The stranger who comes among us is apt to
hold the art of the nation cheap, but, as all things are
comparative, let him inquire into its state ten years
since, and look at it to-day. The fault just now, is
perhaps to consult the books too rigidly, and to trust
too little to invention; for no architecture, and
especially
no domestic architecture, can ever be above
serious
reproach, until climate, the uses of the edifice, and
the situation, are respected as leading considerations.
Nothing can be uglier,
per se
, than a Swiss cottage, or
any thing more beautiful under its precise
circumstances
.
As regards these mushroom temples, which
are the offspring of Mammon, let them be dedicated
to whom they may, I should exactly reverse the
opinion
,
and say, that while nothing can be much more
beautiful,
per se
, nothing can be in worse taste, than to
put them where they are.
We shall have an opportunity of seeing what Mr.
John Effingham can do in the way of architecture,
said Grace, who loved to revenge some of her fancied
wrongs, by turning the tables on her assailant, for I
understand he has been improving on the original
labours of that notorious Palladio, Master Hiram
Doolittle
!
The whole party laughed, and every eye was turned
on the gentleman alluded to, expecting his answer.
You will remember, good people, answered the
accused by implication, that my plans were handed
over to me from my great predecessor, and that they
were originally of the composite order. If, therefore,
the house should turn out to be a little complex and
mixed, you will do me the justice to remember this
important fact. At all events, I have consulted
comfort
;
and that I would maintain, in the face of
Vitruvius
himself, is a
sine qu non
in domestic
architecture
.
I took a run into Connecticut the other day, said
Sir George Templemore, and, at a place called New
Haven, I saw the commencement of a taste that bids
fair to make a most remarkable town. It is true, you
cannot expect structures of much pretension in the
way of cost and magnitude in this country, but, so far
as fitness and forms are concerned, if what I hear be
true, and the next fifty years do as much in proportion
for that little city, as I understand has been done in the
last five, it will be altogether a wonder in its way.
There are some abortions, it is true, but there are also
some little jewels.
The baronet was rewarded for this opinion, by a
smile from Grace, and the conversation changed. As
the boat approached the mountains, Eve became
excited
,
a very American state of the system by the way,
and Grace still more anxious.
The view of that bluff is Italian; said our
heroine
,
pointing down the river at a noble headland of
rock, that loomed grandly in the soft haze of the
tranquil
atmosphere. One seldom sees a finer or a softer
outline on the shores of the Mediterranean itself.
But the Highlands, Eve! whispered the uneasy
Grace. We are entering the mountains.
The river narrowed suddenly, and the scenery
became
bolder, but neither Eve nor her father expressed
the rapture that Grace expected.
I must confess, Jack, said the mild, thoughtful Mr.
Effingham, that these rocks strike my eyes as much
less imposing than formerly. The passage is fine,
beyond
question, but it is hardly grand scenery.
You never uttered a juster opinion, Ned, though
after your eye loses some of the forms of the Swiss
and Italian lakes, and of the shores of Italy, you will
think better of these. The Highlands are
remarkable
for their surprises, rather than for their grandeur,
as we shall presently see. As to the latter, it is an
affair of feet and inches, and is capable of arithmetical
demonstration. We have often been on lakes, beneath
beetling cliffs of from three to six thousand feet in
height; whereas, here, the greatest elevation is
materially
less than two. But, Sir George Templemore,
and you, Miss Effingham, do me the favour to
combine
your cunning, and tell me whence this stream
cometh, and whither we are to go?
The boat had now approached a point where the
river was narrowed to a width not much exceeding a
quarter of a mile, and in the direction in which it was
steering, the water seemed to become still more
contracted
until they were lost in a sort of bay, that
appeared
to be closed by high hills, through which,
however
,
there were traces of something like a passage.
The land in that direction looks as if it had a
ravine-like
entrance, said the baronet; and yet it is
scarcely possible that a stream like this can flow
there!
If the Hudson truly passes through those
mountains
,
said Eve, I will concede all in its favour that
you can ask, Grace.
Where else can it pass? demanded Grace,
exultingly
.
Sure enoughI see no other place, and that seems
insufficient.
The two strangers to the river now looked curiously
around them, in every direction. Behind them was a
broad and lake-like basin, through which they had just
passed; on the left, a barrier of precipitous hills, the
elevation of which was scarcely less than a thousand
feet; on their right, a high but broken country, studded
with villas, farm-houses, and hamlets; and in their
front the deep but equivocal bay mentioned.
I see no escape! cried the baronet, gaily, unless
indeed, it be by returning.
A sudden and broad sheer of the boat caused him
to turn to the left, and then they whirled round an
angle of the precipice, and found themselves in a reach
of the river, between steep declivities, running at right
angles to their former course.
This is one of the surprises of which I spoke,
said John Effingham, and which render the highlands
so
unique;
for, while the Rhine is very sinuous, it has
nothing like this.
The other travellers agreed in extolling this and
many similar features of the scenery, and Grace was
delighted; for, warm-hearted, affectionate, and true,
Grace loved her country like a relative or a friend,
and took an honest pride in hearing its praises. The
patriotism of Eve, if a word of a meaning so lofty
can be applied to feelings of this nature, was more
discriminating from necessity, her tastes having been
formed in a higher school, and her means of
comparison
being so much more ample. At West Point they
stopped for the night, and here every body was in
honest raptures; Grace, who had often visited the
place before, being actually the least so of the whole
party.
Now, Eve, I know that you
do
love your country,
she said, as she slipped an arm affectionately through
that of her cousin. This is feeling and speaking like
an American girl, and as Eve Effingham should!
Eve laughed, but she had discovered that the
provincial
feeling was so strong in Grace, that its
discussion
would probably do no good. She dwelt,
therefore
,
with sincere eloquence on the beauties of the
place, and for the first time since they had met, her
cousin felt as if there was no longer any point of
dissension
between them.
The following morning was the first of June, and it
was another of those drowsy, dreamy days, that so
much aid a landscape. The party embarked in the
first boat that came up, and as they entered Newburgh
bay, the triumph of the river was established. This is
a spot, in sooth, that has few equals in any region,
though Eve still insisted that the excellence of the
view was in its softness rather than in its grandeur.
The country-houses, or boxes, for few could claim to
Vol. I.12
be much more, were neat, well placed, and exceedingly
numerous. The heights around the town of Newburgh,
in particular, were fairly dotted with them, though Mr.
Effingham shook his head as he saw one Grecian
temple
appear after another.
As we recede from the influence of the vulgar
architects, he said, we find imitation taking the
place of instruction. Many of these buildings are
obviously disproportioned, and then, like vulgar
pretension
of any sort, Grecian architecture produces less
pleasure than even Dutch.
I am surprised at discovering how little of a Dutch
character remains in this state, said the baronet; I
can scarcely trace that people in any thing, and yet, I
believe, they had the moulding of your society, having
carried the colony through its infancy.
When you know us better, you will be surprised
at discovering how little of any thing remains a
dozen years, returned John Effingham. Our towns
pass away in generations like their people, and even
the names of a place undergo periodical mutations, as
well as every thing else. It is getting to be a
predominant
feeling in the American nature, I fear, to
love change.
But, cousin Jack, do you not overlook causes, in
your censure. That a nation advancing as fast as this
in wealth and numbers, should desire better structures
than its fathers had either the means or the taste to
build, and that names should change with persons, are
both things quite in rule.
All very true, though it does not account for the
peculiarity I mean. Take Templeton, for instance;
this little place has not essentially increased in
numbers
,
within my memory, and yet fully one-half its
names are new. When he reaches his own home, your
father will not know even the names of one-half his
neighbours. Not only will he meet with new faces,
but he will find new feelings, new opinions in the place
of traditions that he may love, an indifference to every
thing but the present moment, and even those who may
have better feelings, and a wish to cherish all that
belongs
to the holier sentiments of man, afraid to utter
them, lest they meet with no sympathy.
No cats, as Mr. Bragg would say.
Jack is one who never paints
en beau
, said Mr.
Effingham. I should be very sorry to believe that a
dozen short years can have made all these essential
changes in my neighbourhood.
A dozen years, Ned! You name an age. Speak
of three or four, if you wish to find any thing in
America where you left it! The whole country is in
such a constant state of mutation, that I can only
liken it to that game of children, in which as one quits
his corner, another runs into it, and he that finds no
corner to get into, is the laughing-stock of the others.
Fancy that dwelling the residence of one man from
childhood to old age; let him then quit it for a year
or two, and on his return he would find another in
possession, who would treat him as an impertinent
intruder, because he had been absent two years. An
American `always,' in the way of usages, extends no
further back than eighteen months. In short, every
thing is condensed into the present moment; and
services
,
character, for evil as well as good unhappily,
and all other things, cease to have weight, except as
they influence the interests of the day.
This is the colouring of a professed cynic,
observed
Mr. Effingham, smiling.
But the law, Mr. John Effingham, eagerly
inquired
the baronetsurely the law would not permit
a stranger to intrude in this manner on the rights of
an owner.
The law-
books
would do him that friendly office,
perhaps, but what is a precept in the face of practices
so ruthless. `
Les absents ont toujours tort
,' is a maxim
of peculiar application in America.
Property is as secure in this country as in any
other, Sir George; and you will make allowances for
the humours of the present annotator.
Well, well, Ned; I hope you will find every thing
couleur de rose
, as you appear to expect. You will get
quiet possession of your house, it is true, for I have
put a Cerberus in it, that is quite equal to his task,
difficult as it may be, and who has quite as much
relish for a bill of costs, as any squatter can have for
a trespass; but without some such guardian of your
rights, I would not answer for it, that you would not
be compelled to sleep in the high-way.
I trust Sir George Templemore knows how to
make allowances for Mr. John Effingham's pictures,
cried Grace, unable to refrain from expressing her
discontent any longer.
A laugh succeeded, and the beauties of the river again
attracted their attention. As the boat continued to
ascend
,
Mr. Effingham triumphantly affirmed that the
appearance of things more than equalled his
expectations
,
while both Eve and the baronet declared that a
succession of lovelier landscapes could hardly be
presented
to the eye.
Whited sepulchres! muttered John Effingham
all outside. Wait until you get a view of the
deformity
within.
As the boat approached Albany, Eve expressed her
satisfaction in still stronger terms; and Grace was
made perfectly happy, by hearing her and Sir George
declare that the place entirely exceeded their
expectations
.
I am glad to find, Eve, that you are so fast
recovering
your American feelings, said her beautiful cousin,
after one of those expressions of agreeable
disappointment
,
as they were seated at a late dinner, in an inn.
You have at last found words to praise the exterior
of Albany; and I hope, by the time we return, you
will be disposed to see New-York with different eyes.
I expected to see a capital in New-York, Grace,
and in this I have been grievously disappointed.
Instead
of finding the tastes, tone, conveniences,
architecture
,
streets, churches, shops, and society of a
capital
,
I found a huge expansion of common-place things,
a commercial town, and the most mixed and the least
regulated society, that I had ever met with.
Expecting
so much, where so little was found, disappointment
was natural. But in Albany, although a political
capital
,
I knew the nature of the government too well, to
expect more than a provincial town; and in this
respect, I have found one much above the level of
similar places in other parts of the world. I
acknowledge
that Albany has as much exceeded my
expectations
in one sense, as New-York has fallen short of
them in another.
In this simple fact, Sir George Templemore, said
Mr. Effingham, you may read the real condition of
the country. In all that requires something more than
usual, a deficiency; in all that is deemed an average,
better than common. The tendency is to raise every
thing that is elsewhere degraded to a respectable
height, when there commences an attraction of
gravitation
that draws all towards the centre; a little closer
too, than could be wished perhaps.
Ay, ay, Ned; this is very pretty, with your
attractions
and gravitations; but wait and judge for
yourself
of this average, of which you now speak so
complacently
.
Nay, John, I borrowed the image from you; if it
be not accurate, I shall hold you responsible for its
defects.
They tell me, said Eve, that all American
villages
are the towns in miniature; children dressed in
hoops and wigs. Is this so, Grace?
A little; there is too much desire to imitate the
towns, perhaps, and possibly too little feeling for
country
life.
12 *
This is a very natural consequence, after all, of
people's living entirely in such places, observed Sir
George Templemore. One sees much of this on the
continent of Europe, because the country population
is purely a country population; and less of it in
England
,
perhaps, because those who are at the head of
society, consider town and country as very distinct
things.
La campagne est vraiment dlicieuse en
Amerique
,
exclaimed Mademoiselle Viefville, in whose
eyes the whole country was little more than
campagne
.
The next morning, our travellers proceeded by the
way of Schenectady, whence they ascended the
beautiful
valley of the Mohawk, by means of a canal-boat,
the cars that now rattle along its length not having
commenced their active flights, at that time. With the
scenery, every one was delighted; for while it differed
essentially from that the party had passed through the
previous day, it was scarcely less beautiful.
At a point where the necessary route diverged from
the direction of the canal, carriages of Mr.
Effingham's
were in readiness to receive the travellers, and
here they were also favoured by the presence of Mr.
Bragg, who fancied such an attention might be
agreeable
to the young ladies, as well as to his employer.
CHAPTER IX.
Tell me, where is fancy bred
Or in the heart, or in the head?
How begot, how nourished?
Song in Shakspeare
.
The
travellers were several hours ascending into the
mountains, by a country road that could scarcely be
surpassed by a French wheel-track of the same sort,
for Mademoiselle Viefville protested, twenty times in
the course of the morning, that it was a thousand pities
Mr. Effingham had not the privilege of the
corve
, that
he might cause the approach to his
terres
to be kept in
better condition. At length they reached the summit,
a point where the waters began to flow south, when
the road became tolerably level. From this time their
progress became more rapid, and they continued to
advance two or three hours longer at a steady pace.
Aristabulus now informed his companions that, in
obedience to instructions from John Effingham, he had
ordered the coachmen to take a road that led a little
from the direct line of their journey, and that they had
now been travelling for some time on the more ancient
route to Templeton.
I was aware of this, said Mr. Effingham, though
ignorant of the reason. We are on the great western
turnpike.
Certainly, sir, and all according to Mr. John's
request
.
There would have been a great saving in
distance
,
and agreeably to my notion, in horse-flesh, had
we quietly gone down the banks of the lake.
Jack will explain his own meaning, returned Mr,
Effingham, and he has stopped the other carriage,
and alighted with Sir George,a hint, I fancy, that we
are to follow their example.
Sure enough, the second carriage was now stopped,
and Sir George hastened to open its door.
Mr. John Effingham, who acts as cicerone, cried
the baronet, insists that every one shall put
pied
terre
at this precise spot, keeping the important reason
still a secret, in the recesses of his own bosom.
The ladies complied, and the carriages were ordered
to proceed with the domestics, leaving the rest of the
travellers by themselves, apparently in the heart of a
forest.
It is to be hoped, Mademoiselle, there are no
banditti
in America, said Eve, as they looked around
them at the novel situation in which they were placed,
apparently by a pure caprice of her cousin.
Ou des sauvages
, returned the governess, who, in
spite of her ordinary intelligence and great good sense,
had several times that day cast uneasy and stolen
glances into the bits of dark wood they had
occasionally
passed.
I will ensure your purses and your scalps,
mesdames
,
cried John Effingham gaily, on condition
that you will follow me implicitly; and by way of
pledge for my faith, I solicit the honour of supporting
Mademoiselle Viefville on this unworthy arm.
The governess laughingly accepted the conditions,
Eve took the arm of her father, and Sir George offered
his to Grace; Aristabulus, to his surprise, being left to
walk entirely alone. It struck him, however, as so
singularly
improper that a young lady should be supported
on such an occasion by her own father, that he frankly
and gallantly proposed to Mr. Effingham to relieve
him of his burthen, an offer that was declined with
quite as much distinctness as it was made.
I suppose cousin Jack has a meaning to his
melodrama
,
said Eve, as they entered the forest, and I
dare say, dearest father, that you are behind the scenes,
though I perceive determined secrecy in your face.
John may have a cave to show us, or some tree of
extraordinary height; such things existing in the
country.
We are very confiding, Mademoiselle, for I detect
treachery in every face around us. Even Miss Van
Cortlandt has the air of a conspirator, and seems to be
in league with something or somebody. Pray Heaven,
it be not with wolves.
Des loups!
exclaimed Mademoiselle Viefville,
stopping short, with a mien so alarmed as to excite a
general laugh
est ce qu'il y a des loups et des
sangliers
dans cette fort?
No, Mademoiselle, returned her companionthis
is only barbarous America, and not civilized France.
Were we in
le departement de la Seine
, we might
apprehend
some such dangers, but being merely in the
mountains of Ostego, we are reasonably safe.
Je l'espre
, murmured the governess, as she
reluctantly
and distrustfully proceeded, glancing her
eyes incessantly to the right and left. The path now
became steep and rather difficult; so much so, indeed,
as to indispose them all to conversation. It led
beneath
the branches of lofty pines, though there existed,
on every side of them, proofs of the ravages man had
committed in that noble forest. At length they were
compelled to stop for breath, after having ascended
considerably above the road they had left.
I ought to have said that the spot where we entered
on this path, is memorable in the family history,
observed
John Effingham, to Evefor it was the
precise
spot where one of our predecessors lodged a shot
in the shoulder of another.
Then I know precisely where we are! cried our
heroine, though I cannot yet imagine why we are led
into this forest, unless it be to visit some spot hallowed
by a deed of Natty Bumppo's!
Time will solve this mystery, as well as all others.
Let us proceed.
Again they ascended, and, after a few more minutes
of trial, they reached a sort of table-land, and drew
near an opening in the trees, where a small circle had
evidently been cleared of its wood, though it was
quite small and untilled. Eve looked curiously about
her, as did all the others to whom the place was novel,
and she was lost in doubt.
There seems to be a void beyond us, said the
baronetI rather think Mr. John Effingham has led
us to the verge of a view.
At this suggestion the party moved on in a body,
and were well rewarded for the toil of the ascent, by a
coup d'il
that was almost Swiss in character and
beauty.
Now do I know where we are, exclaimed Eve,
clasping her hands in rapturethis is the `Vision,'
and yonder, indeed, is our blessed home!
The whole artifice of the surprise was exposed, and
after the first bursts of pleasure had subsided, all to
whom the scene was novel felt, that they would not
have missed this
piquante
introduction to the valley of
the Susquehannah, on any account. That the reader
may understand the cause of so much delight, and
why John Effingham had prepared this scene for his
friends, we shall stop to give a short description of the
objects that first met the eyes of the travellers.
It is known that they were in a small open spot in a
forest, and on the verge of a precipitous mountain.
The trees encircled them on every side but one, and
on that lay the panorama, although the tops of tall
pines, that grew in lines almost parallel to the declivity,
rose nearly to a level with the eye. Hundreds of feet
beneath them, directly in front, and stretching leagues
to the right, was a lake embedded in woods and hills.
On the side next the travellers, a fringe of forest broke
the line of water; tree tops that intercepted the view
of the shores; and on the other, high broken hills, or
low mountains rather, that were covered with farms,
beautifully relieved by patches of wood, in a way to
resemble the scenery of a vast park, or a royal
pleasure
ground, limited the landscape. High valleys lay
among these uplands, and in every direction
comfortable
dwellings dotted the fields. The contrast between
the dark hues of the evergreens, with which all the
heights near the water were shaded, was in soft
contrast
to the livelier green of the other foliage, while the
meadows and pastures were luxuriant with a verdure
unsurpassed by that of England. Bays and points
added to the exquisite outline of the glassy lake on this
shore, while one of the former withdrew towards the
north-west, in a way to leave the eye doubtful whether
it was the termination of the transparent sheet or not.
Towards the south, bold, varied, but cultivated hills,
also bounded the view, all teeming with the fruits of
human labour, and yet all relieved by pieces of wood,
in the way already mentioned, so as to give the entire
region the character of park scenery. A wide, deep,
even valley, commenced at the southern end of the
lake, or nearly opposite to the stand of our travellers,
and stretched away south, until concealed by a
curvature
in the ranges of the mountains. Like all the
mountain-tops, this valley was verdant, peopled,
wooded
in places, though less abundantly than the hills, and
teeming with the signs of life. Roads wound through
its peaceful retreats, and might be traced working their
way along the glens, and up the weary ascents of the
mountains, for miles, in every direction.
At the northern termination of this lovely valley,
and immediately on the margin of the lake, lay the
village of Templeton, immediately under the eyes of
the party. The distance, in an air line, from their
stand to the centre of the dwellings, could not be much
less than a mile, but the air was so pure, and the day
so calm, that it did not seem so far. The children and
even the dogs were seen running about the streets,
while the shrill cries of boys at their gambols,
ascended
distinctly to the ear.
As this was the Templeton of the Pioneers, and the
progress of society during half a century is connected
with the circumstance, we shall give the reader a more
accurate notion of its present state, than can be
obtained
from incidental allusions. We undertake the
office more readily because this is not one of those
places that shoot up in a day, under the unnatural
efforts of speculation, or which, favoured by peculiar
advantages in the way of trade, becomes a precocious
city, while the stumps still stand in its streets; but a
sober county town, that has advanced steadily,
pari
passu
with the surrounding country, and offers a fair
specimen of the more regular advancement of the
whole nation, in its progress towards civilization.
The appearance of Templeton, as seen from the
height where it is now exhibited to the reader, was
generally
beautiful and map-like. There might be a
dozen
streets, principally crossing each other at
right-angles
,
though sufficiently relieved from this precise
delineation, to prevent a starched formality. Perhaps
the greater part of the buildings were painted white, as
is usual in the smaller American towns; though a better
taste was growing in the place, and many of the
dwellings
had the graver and chaster hues of the grey
stones of which they were built. A general air of
neatness and comfort pervaded the place, it being as
unlike a continental European town, south of the Rhine,
in this respect, as possible, if indeed we except the
picturesque
bourgs of Switzerland. In England,
Templeton
would be termed a small market-town, so far as
size was concerned; in France, a large
bourg;
while
in America it was, in common parlance, and legal
appellation
,
styled a village.
Of the dwellings of the place, fully twenty were of
a quality that denoted ease in the condition of their
occupants
,
and bespoke the habits of those accustomed
to live in a manner superior to the
oi polloi
of the
human
race. Of these, some six or eight had small lawns,
carriage sweeps, and the other similar appliances of
houses that were not deemed unworthy of the honour
of bearing names of their own. No less than five
little
steeples, towers, or belfries, for neither word is
exactly
suitable to the architectural prodigies we wish to
describe, rose above the roofs, denoting the sites of the
same number of places of worship; an American
village
usually exhibiting as many of these proofs of
liberty
of conscience
caprices of conscience
would
perhaps
be a better termas dollars and cents will by
any process render attainable. Several light carriages,
such as were suitable to a mountainous country, were
passing to and fro in the streets; and, here and there,
a single-horse vehicle was fastened before the door of
a shop, or a lawyer's office, denoting the presence of
some customer, or client, from among the adjacent
hills.
Templeton was not sufficiently a thoroughfare to
possess one of those monstrosities, a modern American
tavern, or a structure whose roof should overtop that
of all its neighbours. Still its inns were of respectable
size, well piazzaed, to use a word of our own
invention
,
and quite enough frequented.
Near the centre of the place, in grounds of rather
limited extent, still stood that model of the composite
order, which owed its existence to the combined
knowledge
and taste, in the remoter ages of the region, of
Mr. Richard Jones and Mr. Hiram Doolittle. We
will not say that it had been modernized, for the very
reverse was the effect, in appearance at least; but, it
had since undergone material changes, under the more
instructed intelligence of John Effingham.
This building was so conspicuous by position and
size, that as soon as they had taken in glimpses of the
entire landscape, which was not done without constant
murmurs of pleasure, every eye became fastened on it,
as the focus of interest. A long and common silence
denoted how general was this feeling, and the whole
party took seats on stumps and fallen trees before a
syllable was uttered, after the building had attracted
their gaze. Aristabulus alone permitted his look to
wander, and he was curiously examining the
countenance
of Mr. Effingham, near whom he sate, with a
longing to discover whether the expression was that of
approbation, or of disapprobation, of the fruits of his
cousin's genius.
Mr. John Effingham has considerably regenerated
and revivified, not to say transmogrified, the old
dwelling
,
he said, cautiously using terms that might leave
his own opinion of the changes doubtful. The
work of his hand has excited some speculation,
a good deal of inquiry, and a little conversation,
Vol. I.  13
throughout the country. It has almost produced an
excitement!
As my house came to me from my father, said
Mr. Effingham, across whose mild and handsome face
a smile was gradually stealing, I knew its history,
and when called on for an explanation of its
singularities
,
could refer all to the composite order. But, you,
Jack, have supplanted all this, by a style of your own,
for which I shall be compelled to consult the
authorities
for explanations.
Do you dislike my taste, Ned?To my eye, now,
the structure has no bad appearance from this spot!
Fitness and comfort are indispensable requisites
for domestic architecture, to use your own argument.
Are you quite sure that yonder castellated roof, for
instance
,
is quite suited to the deep snows of these
mountains
?
John Effingham whistled, and endeavoured to look
unconcerned, for he well knew that the very first
winter
had demonstrated the unsuitableness of his plans
for such a climate. He had actually felt disposed to
cause the whole to be altered privately, at his own
expense
;
but, besides feeling certain his cousin would
resent a liberty that inferred his indisposition to
pay for his own buildings, he had a reluctance to
admit
,
in the face of the whole country, that he had made
so capital a mistake, in a branch of art in which he
prided himself rather more than common; almost as
much as his predecessor in the occupation, Mr.
Richard
Jones.
If you are not pleased with your own dwelling,
Ned, he answered, you can have, at least, the
consolation
of looking at some of your neighbours' houses,
and of perceiving that they are a great deal worse off.
Of all abortions of this sort, to my taste, a Grecian
abortion is the worstmine is only Gothic, and that
too, in a style so modest, that I should think it might
pass unmolested.
It was so unusual to see John Effingham on the
defensive
,
that the whole party smiled, while Aristabulus,
who stood in salutary fear of his caustic tongue, both
smiled and wondered.
Nay, do not mistake me, John, returned the
proprietor
of the edifice under discussionit is not your
taste
that I call in question, but your provision against
the seasons. In the way of mere outward show, I really
think you deserve high praise, for you have
transformed
a very ugly dwelling into one that is almost
handsome, in despite of proportions and the necessity
of regulating the alterations by prescribed limits. Still,
I think, there is a little of the composite left about
even the exterior.
I hope, cousin Jack, you have not innovated on the
interior, cried Eve; for I think I shall remember
that, and nothing is more pleasant than the
cattism
of
seeing objects that you remember in childhood
pleasant
,
I mean, to those whom the mania of mutation has
not affected.
Do not be alarmed, Miss Effingham, replied her
kinsman, with a pettishness of manner that was
altogether
extraordinary, in a man whose mien, in
common
,
was so singularly composed and masculine;
you will find all that you knew, when a kitten, in its
proper place. I could not rake together, again, the
ashes of Queen Dido, which were scattered to the four
winds of Heaven, I fear; nor could I discover a
reasonably
good bust of Homer; but respectable
substitutes
are provided, and some of them have the great
merit of puzzling all beholders to tell to whom they
belong, which I believe was the great characteristic
of most of Mr. Jones's invention.
I am glad to see, cousin Jack, that you have, at
least, managed to give a very respectable `
cloud-colour'
to the whole house.
Ay, it lay between that and an invisible green,
the gentleman answered, losing his momentary spleen
in his natural love of the ludicrousbut finding that
the latter would be only too conspicuous in the
droughts that sometimes prevail in this climate, I
settled down into the yellowish drab, that is, indeed,
not unlike some of the richer volumes of the clouds.
On the whole, I think you are fairly entitled, as
Steadfast Dodge, Esquire, would say, to `the meed of
our thanks.'
What a lovely spot! exclaimed Mr. Effingham,
who had already ceased to think of his own dwelling,
and whose eye was roaming over the soft landscape,
athwart which the lustre of a June noontide was
throwing its richest glories. This is truly a place
where one might fancy repose and content were to be
found for the evening of a troubled life.
Indeed, I have seldom looked upon a more
bewitching
scene, answered the baronet. The lakes
of Cumberland will scarce compete with this!
Or that of Brienz, or Lungeren, or Nemi, said
Eve, smiling in a way that the other understood to be
a hit at his nationality.
C'est charmant!
murmured Mademoiselle
Viefville
.
On pense  l'ternit, dans une telle calme!
The farm you can see lying near yonder wood,
Mr. Effingham, coolly observed Aristabulus, sold
last spring for thirty dollars the acre, and was bought
for twenty, the summer before!
Chacun  son gout!
said Eve.
And yet, I fear, this glorious scene is marred by
the envy, rapacity, uncharitableness, and all the other
evil passions of man! continued the more
philosophical
Mr. Effingham. Perhaps, it were better as it was
so lately, when it lay in the solitude and peace of the
wilderness, the resort of birds and beasts.
Who prey on each other, dearest father, just as
the worst of our own species prey on their fellows.
True, childtrue. And yet, I never gaze on one
of these scenes of holy calm, without wishing that the
great tabernacle of nature might be tenanted only by
those who have a feeling for its perfection.
Do you see the lady, said Aristabulus, that is
just coming out on the lawn, in front of the `
Wigwam
?'
for that was the name John Effingham had
seen fit to give the altered and amended abode.
Here, Miss Effingham, more in a line with the top
of the pine beneath us.
I see the person you mean; she seems to be
looking
in this direction.
You are quite right, miss; she knows that we are
to stop on the Vision, and no doubt sees us. That lady
is your father's cook, Miss Effingham, and is thinking
of the late breakfast that has been ordered to be in
readiness against our arrival.
Eve concealed her amusement, for, by this time,
she had discovered that Mr. Bragg had a way peculiar
to himself, or at least to his class, of using many of the
commoner words of the English language. It would
perhaps be expecting too much of Sir George
Templemore
,
not to expect him to smile, on such an
occasion
.
Ah! exclaimed Aristabulus, pointing towards the
lake, across which several skiffs were stealing, some in
one direction, and some in another, there is a boat
out, that I think must contain the poet.
Poet! repeated John Effingham. Have we
reached that pass at Templeton?
Lord, Mr. John Effingham, you must have very
contracted notions of the place, if you think a poet a
great novelty in it. Why, sir, we have caravans of
wild beasts, nearly every summer!
This is, indeed, a step in advance, of which I was
ignorant. Here then, in a region, that so lately was
tenanted by beasts of prey, beasts are already brought
as curiosities. You perceive the state of the country in
this fact, Sir George Templemore.
13 *
I do indeed; but I should like to hear from Mr.
Bragg, what sort of animals are in these caravans?
All sorts, from monkeys to elephants. The last
had a rhinoceros.
Rhinoceros!Why there was but one, lately, in
all Europe. Neither the Zoological Gardens, nor the
Jardin des Plantes
, had a rhinoceros! I never saw
but one, and that was in a caravan at Rome, that
travelled between St. Petersburgh and Naples.
Well, sir, we have rhinoceroses here;and
monkeys
,
and zebras, and poets, and painters, and
congressmen
,
and bishops, and governors, and all other sorts
of creatures.
And who may the particular poet be, Mr. Bragg,
Eve asked, who honours Templeton, with his presence
just at this moment?
That is more than I can tell you, miss, for, though
some eight or ten of us have done little else than try to
discover his name for the last week, we have not got
even as far as that one fact. He and the gentleman
who travels with him, are both uncommonly close on
such matters, though I think we have some as good
catechisers in Templeton, as can be found any where
within fifty miles of us!
There is another gentleman with himdo you
suspect them both of being poets?
Oh, no, Miss, the other is the waiter of the poet;
that we know, as he serves him at dinner, and
otherwise
superintends his concerns; such as brushing his
clothes, and keeping his room in order.
This is being in luck for a poet, for they are of a
class that are a little apt to neglect the decencies. May
I ask why you suspect the master of being a poet, if
the man be so assiduous?
Why, what else can he be? In the first place, Miss
Effingham, he has no name.
That is a reason in point, said John Effingham;
very few poets having names.
Then he is out on the lake half his time, gazing
up at the `Silent Pine,' or conversing with the `
Speaking
Rocks,' or drinking at the `Fairy Spring.'
All suspicious, certainly; especially the dialogue
with the rocks; though not absolutely conclusive.
But, Mr. John Effingham, the man does not take
his food like other people. He rises early, and is out
on the water, or up in the forest, all the morning, and
then returns to eat his breakfast in the middle of the
forenoon; he goes into the woods again, or on the lake,
and comes back to dinner, just as I take my tea.
This settles the matter. Any man who presumes
to do all this, Mr. Bragg, deserves to be called by some
harder name, even, than that of a poet. Pray, sir,
how long has this eccentric person been a resident of
Templeton?
Histthere he is, as I am a sinner; and it was not
he and the other gentlemen that were in the boat.
The rebuked manner of Aristabulus, and the
dropping
of his voice, induced the whole party to look in
the direction of his eye, and, sure enough, a gentleman
approached them, in the dress a man of the world is
apt to assume in the country, an attire of itself that
was sufficient to attract comment in a place where the
general desire was to be as much like town as possible,
though it was sufficiently neat and simple. He came
from the forest, along the table-land that crowned the
mountain for some distance, following one of the
footpaths
that the admirers of the beautiful landscape have
made all over that pleasant wood. As he came out
into the cleared spot, seeing it already in possession
of a party, he bowed, and was passing on, with a
delicacy
that Mr. Bragg would be apt to deem eccentric,
when suddenly stopping, he gave a look of intense and
eager interest at the whole party, smiled, advanced
rapidly nearer, and discovered his entire person.
I ought not to be surprised, he said, as he advanced
so near as to render doubt any longer impossible, for
I knew you were expected, and indeed waited for your
arrival, and yet this meeting has been so unexpected
as to leave me scarcely in possession of my faculties.
It is needless to dwell upon the warmth and number
of the greetings. To the surprise of Mr. Bragg, his
poet was not only known, but evidently much esteemed
by all the party, with the exception of Miss Van
Cortlandt
,
to whom he was cordially presented by the name
of Mr. Powis. Eve managed, by an effort of womanly
pride, to suppress the violence of her emotions, and the
meeting passed off as one of mutual surprise and
pleasure
,
without any exhibition of unusual feeling to
attract
comment.
We ought to express our wonder at finding you
here before us, my dear young friend, said Mr.
Effingham
,
still holding Paul's hand affectionately between
his own; and, even now, that my own eyes assure
me of the fact, I can hardly believe you would arrive
at New-York, and quit it, without giving us the
satisfaction
of seeing you.
In that, sir, you are not wrong; certainly nothing
could have deprived me of that pleasure, but the
knowledge
that it would not have been agreeable to
yourselves
.
My sudden appearance here, however, will be
without mystery, when I tell you that I returned from
England, by the way of Quebec, the Great Lakes, and
the Falls, having been induced by my friend Ducie to
take that route, in consequence of his ship's being sent
to the St. Lawrence. A desire for novelty, and
particularly
a desire to see the celebrated cataract, which
is almost
the
lion of America, did the rest.
We are glad to have you with us on any terms,
and I take it as particularly kind, that you did not pass
my door. You have been here some days?
Quite a week. On reaching Utica I diverged from the
great route to see this place, not anticipating the
pleasure
of meeting you here so early; but hearing you were
expected, I determined to remain, with a hope, which I
rejoice to find was not vain, that you would not be
sorry to see an old fellow-traveller again.
Mr. Effingham pressed his hands warmly again,
before
he relinquished them; an assurance of welcome
that Paul received with thrilling satisfaction.
I have been in Templeton almost long enough,
the young man resumed, laughing, to set up as a
candidate
for the public favour, if I rightly understand the
claims of a denizen. By what I can gather from
casual
remarks, the old proverb that `the new broom
sweeps clean' applies with singular fidelity throughout
all this region.
Have you a copy of your last ode, or a spare
epigram
,
in your pocket? inquired John Effingham.
Paul looked surprised, and Aristabulus, for a novelty,
was a little dashed. Paul looked surprised, as a
matter
of course, for, although he had been a little annoyed
by the curiosity that is apt to haunt a village
imagination
,
since his arrival in Templeton, he did not in the
least suspect that his love of a beautiful nature had
been imputed to devotion to the muses. Perceiving,
however, by the smiles of those around him, that there
was more meant than was expressed, he had the tact
to permit the explanation to come from the person who
had put the question, if it were proper it should come
at all.
We will defer the great pleasure that is in reserve,
continued John Effingham, to another time. At
present
,
it strikes me that the lady of the lawn is getting
to be impatient, and the
djeuner  la fourchette
, that I
have had the precaution to order, is probably waiting
our appearance. It must be eaten, though under the
penalty of being thought moon-struck rhymers by the
whole State. Come, Ned; if you are sufficiently
satisfied
with looking at the Wigwam in a bird's-eye view,
we will descend and put its beauties to the severer test
of a close examination.
This proposal was readily accepted, though all tore
themselves from that lovely spot with reluctance, and
not until they had paused to take another look.
Fancy the shores of this lake lined with villas,
said Eve, church-towers raising their dark heads
among these hills; each mountain crowned with a
castle, or a crumbling ruin, and all the other
accessories
of an old state of society, and what would then
be the charms of the view!
Less than they are to-day, Miss Effingham, said
Paul Powis; for though poetry requiresyou all
smile, is it forbidden to touch on such subjects?
Not at all, so it be done in wholesome rhymes,
returned the baronet. You ought to know that you
are expected even to speak in doggerel.
Paul ceased, and the whole party walked away from
the place, laughing and light-hearted.
CHAPTER X.
It is the spot, I came to seek,
My father's ancient burial place
It is the spotI know it well.
Of which our old traditions tell.
Bryant
.
From
the day after their arrival in New-York, or
that on which the account of the arrests by the
English
cruiser had appeared in the journals, little had
been said by any of our party concerning Paul Powis,
or of the extraordinary manner in which he had left
the packet, at the very moment she was about to enter
her haven. It is true that Mr. Dodge, arrived at
Dodgeopolis, had dilated on the subject in his
hebdomadal
,
with divers additions and conjectures of his
own, and this, too, in a way to attract a good deal of
attention in the interior; but, it being a rule with those
who are supposed to dwell at the fountain of foreign
intelligence, not to receive any thing from those who
ought not to be better informed than themselves, the
Effinghams and their friends had never heard of his
account of the matter.
While all thought the incident of the sudden return
extraordinary, no one felt disposed to judge the young
man harshly. The gentlemen knew that military
censure
,
however unpleasant, did not always imply moral
unworthiness; and as for the ladies, they retained too
lively a sense of his skill and gallantry, to wish to
imagine evil on grounds so slight and vague. Still, it
had been impossible altogether to prevent the obtrusion
of disagreeable surmises, and all now sincerely rejoiced
at seeing their late companion once more among them,
seemingly in a state of mind that announced neither
guilt nor degradation.
On quitting the mountain, Mr. Effingham, who had
a tender regard for Grace, offered her his arm as he
would have given it to a second daughter, leaving Eve
to the care of John Effingham. Sir George attended
to Mademoiselle Viefville, and Paul walked by the side
of our heroine and her cousin, leaving Aristabulus to
be what he himself called a miscellaneous
companion
;
or, in other words, to thrust himself into either
set, as inclination or accident might induce. Of course
the parties conversed as they walked, though those in
advance would occasionally pause to say a word to
those in the rear; and, as they descended, one or two
changes occurred to which we may have occasion to
allude.
I trust you have had pleasant passages, said John
Effingham to Paul, as soon as they were separated in
the manner just mentioned. Three trips across the
Atlantic in so short a time would be hard duty to a
landsman, though you, as a sailor, will probably think
less of it.
In this respect I have been fortunate; the Foam,
as we know from experience, being a good traveller,
and Ducie is altogether a fine fellow and an agreeable
messmate. You know I had him for a companion
both going and coming.
This was said naturally; and, while it explained so
little directly, it removed all unpleasant uncertainty,
by assuring his listeners that he had been on good terms
at least, with the person who had seemed to be his
pursuer. John Effingham, too, well understood that
no one messed with the commander of a vessel of
war, in his own ship, who was, in any way, thought
to be an unfit associate.
You have made a material circuit to reach us, the
distance by Quebec being nearly a fourth more than
the direct road.
Ducie desired it so strongly, that I did not like to
deny him. Indeed, he made it a point, at first, to obtain
permission to land me at New-York, where he had
found me, as he said; but to this I would not listen, as
I feared it might interfere with his promotion, of which
he stood so good a chance, in consequence of his
success
in the affair of the money. By keeping constantly
before the eyes of his superiors, on duty of interest, I
thought his success would be more certain.
And has his government thought his perseverance
in the chase worthy of such a reward?
Indeed it has. He is now a post, and all owing to
his good luck and judgment in that affair; though in
his country, rank in private life does no harm to one in
public life.
Eve liked the emphasis that Paul laid on his
country
,
and she thought the whole remark was made in
a spirit that an Englishman would not be apt to
betray
.
Has it ever occurred to you, continued John
Effingham
,
that our sudden and unexpected separation,
has caused a grave neglect of duty in me, if not in both
of us?
Paul looked surprised, and, by his manner, he
demanded
an explanation.
You may remember the sealed package of poor
Mr. Monday, that we were to open together on our
arrival in New-York, and on the contents of which, we
were taught to believe depended the settling of some
important private rights. I gave that package to you,
at the moment it was received, and, in the hurry of
leaving us, you overlooked the circumstance.
All very true, and to my shame I confess that,
until
this instant, the affair has been quite forgotten by
me. I had so much to occupy my mind while in
England
,
that it was not likely to be remembered, and then
the packet itself has scarce been in my possession
since the day I left you.
It is not lost, I trust! said John Effingham quickly.
Surely notit is safe, beyond a question, in the
writing-desk in which I deposited it. But the moment
we got to Portsmouth, Ducie and myself proceeded to
London together, and, as soon as he had got through
at the Admiralty, we went into Yorkshire, where we
remained, much occupied with private matters of great
importance to us both, while his ship was docked; and
then it became necessary to make sundry visits to our
relations
Relations! repeated Eve involuntarily, though she
did not cease to reproach herself for the indiscretion,
during the rest of the walk.
Relations returned Paul, smiling. Captain
Ducie
and myself are cousins-german, and we made
pilgrimages
together, to sundry family shrines. This
duty occupied us until a few days before we sailed for
Quebec. On reaching our haven, I left the ship to
visit the great lakes and Niagara, leaving most of my
effects with Ducie, who has promised to bring them on
with himself, when he followed on my track, as he
expected
soon to do, on his way to the West Indies,
where he is to find a frigate. He owed me this
attention
,
Vol. I.  14
as he insisted, on account of having induced me
to go so far out of my way, with so much luggage, to
oblige him. The packet is, unluckily, left behind with
the other things.
And do you expect Captain Ducie to arrive in
this country soon?The affair of the packet ought
not to be neglected much longer, for a promise to a
dying man is doubly binding, as it appeals to all our
generosity. Rather than neglect the matter much
longer, I would prefer sending a special messenger to
Quebec.
That will be quite unnecessary, as, indeed, it would
be useless. Ducie left Quebec yesterday, and has sent
his and my effects direct to New-York, under the care
of his own steward. The writing-case, containing
other papers that are of interest to us both, he has
promised not to lose sight of, but it will accompany
him on the same tour, as that I have just made; for,
he wishes to avail himself of this opportunity to see
Niagara and the lakes, also: he is now on my track,
and will notify me by letter of the day he will be in
Utica, in order that we may meet on the line of the
canal, near this place, and proceed to New-York, in
company.
His companions listened to this brief statement with
an intense interest, with which the packet of poor
Mr. Monday, however, had very little connection.
John Effingham called to his cousin, and, in a few
words, stated the circumstances as they had just been
related to himself, without adverting to the papers of
Mr. Monday, which was an affair that he had hitherto
kept to himself.
It will be no more than a return of civility, if we
invite Captain Ducie to diverge from his road, and
pass a few days with us, in the mountains, he added.
At what precise time do you expect him to pass,
Powis?
Within the fortnight. I feel certain he would be
glad to pay his respects to this party, for he often
expressed his sincere regrets at having been employed
on a service that exposed the ladies to so much peril
and delay.
Captain Ducie is a near kinsman of Mr. Powis,
dear father, added Eve, in a way to show her parent,
that the invitation would be agreeable to herself, for
Mr. Effingham was so attentive to the wishes of his
daughter, as never to ask a guest to his house, that he
thought would prove disagreeable to its mistress.
I shall do myself the pleasure to write to Captain
Ducie, this evening, urging him to honour us with his
company, returned Mr. Effingham. We expect
other friends in a few days, and I hope he will not find
his time heavy on his hands, while in exile among us.
Mr. Powis will enclose my note in one of his letters,
and will, I trust, second the request by his own
solicitations
.
Paul made his acknowledgments, and the whole
party proceeded, though the interruption caused such
a change in the
figure
of the promenade, as to leave the
young man the immediate escort of Eve. The party,
by this time, had not only reached the highway, but it
had again diverged from it, to follow the line of an
old and abandoned wheel-track, that descended the
mountain, along the side of the declivity, by a wilder
and more perilous direction than suited a modern
enterprise
;
it having been one of those little calculated
and rude roads, that the first settlers of a country are
apt to make, before there are time and means to
investigate
and finish to advantage. Although much more
difficult and dangerous than its successor, as a highway,
this relic of the infant condition of the country was
by far the most retired and beautiful; and pedestrians
continued to use it, as a common foot-path to the
Vision. The seasons had narrowed its surface, and
the second growth had nearly covered it with their
branches, shading it like an arbour; and Eve expressed
ner delight with its wildness and boldness, mingled, as
both were, with so pleasant a seclusion, as they
descended
along a path as safe and convenient as a
French
alle
. Glimpses were constantly obtained of
the lake and the village, while they proceeded; and
altogether, they who were strangers to the scenery,
were loud in its praises.
Most persons, who see this valley for the first time,
observed Aristabulus, find something to say in its
favour
;
for my part, I consider it as rather curious
myself
.
Curious! exclaimed Paul; that gentleman is, at
least, singular in the choice of his expressions.
You have met him before to-day, said Eve,
laughing
,
for Eve was now in a humour to laugh at trifles.
This we know, since he had prepared us to meet a
poet, where we only find an old friend.
Only, Miss Effingham!Do you estimate poets so
high, and old friends so low?
This extraordinary person, Mr. Aristabulus Bragg,
really deranges all one's notions and opinions in such
a manner, as to destroy even the usual signification of
words, I believe. He seems so much in, and yet so
much out of his place; is both so
rus
and so
unpractised
;
so unfit for what he is, and so ready at every
thing, that I scarcely know how to apply terms in any
matter with which he has the smallest connection. I
fear he has persecuted you since your arrival in
Templeton
?
Not at all; I am so much acquainted with men of
his cast, that I have acquired a tact in managing them.
Perceiving that he was disposed to suspect me of a
disposition to `poetize the lake,' to use his own term,
I took care to drop a couple of lines, roughly written
off, like a hasty and imperfect effusion, where I felt
sure he would find them, and have been living for a
whole week on the fame thereof.
You do indulge in such tastes, then? said Eve,
smiling a little saucily.
I am as innocent of such an ambition, as of
wishing
to marry the heiress of the British throne, which,
I believe, just now, is the goal of all the Icaruses of our
own time. I am merely a rank plagiaristfor the
rhyme, on the fame of which I have rioted for a
glorious
week, was two lines of Pope's, an author so
effectually
forgotten in these palmy days of literature, in
which all knowledge seems so condensed into the
productions
of the last few years, that a man might
almost
pass off an entire classic for his own, without the
fear of detection. It was merely the first couplet of
the Essay on Man, which, fortunately, having an
allusion
to the `pride of Kings,' would pass for original,
as well as excellent, in nineteen villages in twenty in
America, in these piping times of ultra-republicanism.
No doubt Mr. Bragg thought a eulogy on the `people'
was to come next, to be succeeded by a glorious
picture
of Templeton and its environs.
I do not know that I ought to admit these hits at
liberty from a foreigner, said Eve, pretending to look
graver than she felt; for never before, in her life, had
our heroine so strong a consciousness of happiness, as
she had experienced that very morning.
Foreigner, Miss Effingham!  And why a
foreigner
?
Nay, you know your own pretended cosmopolitism;
and ought not the cousin of Captain Ducie to be an
Englishman?
I shall not answer for the
ought
, the simple fact
being a sufficient reply to the question. The cousin
of Captain Ducie is
not
an Englishman; nor, as I see
you suspect, has he ever served a day in the British
navy, or in any other navy than that of his native land.
This is indeed taking us by surprise, and that most
agreeably, returned Eve, looking up at him with
undisguised
pleasure, while a bright glow crimsoned her
face. We could not but feel an interest in one who
14 *
had so effectually served us; and both my father and
Mr. John Effingham
Cousin Jack interrupted the smiling Paul.
Cousin Jack, then, if you dislike the formality I
used; both my father and cousin Jack examined the
American navy registers for your name, without
success
,
as I understood, and the inference that followed
was fair enough, I believe you will admit.
Had they looked at a register of a few years' date,
they would have met with better luck. I have quitted
the service, and am a sailor only in recollections. For
the last few years, like yourselves, I have been a
traveller
by land as well as by water.
Eve said no more, though every syllable that the
young man uttered was received by attentive ears,
and retained with a scrupulous fidelity of memory.
They walked some distance in silence, until they
reached the grounds of a house that was beautifully
placed on the side of the mountain, near a lovely wood
of pines. Crossing these grounds, until they reached
a terrace in front of the dwelling, the village of
Templeton
lay directly in their front, perhaps a hundred
feet beneath them, and yet so near, as to render the
minutest object distinct. Here they all stopped to take
a more distinct view of a place that had so much
interest
with most of the party.
I hope you are sufficiently acquainted with the
localities to act as cicerone, said Mr. Effingham to
Paul. In a visit of a week to this village, you have
scarcely overlooked the Wigwam.
Perhaps I ought to hesitate, or rather ought to
blush to own it, answered the young man, discharging
the latter obligation by colouring to his temples; but
curiosity has proved so much stronger than manners,
that I have been induced to trespass so far on the
politeness
of this gentleman, as to gain an admission to
your dwelling, in and about which more of my time
has been passed than has probably proved agreeable
to its inmates.
I hope the gentleman will not speak of it, said
Aristabulus. In this country, we live pretty much in
common, and with me it is a rule, when a gentleman
drops in, whether stranger or neighbour, to show him
the civility to ask him to take off his hat.
It appears to me, said Eve, willing to change the
conversation, that Templeton has an unusual number
of steeples; for what purpose can so small a place
possibly require so many buildings of that nature?
All in behalf of orthodoxy, Miss Eve, returned
Aristabulus, who conceived himself to be the proper
person to answer such interrogatories. There is a
shade of opinion beneath every one of those steeples.
Do you mean, sir, that there are as many shades
of faith in Templeton, as I now see buildings that have
the appearance of being devoted to religious
purposes
?
Double the number, Miss, and some to spare, in
the bargain; for you see but five meeting-houses,
and the county-buildings, and we reckon seven
regular
hostile denominations in the village, besides the
diversities of sentiment on trifles. This edifice that
you perceive here, in a line with the chimneys of the
first house, is New St. Paul's, Mr. Grant's old church,
as orthodox a house, in its way, as there is in the
diocese
,
as you may see by the windows. This is a
gaining
concern, though there has been some falling off of
late, in consequence of the clergyman's having caught
a bad cold, which has made him a little hoarse; but I
dare say he will get over it, and the church ought not
to be abandoned on that account, serious as the matter
undoubtedly is, for the moment. A few of us are
determined
to back up New St. Paul's in this crisis, and I
make it a point to go there myself, quite half the time.
I am glad we have so much of your company,
said Mr. Effingham, for that is our own church, and
in it my daughter was baptized. But, do you divide
your religious opinions in halves, Mr. Bragg?
In as many parts, Mr. Effingham, as there are
denominations
in the neighbourhood, giving a decided
preference to New St. Paul's, notwithstanding, under
the peculiar circumstances, particularly to the windows.
The dark, gloomy-looking building, Miss, off in the
distance, yonder, is the Methodist affair, of which not
much need be said; Methodism flourishing but little
among us since the introduction of the New Lights,
who have fairly managed to out-excite them, on every
plan they can invent. I believe, however, they stick
pretty much to the old doctrine, which, no doubt, is
one great reason of their present apathetic state; for
the people do love novelties.
Pray, sir, what building is this nearly in a line
with New St. Paul's, and which resembles it a little, in
colour and form?
Windows excepted; it has two rows of regular
square-topped windows, Miss, as you may observe.
That is the First Presbyterian, or the old standard; a
very good house, and a pretty good faith, too, as times
go. I make it a point to attend there, at least once
every fortnight; for change is agreeable to the nature
of man. I will say, Miss, that my preference, so far
as I have any, however, is for New St. Paul's, and I
have experienced considerable regrets, that these
Presbyterians
have gained a material advantage over us,
in a very essential point, lately.
I am sorry to hear this, Mr. Bragg; for, being an
Episcopalian myself, and having great reliance on the
antiquity and purity of my church, I should be sorry
to find it put in the wrong by any other.
I fear we must give that point up, notwithstanding,
for these Presbyterians have entirely outwitted the
church people in that matter.
And what is the point in which we have been so
signally worsted?
Why, Miss, their new bell weighs quite a hundred
more than that of New St. Paul's, and has altogether
the best sound. I know very well that this advantage
will not avail them any thing to boast of, in the last
great account; but it makes a surprising difference in
the state of probation. You see the yellowish looking
building across the valley, with a heavy wall around
it, and a belfry? That, in its regular character, is the
county court-house, and gaol; but, in the way of
religion
,
it is used pretty much miscellaneously.
Do you mean, really, sir, that divine service is
ever actually performed in it, or that persons of all
denominations are occasionally tried there?
It would be truer to say that all denominations
occasionally try the court-house, said Aristabulus,
simpering; for I believe it has been used in this way
by every shade of religion short of the Jews. The
Gothic tower in wood, is the building of the
Universalists
;
and the Grecian edifice, that is not yet painted,
the Baptists. The Quakers, I believe, worship chiefly
at home, and the different shades of the Presbyterians
meet, in different rooms, in private houses, about the
place.
Are there then shades of difference in the
denominations
,
as well as all these denominations? asked
Eve, in unfeigned surprise; and this, too, in a
population
so small?
This is a free county, Miss Eve, and freedom loves
variety. `Many men, many minds.'
Quite true, sir, said Paul; but here are many
minds among few men. Nor is this all; agreeably to
your own account, some of these men do not exactly
know their own minds. But, can you explain to us
what essential points are involved in all these shades
of opinion?
It would require a life, sir, to understand the half
of them. Some say that excitement is religion, and
others, that it is contentment. One set cries up
practice
,
and another cries out against it. This man
maintains
that he will be saved if he does good, and that
man affirms that if he only does good, he will be
damned; a little evil is necessary to salvation, with
one shade of opinion, while another thinks a man is
never so near conversion as when he is deepest in sin.
Subdivision is the order of the day, added John
Effingham; every county is to be subdivided that
there may be more county towns, and county offices;
every religion decimated, that there may be a greater
variety and a better quality of saints.
Aristabulus nodded his head, and he would have
winked, could he have presumed to take such a liberty
with a man he held as much in habitual awe, as John
Effingham.
Monsieur
, inquired Mademoiselle Viefville, is
there no
glise
, no
vritable glise
, in Templeton?
Oh, yes, Madame, several, returned Aristabulus,
who would as soon think of admitting that he did not
understand the meaning of
vritable glise
, as one of
the sects he had been describing would think of
admitting
that it was not infallible in its interpretation of
Christianityseveral; but they are not be seen from
this particular spot.
How much more picturesque would it be, and
even christian-like in appearance, at least, said Paul,
could these good people consent to unite in
worshipping
God!and how much does it bring into strong
relief, the feebleness and ignorance of man, when you
see him splitting hairs about doctrines, under which he
has been told, in terms as plain as language can make
it, that he is simply required to believe in the
goodness
and power of a Being whose nature and agencies
exceed his comprehension.
All very true, cried John Effingham, but what
would become of liberty of conscience in such a case?
Most men, now-a-days, understand by faith, a firm
reliance
on their own opinions!
In that case, too, put in Aristabulus, we should
want this handsome display of churches to adorn our
village. There is good comes of it; for any man
would be more likely to invest in a place that has five
churches, than in a place with but one. As it is,
Templeton
has as beautiful a set of churches as any village
I know.
Say, rather, sir, a set of castors; for a stronger
resemblance to vinegar-cruets and mustard-pots, than
is borne by these architectural prodigies, eye never
beheld.
It is, nevertheless, a beautiful thing, to see the high
pointed roof of the house of God, crowning an
assemblage
of houses, as one finds it in other countries,
said Eve, instead of a pile of tavern, as is too much
the case in this dear home of ours.
When this remark was uttered, they descended the
step that led from the terrace, and proceeded towards
the village. On reaching the gate of the Wigwam,
the whole party stood confronted with that offspring
of John Effingham's taste; for so great had been his
improvements on the original production of Hiram
Doolittle, that externally, at least, that distinguished
architect could no longer have recognized the fruits of
his own talents.
This is carrying out to the full, John, the conceits
of the composite order, observed Mr. Effingham,
drily.
I shall be sorry, Ned, if you dislike your house, as
it is amended and corrected.
Dear cousin Jack, cried Eve, it is an odd jumble
of the Grecian and Gothic. One would like to know
your authorities for such a liberty.
What do you think of the
facade
of the cathedral
of Milan, Miss, laying emphasis on the last words, in
imitation of the manner of Mr. Bragg. Is it such a
novelty to see the two styles blended; or is
architecture
so pure in America, that you think I have
committed
the unpardonable sin.
Nay, nothing that is out of rule ought to strike
one, in a country where imitation governs in all things
immaterial, and originality unsettles all things sacred
and dear.
By way of punishment for that bold speech, I wish
I had left the old rookery in the state I found it, that
its beauties might have greeted your eyes, instead of
this uncouth pile, which seems so much to offend them.
Mademoiselle Viefville, permit me to ask how you like
that house?
Mais, c'est un petit chteau
.
Un chteau, Effinghamis
, said Eve, laughing.
Effinghamis si vous voulez, ma chre; pourtant
c'est un chteau
.
The general opinion in this part of the country
is, said Aristabulus, that Mr. John Effingham has
altered the building on the plan of some edifice of
Europe
,
though I forget the name of the particular
temple
;
it is not, however, the Parthenon, nor the temple
of Minerva.
I hope, at least, said Mr. Effingham, leading the
way up a little lawn, it will not turn out to be the
Temple of the Winds.
CHAPTER XI.
Nay, I'll come; if I lose a scruple of this sport, let me be boiled to
death with melancholy.
Shakspeare
.
The
progress of society in America, has been
distinguished
by several peculiarities that do not so
properly
belong to the more regular and methodical
advances
of civilization in other parts of the world. On
the one hand, the arts of life, like Minerva, who was
struck out of the intellectual being of her father at a
blow, have started full-grown into existence, as the
legitimate inheritance of the colonists, while, on the
other, every thing tends towards settling down into a
medium, as regards quality, a consequence of the
community-character
of the institutions. Every thing
she had seen that day, had struck Eve as partaking of
this mixed nature, in which, while nothing was vulgar,
little even approached to that high standard, that her
European education had taught her to esteem perfect.
In the Wigwam, however, as her father's cousin had
seen fit to name the family dwelling, there was more
of keeping, and a closer attention to the many little
things she had been accustomed to consider essential
to comfort and elegance, and she was better satisfied
with her future home, than with most she had seen
since her return to America.
As we have described the interior of this house, in
another work, little remains to be said on the
subject
,
at present; for, while John Effingham had
completely
altered its external appearance, its internal
was not much changed. It is true, the cloud-coloured
covering had disappeared, as had that stoop also, the
columns of which were so nobly upheld by their
superstructure
;
the former having given place to a less
obtrusive
roof, that was regularly embattled, and the
latter
having been swallowed up by a small entrance
tower, that the new architect had contrived to attach
to the building with quite as much advantage to it, in
the way of comfort, as in the way of appearance. In
truth, the Wigwam had none of the more familiar
features
of a modern American dwelling of its class.
There was not a column about it, whether Grecian,
Roman, or Egyptian; no Venetian blinds; no
verandah
or piazza; no outside paint, nor gay blending of
colours. On the contrary, it was a plain old structure,
built with great solidity, and of excellent materials, and
in that style of respectable dignity and propriety, that
Vol. I.15
was perhaps a little more peculiar to our fathers than
it is peculiar to their successors, our worthy selves.
In addition to the entrance tower, or porch, on its
northern front, John Effingham had also placed a
prettily
devised conceit on the southern, by means of
which the abrupt transition from an inner room to the
open air was adroitly avoided. He had, moreover,
removed the firstly of the edifice, and supplied its
place with a more suitable addition that contained some
of the offices, while it did not disfigure the building, a
rare circumstance in an architectural after-thought.
Internally, the Wigwam had gradually been
undergoing
improvements, ever since that period, which, in
the way of the arts, if not in the way of chronology,
might be termed the dark ages of Otsego. The great
hall had long before lost its characteristic decoration
of the severed arm of Wolf, a Gothic paper that was
better adapted to the really respectable architecture
of the room being its substitute; and even the urn that
was thought to contain the ashes of Queen Dido, like
the pitcher that goes often to the well, had been broken
in a war of extermination that had been carried on
against the cobwebs by a particularly notable
housekeeper
.
Old Homer, too, had gone the way of all
baked clay; Shakspeare, himself, had dissolved into
dust, leaving not a wreck behind; and of
Washington
and Franklin, even, indigenous as they were, there
remained no vestiges. Instead of these venerable
memorials
of the past, John Effingham, who retained a
pleasing recollection of their beauties as they had
presented
themselves to his boyish eyes, had bought a few
substitutes in a New-York shop, and
a
Shakspeare,
and
a
Milton, and
a
Csar, and
a
Dryden, and
a
Locke, as the writers of heroic so beautifully express
it, were now seated in tranquil dignity on the old
medallions
that had held their illustrious predecessors.
Although time had, as yet, done little for this new
collection
in the way of colour, dust and neglect were
already throwing around them the tint of antiquity.
The lady, to use the language of Mr. Bragg, who
did the cooking of the Wigwam, having every thing
in readiness, our party took their seats at the breakfast
table, which was spread in the great hall, as soon as
each had paid a little attention to the
toilette
. As the
service was neither very scientific, nor sufficiently
peculiar
,
either in the way of elegance or of its opposite
quality, to be worthy of notice, we shall pass it over
in silence.
One will not quite so much miss European
architecture
in this house, said Eve, as she took her seat
at table, glancing an eye at the spacious and lofty
room, in which they were assembled; here is at least
size and its comforts, if not elegance.
Had you lost all recollection of this building, my
child? inquired her father, kindly; I was in hopes
you would feel some of the happiness of returning
home, when you again found yourself beneath its
roof!
I should greatly dislike to have all the antics I
have been playing in my own dressing-room exposed,
returned Eve, rewarding the parental solicitude of her
father by a look of love, though Grace, between her
laughing and her tears, has threatened me with such
a disgrace. Ann Sidley has also been weeping, and,
as even Annette, always courteous and considerate,
has shed a few tears in the way of sympathy, you
ought not to imagine that I have been altogether so
stoical as not to betray some feeling, dear father. But
the paroxysm is past, and I am beginning to
philosophize
.
I hope, cousin Jack, you have not forgotten
that the drawing-room is a lady's empire!
I have respected your rights, Miss Effingham,
though, with a wish to prevent any violence to your
tastes, I have caused sundry antediluvian paintings and
engravings to be consigned to the
Garret? inquired Eve, so quickly as to interrupt
the speaker.
Fire, coolly returned her cousin. The garret
is now much too good for them; that part of the house
being converted into sleeping-rooms for the maids.
Mademoiselle Annette would go into hysterics, were
she to see the works of art, that satisfied the past
generation of masters in this country, in too close
familiarity
with her Louvre-ized eyes.
Point du tout, monsieur
, said Mademoiselle
Viefville
,
innocently;
Annette a du gout dans son metier
sans doute
, but she is too well bred to expect
impossibilit
s
.
No doubt she would have conducted herself
with decorum.
Every body laughed, for much light-heartedness
prevailed
at that board, and the conversation continued.
I shall be satisfied if Annette escape convulsions,
Eve added, a refined taste being her weakness; and,
to be frank, what I recollect of the works you
mention
,
is not of the most flattering nature.
And yet, observed Sir George, nothing has
surprised
me more than the respectable state of the arts
of engraving and painting in this country. It was
unlooked
for, and the pleasure has probably been in
proportion
to the surprise.
In that you are very right, Sir George
Templemore
,
John Effingham answered; but the
improvement
is of very recent date. He who remembers an
American town half a century ago, will see a very
different thing in an American town of to-day; and
this is equally true of the arts you mention, with the
essential difference that the latter are taking a right
direction under a proper instruction, while the former
are taking a wrong direction, under the influence of
money, that has no instruction. Had I left much of
the old furniture, or any of the old pictures in the
Wigwam
,
we should have had the bland features of Miss
Effingham in frowns, instead of bewitching smiles, at
this very moment.
And yet I have seen fine old furniture in this
country
,
cousin Jack.
Very true; though not in this part of it. The
means of conveyance were wanting half a century
since, and few people risk finery of any sort on
corduroys
.
This very house had some respectable old
things, that were brought here by dint of money, and
they still remain; but the eighteenth century in general,
may be set down as a very dark antiquity in all this
region.
When the repast was over, Mr. Effingham led his
guests and daughter through the principal apartments,
sometimes commending, and sometimes laughing, at
the conceits of his kinsman. The library was a good
sized room; good sized at least for a country in which
domestic architecture, as well as public architecture,
is still in the chrysalis state. Its walls were hung with
an exceedingly pretty gothic paper, in green, but over
each window was a chasm in the upper border; and
as this border supplied the arches, the unity of the
entire
design was broken in no less than four places, that
being the precise number of the windows. The defect
soon attracted the eye of Eve, and she was not slow
in demanding an explanation.
The deficiency is owing to an American accident,
returned her cousin; one of those calamities of which
you are fated to experience many, as the mistress of
an American household. No more of the border was
to be bought in the country, and this is a land of shops
and not of
fabricants
. At Paris, Mademoiselle, one
would send to the paper-maker for a supply; but, alas!
he that has not enough of a thing with us, is as badly
off as if he had none. We are consumers, and not
producers of works of art. It is a long way to send
to France for ten or fifteen feet of paper hangings,
15 *
and yet this must be done, or my beautiful gothic
arches will remain forever without their key-stones!
One sees the inconvenience of this, observed Sir
Georgewe feel it, even in England, in all that
relates to imported things.
And we, in nearly all things, but food.
And does not this show that America can never
become a manufacturing country? asked the baronet,
with the interest an intelligent Englishman ever feels
in that all-absorbing question. If you cannot
manufacture
an article as simple as that of paper-hangings,
would it not be well to turn your attention, altogether,
to agriculture?
As the feeling of this interrogatory was much more
apparent than its logic, smiles passed from one to the
other, though John Effingham, who really had a regard
for Sir George, was content to make an evasive reply,
a singular proof of amity, in a man of his caustic
temperament.
The survey of the house, on the whole, proved
satisfactory
to its future mistress, who complained,
however
,
that it was furnished too much like a town
resisidence
.
For, she added, you will remember, cousin
Jack, that our visits here will be something like a
villeggiatura
.
Yes, yes, my fair lady; it will not be long before
your Parisian and Roman tastes will be ready to
pronounce
the whole country a
villeggiatura!
This is the penalty, Eve, one pays for being a
Hajji, observed Grace, who had been closely
watching
the expression of the others' countenances; for,
agreeably to her view of things, the Wigwam wanted
nothing to render it a perfect abode. The things
that
we
enjoy,
you
despise.
That is an argument, my dear coz, that would
apply equally well, as a reason for preferring brown
sugar to white.
In coffee, certainly, Miss Eve, put in the
attentive
Aristabulus, who having acquired this taste, in
virtue of an economical mother, really fancied it a
pure one. Every body, in these regions, prefers the
brown in coffee.
Oh, mon pre et ma mre, comme je vous en veux
,
said Eve, without attending to the nice distinctions of
Mr. Bragg, which savoured a little too much of the
neophyte in cookery, to find favour in the present
company,
comme je vous en veux
for having neglected
so many beautiful sites, to place this building in the
very spot it occupies.
In that respect, my child, we may rather be
grateful
at finding so comfortable a house, at all. Compared
with the civilization that then surrounded it, this
dwelling
was a palace at the time of its erection; bearing
some such relation to the humbler structures around it,
as the
chteau
bears to the cottage. Remember that
brick had never before been piled on brick, in the
walls of a house, in all this region, when the Wigwam
was constructed. It is the Temple of Neptune of
Otsego
,
if not of all the surrounding counties.
Eve pressed to her lips the hand she was holding in
both her own, and they all passed out of the library
into another room. As they came in front of the hall
windows, a party of apprentice-boys were seen coolly
making their arrangements to amuse themselves with
a game of ball, on the lawn directly in front of the
house.
Surely, Mr. Bragg, said the owner of the
Wigwam
,
with more displeasure in his voice than was
usual for one of his regulated mind, you do not
countenance
this liberty?
Liberty, sir!I am an advocate for liberty
wherever I can find it. Do you refer to the young
men on the lawn, Mr. Effingham?
Certainly to them, sir; and permit me to say, I
think they might have chosen a more suitable spot for
their sports. They are mistaking
liberties
for liberty,
I fear.
Why, sir, I believe they have
always
played ball
in that precise locality.
Always!
I can assure you this is a great mistake.
What private family, placed as we are in the centre
of a village, would allow of an invasion of its privacy
in this rude manner? Well may the house be termed
a Wigwam, if this whooping is to be tolerated before
its door.
You forget, Ned, said John Effingham, with a
sneer, that an American
always
means just eighteen
months.
Antiquity
is reached in five lustres, and the
dark ages at the end of a human life. I dare say these
amiable young gentlemen, who enliven their sports with
so many agreeable oaths, would think you very
unreasonable
and encroaching to presume to tell them they
are unwelcome.
To own the truth, Mr. John, it
would
be downright
unpopular.
As I cannot permit the ears of the ladies to be
offended with these rude brawls, and shall never
consent
to have grounds that are so limited, and which so
properly belong to the very privacy of my dwelling,
invaded in this coarse manner, I beg, Mr. Bragg, that
you will, at once, desire these young men to pursue
their sports somewhere else.
Aristabulus received this commission with a very ill
grace; for, while his native sagacity told him that Mr.
Effingham was right, he too well knew the loose habits
that had been rapidly increasing in the country during
the last ten years, not to foresee that the order would
do violence to all the apprentices' preconceived
notions
of their immunities; for, as he had truly stated,
things move at so quick a pace in America, and
popular
feeling is so arbitrary, that a custom of a twelve
months' existence is deemed sacred, until the public,
itself, sees fit to alter it. He was reluctantly quitting
the party, on his unpleasant duty, when Mr. Effingham
turned to a servant, who belonged to the place, and
bade him go to the village barber, and desire him to
come to the Wigwam to cut his hair; Pierre, who
usually performed that office for him, being busied
in unpacking trunks.
Never mind, Tom, said Aristabulus obligingly, as
he took up his hat; I am going into the street, and
will give the message to Mr. Lather.
I cannot think, sir, of employing you on such a
duty, hastily interposed Mr. Effingham, who felt a
gentleman's reluctance to impose an unsuitable office
on any of his dependantsTom, I am sure, will do
me the favour.
Do not name it, my dear sir; nothing makes me
happier than to do these little errands, and, another
time, you can do as much for me.
Aristabulus now went his way more cheerfully, for
he determined to go first to the barber, hoping that
some expedient might suggest itself, by means of which
he could coax the apprentices from the lawn, and
thus escape the injury to his popularity, that he so
much dreaded. It is true, these apprentices were not
voters, but then some of them speedily would be, and
all of them, moreover, had
tongues
, an instrument Mr.
Bragg held in quite as much awe as some men dread
salt-petre. In passing the ball-players, he called out
in a wheedling tone to their ringleader, a notorious
street brawler
A fine time for sport, Dickey; don't you think
there would be more room in the broad street than on
this crowded lawn, where you lose your ball so often
in the shrubbery?
This place will do, on a pinch, bawled Dickey
though it might be better. If it warn't for that
plagued house, we couldn't ask for a better ball-ground.
I don't see, put in another, what folks built a
house just in that spot for; it has spoilt the very best
play-ground in the village.
Some people have their notions as well as others,
returned Aristabulus; but, gentlemen, if I were in
your place, I would try the street; I feel satisfied you
would find it much the most agreeable and convenient.
The apprentices thought differently, however, or they
were indisposed to the change; and so they
recommenced
their yells, their oaths, and their game. In
the mean while, the party in the house continued their
examination of John Effingham's improvements; and
when this was completed, they separated, each to his
or her own room.
Aristabulus soon reappeared on the lawn; and,
approaching
the ball-players, he began to execute his
commission, as he conceived, in good earnest. Instead
of simply saying, however, that it was disagreeable to
the owner of the property to have such an invasion on
his privacy, and thus putting a stop to the intrusion for
the future as well as at the present moment, he believed
some address necessary to attain the desired end.
Well, Dickey, he said, there is no accounting
for tastes; but, in my opinion, the street would be a
much better place to play ball in than this lawn. I
wonder gentlemen of your observation should be
satisfied
with so cramped a play-ground!
I tell you, Squire Bragg, this will do, roared
Dickey; we are in a hurry, and no way particular;
the bosses will be after us in half an hour. Heave
away, Sam.
There are so many fences hereabouts, continued
Aristabulus, with an air of indifference; it's true
the village trustees say there
shall be no ball-playing
in the street
, but I conclude you don't much mind what
they
think or threaten.
Let them sue for that, if they like, bawled a
particularly
amiable blackguard, called Peter, who struck
his ball as he spoke, quite into the principal street of
the village. Who's a trustee, that he should tell
gentlemen where they are to play ball!
Sure enough, said Aristabulus, and, now, by
following up that blow, you can bring matters to an
issue. I think the law very oppressive, and you can
never have so good an opportunity to bring things to a
crisis. Besides, it is very aristocratic to play ball
among roses and dahlias.
The bait took; for what apprenticeAmerican
apprentice
,
in particularcan resist an opportunity of
showing how much he considers himself superior to
the law? Then it had never struck any of the party
before, that it was vulgar and aristocratic to pursue
the sport among roses, and one or two of them
actually complained that they had pricked their
fingers
,
in searching for the ball.
I know Mr. Effingham will be very sorry to
have you go, continued Aristabulus, following up his
advantage; but gentlemen cannot always forego
their pleasures for other folks.
Who's Mr. Effingham, I would like to know?
cried Joe Wart. If he wants people to play ball on
his premises, let him cut down his roses. Come,
gentlemen
,
I conform to Squire Bragg, and invite you all
to follow me into the street.
As the lawn was now evacuated,
en masse
,
Aristabulus
proceeded with alacrity to the house, and went
into the library, where Mr. Effingham was patiently
waiting his return.
I am happy to inform you, sir, commenced the
ambassador, that the ball-players have adjourned;
and as for Mr. Lather, he declines your proposition.
Declines my proposition!
Yes, sir; he dislikes to come; for he thinks it will
be altogether a poor operation. His notion is, that if
it be worth his while to come up to the Wigwam to
cut your hair, it may be worth your while to go down
to the shop, to have it cut. Considering the matter in
all its bearings, therefore, he concludes he would
rather not engage in the transaction at all.
I regret, sir, to have consented to your taking so
disagreeable a commission, and regret it the more, now
I find that the barber is disposed to be troublesome.
Not at all, sir. Mr. Lather is a good man, in his
way, and particularly neighbourly. By the way, Mr.
Effingham, he asked me to propose to let him take
down your garden fence, in order that he may haul
some manure on his potato patch, which wants it
dreadfully
,
he says.
Certainly, sir. I cannot possibly object to his
hauling
his manure, even through this house, should he
wish it. He is so very valuable a citizen, and one
who knows his own business so well, that I am only
surprised at the moderation of his request.
Here Mr. Effingham rose, rang the bell for Pierre,
and went to his own room, doubting, in his own mind,
from all that he had seen, whether this was really the
Templeton he had known in his youth, and whether he
was in his own house or not.
As for Aristabulus, who saw nothing out of rule, or
contrary to his own notions of propriety, in what had
passed, he hurried off to tell the barber, who was so
ignorant of the first duty of his trade, that he was at
liberty to pull down Mr. Effingham's fence, in order to
manure his own potato patch.
Lest the reader should suppose we are drawing
caricatures
,
instead of representing an actual condition
of society, it may be necessary to explain that Mr.
Bragg was a standing candidate for popular favour;
that, like Mr. Dodge, he considered every thing that
presented itself in the name of the public, as sacred
and paramount, and that so general and positive was
his deference for majorities, that it was the bias
of his mind to think half-a-dozen always in the right,
as opposed to one, although that one, agreeably to the
great decision of the real majority of the entire
community
,
had not only the law on his side, but all the
abstract merits of the disputed question. In short, to
such a pass of freedom had Mr. Bragg, in common
with a large class of his countrymen, carried his
notions
,
that he had really begun to imagine liberty was
all means and no end.
CHAPTER XII.
In sooth, thou wast in very gracious fooling last night, when thou
spokest of Pigrogromotus, of the Vapians passing the equinoctial of
Queubus
;
't was very good i' faith.
Sir Andrew Ague-Cheek
.
The
progress of society, it has just been said, in what
is termed a new country, is a little anomalous. At
the commencement of a settlement, there is much of
that sort of kind feeling and mutual interest, which
men are apt to manifest towards each other, when they
are embarked in an enterprise of common hazards.
The distance that is unavoidably inseparable from
education
,
habits and manners, is lessened by mutual wants
and mutual efforts; and the gentleman, even while he
may maintain his character and station, maintains them
with that species of good-fellowship and familiarity,
that marks the intercourse between the officer and the
soldier, in an arduous campaign. Men, and even
women
,
break bread together, and otherwise commingle,
that, in different circumstances, would be strangers;
the hardy adventures and rough living of the forest,
apparently lowering the pretensions of the man of
cultivation
and mere mental resources, to something very
near the level of those of the man of physical energy,
and manual skill. In this rude intercourse, the parties
meet, as it might be, on a sort of neutral ground, one
yielding some of his superiority, and the other laying
Vol. I.  16
claims to an outward show of equality, that he secretly
knows, however, is the result of the peculiar
circumstances
in which he is placed. In short, the state
of society is favourable to the claims of mere animal
force, and unfavourable to those of the higher
qualities
.
This period may be termed, perhaps, the happiest of
the first century of a settlement. The great cares of
life are so engrossing and serious, that small vexations
are overlooked, and the petty grievances that would
make us seriously uncomfortable in a more regular
state of society, are taken as matters of course, or
laughed at as the regular and expected incidents of the
day. Good-will abounds; neighbour comes cheerfully
to the aid of neighbour; and life has much of the
reckless
gaiety, careless association, and buoyant
merriment
of childhood. It is found that they who have
passed through this probation, usually look back to it
with regret, and are fond of dwelling on the rude
scenes and ridiculous events that distinguish the
history
of a new settlement, as the hunter is known to
pine for the forest.
To this period of fun, toil, neighbourly feeling and
adventure, succeeds another, in which society begins to
marshal itself, and the ordinary passions have sway.
Now it is, that we see the struggles for place, the
heart-burnings and jealousies of contending families,
and the influence of mere money. Circumstances
have probably established the local superiority of a few
beyond all question, and the condition of these serves
as a goal for the rest to aim at. The learned
professions
,
the ministry included, or what, by courtesy, are
so called, take precedence, as a matter of course, next
to wealth, however, when wealth is at all supported by
appearances. Then commence those gradations of
social station, that set institutions at defiance, and
which as necessarily follow civilization, as tastes and
habits are a consequence of indulgence.
This is, perhaps, the least inviting condition of
society
that belongs to any country that can claim to be
free and removed from barbarism. The tastes are too
uncultivated to exercise any essential influence; and
when they do exist, it is usually with the pretension
and effort that so commonly accompany infant
knowledge
.
The struggle is only so much the more severe,
in consequence of the late
ple mle
, while men lay
claim to a consideration that would seem beyond their
reach, in an older and more regulated community. It
is during this period that manners suffer the most, since
they want the nature and feeling of the first condition,
while they are exposed to the rudest assaults of the
coarse-minded and vulgar; for, as men usually defer to
a superiority that is long established, there being a
charm about antiquity that is sometimes able to repress
the passions, in older communities the marshalling of
time quietly regulates what is here the subject of strife.
What has just been said, depends on a general and
natural principle, perhaps; but the state of society we
are describing has some features peculiar to itself. The
civilization of America, even in its older districts,
which supply the emigrants to the newer regions, is
unequal; one state possessing a higher level than
another. Coming as it does, from different parts of
this vast country, the population of a new settlement,
while it is singularly homogenous for the circumstances,
necessarily brings with it its local peculiarities. If to
these elements be added a sprinkling of Europeans of
various nations and conditions, the effects of the
commingling
,
and the temporary social struggles that
follow
,
will occasion no surprise.
The third and last condition of society in a new
country, is that in which the influence of the
particular
causes enumerated ceases, and men and things
come within the control of more general and regular
laws. The effect, of course, is to leave the
community
in possession of a civilization that conforms to
that of the whole region, be it higher or be it lower,
and with the division into castes that are more or less
rigidly maintained, according to circumstances.
The periods, as the astronomers call the time taken
in a celestial revolution, of the two first of these
epochs in the history of a settlement, depend very much
on its advancement in wealth and in numbers. In
some places, the pastoral age, or that of good
fellowship
,
continues for a whole life, to the obvious
retrogression
of the people, in most of the higher qualities,
but to their manifest advantage, however, in the
pleasures
of the time being; while, in others, it passes
away rapidly, like the buoyant animal joys, that live
their time, between fourteen and twenty.
The second period is usually of longer duration, the
migratory habits of the American people keeping
society
more unsettled than might otherwise prove to
be the case. It may be said never to cease entirely,
until the great majority of the living generation are
natives of the region, knowing no other means of
comparison
than those under which they have passed their
days. Even when this is the case, there is commonly
so large an infusion of the birds of passage, men who
are adventurers in quest of advancement, and who
live without the charities of a neighbourhood, as they
may be said almost to live without a home, that there
is to be found, for a long time, a middle state of
society
,
during which it may well be questioned whether a
community belongs to the second or to the third of the
periods named.
Templeton was properly in this equivocal condition,
for while the third generation of the old settlers were
in active life, so many passers-by came and went, that
the influence of the latter nearly neutralized that of
time and the natural order of things. Its population
was pretty equally divided between the descendants
of the earlier inhabitants, and those who flitted like
swallows and other migratory birds. All of those who
had originally entered the region in the pride of
manhood
,
and had been active in converting the wilderness
into the abodes of civilized men, if they had not been
literally gathered to their fathers, in a physical sense,
had been laid, the first of their several races, beneath
those sods that were to cover the heads of so many of
their descendants. A few still remained among those
who entered the wilderness in young manhood, but the
events of the first period we have designated, and
which we have imperfectly recorded in another work,
were already passing into tradition. Among these
original settlers some portion of the feeling that had
distinguished their earliest communion with their
neighbours
yet continued, and one of their greatest delights
was to talk of the hardships and privations of their
younger days, as the veteran loves to discourse of his
marches, battles, scars, and sieges. It would be too
much to say that these persons viewed the more
ephemeral
part of the population with distrust, for their
familiarity with changes accustomed them to new
faces; but they had a secret inclination for each other,
preferred those who could enter the most sincerely into
their own feelings, and naturally loved that communion
best, where they found the most sympathy. To this
fragment of the community belonged nearly all there
was to be found of that sort of sentiment which is
connected
with locality; adventure, with them, supplying
the place of time; while the natives of the spot,
wanting
in the recollections that had so many charms for
their fathers, were not yet brought sufficiently within
the influence of traditionary interest, to feel that
hallowed
sentiment in its proper force. As opposed in
feeling to these relics of the olden time, were the birds
of passage so often named, a numerous and restless
class, that, of themselves, are almost sufficient to destroy
whatever there is of poetry, or of local attachment, in
any region where they resort.
In Templeton and its adjacent district, however, the
16 *
two hostile influences might be said to be nearly equal,
the descendants of the fathers of the country beginning
to make a manly stand against the looser sentiment,
or the want of sentiment, that so singularly
distinguishes
the migratory bands. The first did begin to
consider the temple in which their fathers had
worshipped
more hallowed than strange altars; the sods
that covered their fathers' heads more sacred than the
clods that were upturned by the plough; and the
places of their childhood and childish sports dearer
than the highway trodden by a nameless multitude.
Such, then, were the elements of the society into
which we have now ushered the reader, and with
which it will be our duty to make him better acquainted,
as we proceed in the regular narration of the incidents
of our tale.
The return of the Effinghams, after so long an
absence
,
naturally produced a sensation in so small a
place, and visiters began to appear in the Wigwam as
soon as propriety would allow. Many false rumours
prevailed, quite as a matter of course: and Eve, it was
reported, was on the point of being married to no less
than three of the inmates of her father's house, within
the first ten days, viz: Sir George Templemore, Mr.
Powis, and Mr. Bragg; the latter story taking its rise
in some precocious hopes that had escaped the
gentleman
himself, in the excitement of helping to empty
a bottle of bad Breton wine, that was dignified with
the name of champagne. But these tales revived and
died so often, in a state of society in which matrimony
is so general a topic with the young of the gentler sex,
that they brought with them their own refutation.
The third day, in particular, after the arrival of our
party, was a reception day at the Wigwam; the
gentlemen
and ladies making it a point to be at home and
disengaged, after twelve o'clock, in order to do honour
to their guests. One of the first who made his
appearance
was a Mr. Howel, a bachelor of about the same
age as Mr. Effingham, and a man of easy fortune and
quiet habits. Nature had done more towards making
Mr. Howel a gentleman, than either cultivation or
association
;
for he had passed his entire life, with very
immaterial exceptions, in the valley of Templeton,
where, without being what could be called a student,
or a scholar, he had dreamed away his existence in an
indolent communication with the current literature of
the day. He was fond of reading, and being
indisposed
to contention, or activity of any sort, his mind
had admitted the impressions of what he perused, as
the stone receives a new form by the constant fall of
drops of water. Unfortunately for Mr. Howel, he
understood
no language but his mother tongue; and, as
all his reading was necessarily confined to English
books, he had gradually, and unknown to himself, in
his moral nature at least, got to be a mere reflection of
those opinions, prejudices, and principles, if such a
word can properly be used for such a state of the mind,
that it had suited the interests or passions of England to
promulgate by means of the press. A perfect
bonne foi
prevailed in all his notions; and though a very modest
man by nature, so very certain was he that his
authority
was always right, that he was a little apt to be
dogmatical on such points as he thought his authors
appeared to think settled. Between John Effingham
and Mr. Howel, there were constant amicable
skirmishes
in the way of discussion; for, while the latter
was so dependent, limited in knowledge by unavoidable
circumstances, and disposed to an innocent credulity,
the first was original in his views, accustomed to see
and think for himself, and, moreover, a little apt to
estimate
his own advantages at their full value.
Here comes our good neighbour, and my old
school-fellow
,
Tom Howel, said Mr. Effingham, looking out
at a window, and perceiving the person mentioned
crossing the little lawn in front of the house, by
following
a winding foot-pathas kind-hearted a man,
Sir George Templemore, as exists; one who is really
American, for he has scarcely quitted the county
half-a-dozen
times in his life, and one of the honestest
fellows
of my acquaintance.
Ay, put in John Effingham, as real an American
as any man can be, who uses English spectacles for
all he looks at, English opinions for all he says, English
prejudices for all he condemns, and an English palate
for all he tastes. American, quotha! The man is no
more American than the Times' newspaper, or Charing
Cross! He actually made a journey to New-York,
last war, to satisfy himself with his own eyes that a
Yankee frigate had really brought an Englishman
into port.
His English predilections will be no fault in my
eyes, said the baronet, smilingand I dare say we
shall be excellent friends.
I am sure Mr. Howel is a very agreeable man,
added Graceof all in your Templeton
cterie
, he is
my greatest favourite.
Oh! I foresee a tender intimacy between
Templemore
and Howel, rejoined John Effingham; and
sundry wordy wars between the latter and Miss
Effingham
.
In this you do me injustice, cousin Jack. I
remember
Mr. Howel well, and kindly; for he was ever
wont to indulge my childish whims, when a girl.
The man is a second Burchell, and, I dare say,
never came to the Wigwam when you were a child,
without having his pockets stuffed with cakes, or
bonbons
.
The meeting was cordial, Mr. Howel greeting the
gentlemen like a warm friend, and expressing great
delight at the personal improvements that had been
made in Eve, between the ages of eight and twenty.
John Effingham was no more backward than the others,
for he, too, liked their simple-minded, kind-hearted, but
credulous neighbour.
You are welcome backyou are welcome back,
added Mr. Howel, blowing his nose, in order to
conceal
the tears that were gathering in his eyes. I did
think of going to New-York to meet you, but the
distance
at my time of life is very serious. Age,
gentlemen
,
seems to be a stranger to you.
And yet we, who are both a few months older than
yourself, Howel, returned Mr. Effingham, kindly,
have managed to overcome the distance you have
just mentioned, in order to come and see
you!
Ay, you are great travellers, gentlemen, very great
travellers, and are accustomed to motion.Been quite
as far as Jerusalem, I hear!
Into its very gates, my good friend; and I wish,
with all my heart, we had had you in our company.
Such a journey might cure you of the home-malady.
I am a fixture, and never expect to look upon the
ocean, now. I did, at one period of my life, fancy
such an event might happen, but I have finally
abandoned
all hope on that subject. Well, Miss Eve, of all
the countries in which you have dwelt, to which do you
give the preference?
I think Italy is the general favourite, Eve
answered
,
with a friendly smile; although there are some
agreeable things peculiar to almost every country.
Italy!Well, that astonishes me a good deal! I
never knew there was any thing particularly
interesting
about Italy! I should have expected
you
to say,
England.
England is a fine country, too, certainly; but it
wants many things that Italy enjoys.
Well, now, what? said Mr. Howel, shifting his
legs from one knee to the other, in order to be more
convenient to listen, or, if necessary, to object. What
can
Italy possess, that England does not enjoy in a
still greater degree?
Its recollections, for one thing, and all that interest
which time and great events throw around a region.
And is England wanting in recollections and great
events? Are there not the Conqueror? or, if you
will, King Alfred? and Queen Elizabeth, and
Shakspeare
think
of Shakspeare, young ladyand Sir
Walter Scott, and the Gun-Powder Plot; and
Cromwell
,
Oliver Cromwell, my dear Miss Eve; and
West-minster
Abbey, and London Bridge, and George IV.,
the descendant of a line of real kings,what, in the
name of Heaven, can Italy possess, to equal the
interest
one feels in such things as these?
They are very interesting no doubt; said Eve,
endeavouring not to smilebut Italy has its relics of
former ages too; you forget the Csars.
Very good sort of persons for barbarous times, I
dare say, but what can they be to the English
monarchs
?
I would rather look upon a
bon fide
English
king, than see all the Csars that ever lived. I never
can think any man a real king but the king of
England
.
Not King Solomon! cried John Effingham.
Oh! he was a Bible king, and one never thinks
of them. Italy! well, this I did not expect from your
father's daughter! Your great-great-great-grandfather
must have been an Englishman born, Mr. Effingham?
I have reason to think he was, sir.
And Milton, and Dryden, and Newton, and Locke!
These are prodigious names, and worth all the Csars
put together. And Pope, too; what have they got in
Italy to compare to Pope?
They have at least
the
Pope, said Eve, laughing.
And, then, there are the Boar's Head in East-Cheap;
and the Tower; and Queen Anne, and all the wits of
her reign; andandand Titus Oates; and Bosworth
Field; and Smithfield, where the martyrs were burned,
and a thousand more spots and persons of intense
interest in Old England!
Quite true, said John Effingham, with an air of
sympathybut, Howel, you have forgotten Peeping
Tom of Coventry, and the climate!
And Holyrood-House; and York-Minster; and St.
Paul's; continued the worthy Mr. Howel, too much
bent on a catalogue of excellencies, that to him were
sacred, to heed the interruption, and, above all,
Windsor
Castle. What is there in the world to equal
Windsor
Castle as a royal residence?
Want of breath now gave Eve an opportunity to
reply, and she seized it with an eagerness that she was
the first to laugh at herself, afterwards.
Caserta is no mean house, Mr. Howel; and, in my
poor judgment, there is more real magnificence in its
great stair-case, than in all Windsor Castle united, if
you except the chapel.
But, St. Paul's!
Why, St. Peter's may be set down, quite fairly, I
think, for its
pendant
at least.
True, the Catholics
do
say so; returned Mr.
Howel, with the deliberation one uses when he greatly
distrusts his own concession; but I have always
considered
it one of their frauds. I don't think there
can
be any thing finer than St. Paul's. Then there are the
noble ruins of England!
They
, you must admit, are
unrivalled.
The Temple of Neptune, at Pstum, is commonly
thought an interesting ruin, Mr. Howel.
Yes, yes, for a
temple
, I dare say; though I do not
remember to have ever heard of it before. But no
temple can ever compare to a ruined
abbey!
Taste is an arbitrary thing, Tom Howel, as you
and I know when as boys we quarrelled about the beauty
of our ponies, said Mr. Effingham, willing to put an
end to a discussion that he thought a little premature,
after so long an absence. Here are two young
friends who shared the hazards of our late passage
with us, and to whom, in a great degree, we owe our
present happy security, and I am anxious to make you
acquainted with them. This is our countryman, Mr.
Powis, and this is an English friend, who, I am
certain
,
will be happy to know so warm an admirer of his
own countrySir George Templemore.
Mr. Howel had never before seen a titled
Englishman
,
and he was taken so much by surprise that he
made his salutations rather awkwardly. As both the
young men, however, met him with the respectful ease
that denotes familiarity with the world, he soon
recovered
his self-possession.
I hope you have brought back with you a sound
American heart, Miss Eve, resumed the guest, as soon
as this little interruption had ceased. We have had
sundry rumours of French Marquisses, and German
Barons; but I have, all along, trusted too much to your
patriotism to believe you would marry a foreigner.
I hope you except Englishmen, cried Sir George,
gaily: we are almost the same people.
I am proud to hear you say so, sir. Nothing
flatters
me more than to be thought English; and I
certainly
should not have accused Miss Effingham of a
want of love of country, had
She married half-a-dozen Englishmen, interrupted
John Effingham, who saw that the old theme was in
danger of being revived. But, Howel, you have
paid me no compliments on the changes in the house.
I hope they are to your taste.
A little too French, Mr. John.
French!There is not a French feature in the
whole animal. What has put such a notion into your
head?
It is the common opinion, and I confess I should
like the building better were it less continental.
Why, my old friend, it is a nondescript-original
Effingham upon Doolittle, if you will; and, as for
models
,
it is rather more
English
than any thing else.
Well, Mr. John, I am glad to hear this, for I do
confess to a disposition rather to like the house. I am
dying to know, Miss Eve, if you saw all our
distinguished
contemporaries when in Europe?
That
to
me, would be one of the greatest delights of
travelling
!
To say that we saw them
all
, might be too much;
though we certainly did meet with many.
Scott, of course.
Sir Walter we had the pleasure of meeting, a few
times, in London.
And Southey, and Coleridge, and Wordsworth,
and Moore, and Bulwer, and D'Israeli, and Rogers,
and Campbell, and the grave of Byron, and Horace
Smith, and Miss Landon, and Barry Cornwall, and
Cum multis aliis
, put in John Effingham, again,
by way of arresting the torrent of names. Eve saw
many of these, and, as Tubal told Shylock, `we often
came where we did hear' of the rest. But you say
nothing, friend Tom, of Goethe, and Tieck, and
Schlegel
,
and La Martine, Chateaubriant, Hugo, Delavigne,
Mickiewicz, Nota, Manzoni, Niccolini, &c. &c. &c.
&c. &c. &c.
Honest, well-meaning Mr. Howel, listened to the
catalogue that the other ran volubly over, in silent
wonder; for, with the exception of one or two of these
distinguished men, he had never even heard of them;
and, in the simplicity of his heart, unconsciously to
himself, he had got to believe that there was no great
personage still living, of whom he did not know
something
.
Ah, here comes young Wenham, by way of
preserving
the equilibrium, resumed John Effingham,
looking out of a windowI rather think you must
have forgotten him, Ned, though you remember his
father, beyond question.
Mr. Effingham and his cousin went out into the hall
to receive the new guest, with whom the latter had
become acquainted while superintending the repairs of
the Wigwam.
Vol. I.17
Mr. Wenham was the son of a successful lawyer in
the county, and, being an only child, he had also
succeeded
to an easy independence. His age, however,
brought him rather into the generation to which Eve
belonged, than into that of the father; and, if Mr.
Howel was a reflection, or rather a continuation, of
all the provincial notions that America entertained of
England forty years ago, Mr. Wenham might almost
be said to belong to the opposite school, and to be as
ultra-American, as his neighbour was ultra-British.
If there is
la jeune France
, there is also
la jeune
Amerique
,
although the votaries of the latter march with
less hardy steps than the votaries of the first. Mr.
Wenham fancied himself a paragon of national
independence
,
and was constantly talking of American
excellencies
,
though the ancient impressions still lingered
in his moral system, as men look askance for the ghosts
which frightened their childhood on crossing a
churchyard
in the dark. John Effingham knew the
penchant
of the young man, and when he said that he came
happily to preserve the equilibrium, he alluded to this
striking difference in the characters of their two friends.
The introductions and salutations over, we shall
resume
the conversation that succeeded in the
drawing-room
.
You must be much gratified, Miss Effingham,
observed Mr. Wenham, who, like a true American,
being a young man himself, supposed it
de rigueur
to
address a young lady in preference to any other
present
,with
the great progress made by
our
country
since you went abroad.
Eve simply answered that her extreme youth, when
she left home, had prevented her from retaining any
precise notions on such subjects.
I dare say it is all very true, she added, but one,
like myself, who remembers only older countries, is, I
think, a little more apt to be struck with the deficiencies,
than with what may, in truth, be improvements, though
they still fall short of excellence.
Mr. Wenham looked vexed, or indignant would be
a better word, but he succeeded in preserving his
coolness
a
thing that is not always easy to one of
provincial
habits and provincial education, when he finds
his own
beau idal
lightly estimated by others.
Miss Effingham must discover a thousand
imperfections
,
said Mr. Howel, coming, as she does,
directly
from England. That music, now,alluding to
the sounds of a flute that were heard through the open
windows, coming from the adjacent villagemust be
rude enough to her ear, after the music of London.
The
street
music of London is certainly among
the best, if not the very best, in Europe, returned Eve,
with a glance of the eye at the baronet, that caused
him to smile, and I think this fairly belongs to the
class, being so freely given to the neighbourhood.
Have you read the articles signed Minerva, in the
Hebdomad, Miss Effingham, inquired Mr. Wenham,
who was determined to try the young lady on a point
of sentiment, having succeeded so ill in his first attempt
to interest herthey are generally thought to be a
great acquisition to American literature.
Well, Wenham, you are a fortunate man,
interposed
Mr. Howel, if you can find any literature in
America, to add to, or to substract from. Beyond
almanacs
,
reports of cases badly got up, and newspaper
verses, I know nothing that deserves such a name.
We may not print on as fine paper, Mr. Howel, or
do up the books in as handsome binding as other
people
,
said Mr. Wenham, bridling and looking grave,
but so far as sentiments are concerned, or sound
sense, American literature need turn its back on no
literature of the day.
By the way, Mr. Effingham, you were in Russia;
did you happen to see the Emperor?
I had that pleasure, Mr. Howel.
And is he really the monster we have been taught
to believe him?
Monster! exclaimed the upright Mr. Effingham,
fairly recoiling a step in surprise. In what sense a
monster, my worthy friend? surely not in a physical?
I do not know that. I have somehow got the
notion
he is any thing but handsome. A mean,
butchering
,
bloody-minded looking little chap, I'll engage.
You are libelling one of the finest-looking men of
the age.
I think I would submit it to a jury. I cannot
believe
,
after what I have read of him in the English
publications, that he is so very handsome.
But, my good neighbour, these English publications
must be wrong; prejudiced perhaps, or even
malignant
.
Oh! I am not the man to be imposed on in that
way. Besides, what motive could an English writer
have for belying an Emperor of Russia?
Sure enough, what motive! exclaimed John
Effingham
.You
have your answer, Ned!
But you will remember, Mr. Howel, Eve
interposed
,
that we have
seen
the Emperor Nicholas.
I dare say, Miss Eve, that your gentle nature was
disposed to judge him as kindly as possible; and, then,
I think most Americans, ever since the treaty of
Ghent, have been disposed to view all Russians too
favourably. No, no; I am satisfied with the account
of the English; they live much nearer to St.
Petersburg
than we do, and they are more accustomed, too,
to give accounts of such matters.
But living nearer, Tom Howel, cried Mr.
Effingham
,
with unusual animation, in such a case, is of no
avail, unless one lives near enough to see with his own
eyes.
Wellwellmy good friend, we will talk of this
another time. I know your disposition to look at every
body with lenient eyes. I will now wish you all a
good morning, and hope soon to see you again. Miss
Eve, I have one word to say, if you dare trust
yourself
with a youth of fifty, for a minute in the library.
Eve rose cheerfully, and led the way to the room
her father's visiter had named. When within it, Mr.
Howel shut the door carefully, and then with a sort of
eager delight, he exclaimed
For heaven's sake, my dear young lady, tell me
who are these two strange gentlemen in the other
room.
Precisely the persons my father mentioned, Mr.
Howel; Mr. Paul Powis, and Sir George
Templemore
.
Englishmen, of course!
Sir George Templemore is, of course, as you say;
but we may boast of Mr. Powis as a countryman.
Sir George Templemore!What a superb-looking
young fellow!
Why, yes, returned Eve, laughing; he, at least,
you will admit is a handsome man.
He is wonderful!The other, Mr.aaaI
forget what you called himhe is pretty well too; but
this Sir George is a princely youth.
I rather think a majority of observers would give
the preference to the appearance of Mr. Powis, said
Eve, struggling to be steady, but permitting a blush to
heighten her colour, in despite of the effort.
What could have induced him to come up among
these mountainsan English baronet! resumed Mr.
Howel, without thinking of Eve's confusion. Is he
a real lord?
Only a little one, Mr. Howel. You heard what
my father said of our having been fellow-travellers.
But what
does
he think of us. I am dying to know
what such a man
really
thinks of us?
It is not always easy to discover what such men
really
think; although I am inclined to believe that he
is disposed to think rather favourably of some of us.
17 *
Ay, of you, and your father, and Mr. John. You
have travelled, and are more than half European; but
what
can
he think of those who have never left
America
?
Even of some of those, returned Eve, smiling, I
suspect he thinks partially.
Well, I am glad of that. Do you happen to know
his opinion of the Emperor Nicholas?
Indeed I do not remember to have heard him
mention
the Emperor's name; nor do I think he has ever
seen him.
That is extraordinary! Such a man should have
seen every thing, and know every thing; but I'll
engage
,
at the bottom, he does know all about him. If
you happen to have any old English newspapers, as
wrappers, or by any other accident, let me beg them
of you. I care not how old they are. An English
journal
fifty years old, is more interesting than one of ours
wet from the press.
Eve promised to send him a package, when they
shook hands and parted. As she was crossing the
hall, to rejoin the party, John Effingham stopped her.
Has Howel made proposals? the gentleman
inquired
,
in an affected whisper.
None, cousin Jack, beyond an offer to read the old
English newspapers I can send him.
Yes, yes, Tom Howel will swallow all the
nonsense
that is
timbr  Londres
.
I confess a good deal of surprise at finding a
respectable
and intelligent man so weak-minded as to
give credit to such authorities, or to form his serious
opinions on information derived from such sources.
You may be surprised, Eve, at hearing so frank
avowals of the weakness; but, as for the weakness
itself, you are now in a country for which England
does all the thinking, except on subjects that touch the
current interests of the day.
Nay, I will not believe this! If it were true, how
came we independent of herwhere did we get spirit
to war against her.
The man who has attained his majority is
independent
of his father's legal control, without being
independent
of the lessons he was taught when a child.
The soldier sometimes mutinies, and after the contest
is over, he is usually the most submissive man of the
regiment.
All this to me is very astonishing! I confess that
a great deal has struck me unpleasantly in this way,
since our return; especially in ordinary society; but I
never could have supposed it had reached to the pass
in which I see it existing in our good neighbour
Howel.
You have witnessed one of the effects, in a matter
of no great moment to ourselves; but, as time and
years afford the means of observation and comparison,
you will perceive the effects in matters of the last
moment
,
in a national point of view. It is in human
nature
to undervalue the things with which we are
familiar
,
and to form false estimates of those which are
remote, either by time, or by distance. But, go into
the drawing-room, and, in young Wenham, you will
find one who fancies himself a votary of a new school,
although his prejudices and mental dependence are
scarcely less obvious than those of poor Tom Howel.
The arrival of more company, among whom were
several ladies, compelled Eve to defer an examination
of Mr. Wenham's peculiarities to another opportunity.
She found many of her own sex, whom she had left
children, grown into womanhood, and not a few of
them at a period of life when they should be
cultivating
their physical and moral powers, already oppressed
with the cares and feebleness that weigh so heavily on
the young American wife.
CHAPTER XIII.
Nay we must longer kneel; I am a suitor.
Queen Katherine
.
The
Effinghams were soon regularly domesticated,
and the usual civilities had been exchanged. Many
of their old friends resumed their ancient intercourse,
and some new acquaintances were made. The few
first visits were, as usual, rather labored and formal;
but things soon took their natural course, and as the
ease of country life was the aim of the family, the
temporary little bustle was quickly forgotten.
The dressing-room of Eve overlooked the lake, and,
about a week after her arrival, she was seated in it
enjoying that peculiarly lady like luxury, which is to be
found in the process of having another gently disposing
of the hair. Annette wielded the comb, as usual, while
Ann Sidley, who was unconsciously jealous that any
one should be employed about her darling, even in this
manner, though so long accustomed to it, busied
herself
in preparing the different articles of attire that
she fancied her young mistress might be disposed to
wear that morning. Grace was also in the room,
having
escaped from the hands of her own maid, in order
to look into one of those books which professed to give
an account of the extraction and families of the higher
classes of Great Britain, a copy of which Eve
happened
to possess, among a large collection of books,
Almanachs de Gotha
, Court Guides, and other similar
works that she had found it convenient to possess as
a traveller.
Ah! here it is, said Grace, in the eagerness of
one who is suddenly successful after a long and
vexatious
search.
Here is what, coz?
Grace coloured, and she could have bitten her tongue
for its indiscretion, but, too ingenuous to deceive, she
reluctantly told the truth.
I was merely looking for the account of Sir George
Templemore's family; it is awkward to be
domesticated
with one, of whose family we are utterly
ignorant
.
Have you found the name?
Yes; I see he has two sisters, both of whom are
married, and a brother who is in the Guards. But
But what, dear?
His title is not so
very
old.
The title of no Baronet
can
be very old, the order
having been instituted in the reign of James I.
I did not know that. His ancestor was created a
baronet in 1701, I see. Now, Eve
Now, what, Grace?
We are both Grace would not confine the
remark
to herselfwe are both of older families than
this! You have even a much higher English
extraction
;
and I think I can claim for the Van Cortlandts
more antiquity than one that dates from 1701!
No one doubts it, Grace; but what do you wish
me to understand by this? Are we to insist on
preceding
Sir George, in going through a door?
Grace blushed to the eyes, and yet she laughed,
involuntarily.
What nonsense! No one thinks of such things in
America.
Except at Washington, where, I am told, `
Senators'
ladies' do give themselves airs. But you are
quite right, Grace; women have no rank in America,
beyond their general social rank, as ladies or no ladies,
and we will not be the first to set an example of
breaking
the rule. I am afraid our blood will pass for
nothing
,
and that we must give place to the baronet,
unless, indeed, he recognizes the rights of the sex.
You know I mean nothing so silly. Sir George
Templemore does not seem to think of rank at all;
even Mr. Powis treats him, in all respects, as an equal,
and Sir George seems to admit it to be right.
Eve's maid, at the moment, was twisting her hair,
with the intention to put it up; but the sudden manner
in which her young mistress turned to look at Grace,
caused Annette to relinquish her grasp, and the
shoulders
of the beautiful and blooming girl were instantly
covered with the luxuriant tresses.
And why should
not
Mr. Powis treat Sir George
Templemore as one every way his equal, Grace? she
asked, with an impetuosity unusual in one so trained in
the forms of the world.
Why, Eve, one is a baronet, and the other is but a
simple gentleman.
Eve Effingham sat silent for quite a minute. Her
little foot moved, and she had been carefully taught,
too, that a lady-like manner, required that even this
beautiful portion of the female frame should be quiet
and unobtrusive. But America did not contain two
of the same sex, years, and social condition, less alike
in their opinions, or it might be said their prejudices,
than the two cousins. Grace Van Cortlandt, of the
best blood of her native land, had unconsciously
imbibed
in childhood, the notions connected with
hereditary
rank, through the traditions of colonial manners,
by means of novels, by hearing the vulgar reproached
or condemned for their obtrusion and ignorance, and
too often justly reproached and condemned, and by
the aid of her imagination, which contributed to throw
a gloss and brilliancy over a state of things that
singularly
gains by distance. On the other hand, with
Eve, every thing connected with such subjects was a
matter of fact. She had been thrown early into the
highest associations of Europe; she had not only seen
royalty on its days of gala and representation, a mere
raree-show that is addressed to the senses, or purely an
observance of forms that may possibly have their
meaning
,
but which can scarcely be said to have their
reasons
,
but she had lived long and intimately among the
high-born and great, and this, too, in so many
different
countries, as to have destroyed the influence of the
particular nation that has transmitted so many of its
notions to America as heir-looms. By close
observation
,
she knew that arbitrary and political
distinctions
made but little difference between men of
themselves
;
and so far from having become the dupe of the
glitter of life, by living so long within its immediate
influence, she had learned to discriminate between the
false and the real, and to perceive that which was truly
respectable and useful, and to know it from that which
was merely arbitrary and selfish. Eve actually fancied
that the position of an American gentleman might
readily become, nay that it
ought
to be the highest of
all human stations, short of that of sovereigns. Such
a man had no social superior, with the exception of
those who actually ruled, in her eyes, and this fact
she conceived, rendered him more than noble, as
nobility
is usually graduated. She had been accustomed
to see her father and John Effingham moving in the
best circles of Europe, respected for their information
and independence, undistinguished by their manners,
admired for their personal appearance, manly,
courteous
,
and of noble bearing and principles, if not set
apart from the rest of mankind by an arbitrary rule
connected with rank. Rich, and possessing all the
habits that properly mark refinement, of gentle
extraction
,
of liberal attainments, walking abroad in the
dignity
of manhood, and with none between them and the
Deity, Eve had learned to regard the gentlemen of her
race as the equals in station of any of their European
associates, and as the superiors of most, in every thing
that is essential to true distinction. With her, even
titular princes and dukes had no estimation, merely as
princes and dukes; and, as her quick mind glanced
over the long catalogue of artificial social gradations,
and she found Grace actually attaching an importance
to the equivocal and purely conventional condition of
an English baronet, a strong sense of the ludicrous
connected itself with the idea.
A simple gentleman, Grace! she repeated slowly
after her cousin; and is not a simple gentleman, a
simple
American
gentleman, the equal of any
gentleman
on earthof a poor baronet, in particular?
Poor baronet, Eve!
Yes, dear,
poor
baronet; I know fully the extent
and meaning of what I say. It is true, we do not
know as much of Mr. Powis' family, and here Eve's
colour heightened, though she made a mighty effort to
be steady and unmoved, as we might; but we know
he is an
American;
that, at least, is something; and
we see he is a gentleman; and what American
gentleman
,
a real American gentleman,
can
be the inferior
of an English baronet? Would your uncle, think you;
would cousin Jack; proud, lofty-minded cousin Jack,
think you, Grace, consent to receive so paltry a
distinction
as a baronetcy, were our institutions to be so
far altered as to admit of such social classifications?
Why, what would they be, Eve, if not baronets?
Earls, Counts, Dukes, nay Princes! These are the
designations of the higher classes of Europe, and such
titles, or those that are equivalent, would belong to the
higher classes here.
I fancy that Sir George Templemore would not be
persuaded to admit all this!
If you had seen Miss Eve, surrounded and admired
by princes, as I have seen her, Miss Grace, said Ann
Sidley, you would not think any simple Sir George
half good enough for her.
Our good Nanny means,
a
Sir George, interrupted
Eve, laughing, and not
the
Sir George in question.
But, seriously, dearest coz, it depends more on
ourselves
,
and less on others, in what light they are to
regard us, than is commonly supposed. Do you not
suppose there are families in America who, if disposed
to raise any objections beyond those that are purely
personal, would object to baronets, and the wearers
of red ribands, as unfit matches for their daughters,
on the ground of rank? What an absurdity would it
be, for
a
Sir George, or
the
Sir George either, to object
to a daughter of a President of the United States for
instance, on account of station; and yet I'll answer for
it,
you
would think it no personal honour, if Mr.
Jackson
had a son, that he should propose to my dear father
for you. Let us respect ourselves properly, take care
to be truly ladies and gentlemen, and so far from
titular
rank's being necessary to us, before a hundred
lustres
are past, we shall bring all such distinctions into
discredit, by showing that they are not necessary to
any one important interest, or to true happiness and
respectability any where.
And do you not believe, Eve, that Sir George
Templemore thinks of the difference in station between
us?
I cannot answer for that, said Eve, calmly.
The man is naturally modest; and, it is possible,
when he sees that we belong to the highest social
condition
of a great country, he may regret that such has
not been his own good fortune in his native land;
especially
,
Grace, since he has known
you
.
Grace blushed, looked pleased, delighted even, and
yet surprised. It is unnecessary to explain the causes
of the three first expressions of her emotions; but the
last may require a short examination. Nothing but time
and a change of circumstances, can ever raise a
province
or a provincial town to the independent state of
feeling that so strikingly distinguishes a metropolitan
country, or a capital. It would be as rational to
expect
that the inhabitants of the nursery should
disregard
the opinions of the drawing-room, as to believe
that the provincial should do all his own thinking.
Political
dependency, moreover, is much more easily
Vol. I. 18
thrown aside than mental dependency. It is not
surprising
,
therefore, that Grace Van Cortlandt, with her
narrow associations, general notions of life, origin, and
provincial habits, should be the very opposite of Eve,
in all that relates to independence of thought, on
subjects
like those that they were now discussing. Had
Grace been a native of New England, even, she would
have been less influenced by the mere social rank of
the baronet than was actually the case; for, while the
population of that part of the Union feel more of the
general subserviency to Great Britain than the
population
of any other portion of the republic, they probably
feel less of it, in this particular form, from the
circumstance
that their colonial habits were less connected
with the aristocratical usages of the mother country.
Grace was allied by blood, too, with the higher classes
of England, as, indeed, was the fact with most of the
old families among the New York gentry; and the
traditions of her race came in aid of the traditions of
her colony, to continue the profound deference she
felt for an English title. Eve might have been equally
subjected to the same feelings, had she not been
removed
into another sphere at so early a period of life,
where she imbibed the notions already mentioned
notions that were quite as effectually rooted in her
moral system, as those of Grace herself could be in
her own.
This is a strange way of viewing the rank of a
baronet, Eve! Grace exclaimed, as soon as she had
a little recovered from the confusion caused by the
personal allusion. I greatly question if you can induce
Sir George Templemore to see his own position with
your eyes.
No, my dear; I think he will be much more likely
to regard, not only that, but most other things, with
the eyes of another person. We will now talk of
more agreeable things, however; for I confess, when
I do dwell on titles, I have a taste for the more
princely appellations; and that a simple
chevalier
can
scarce excite a feeling that such is the theme.
Nay, Eve, interrupted Grace, with spirit, an
English
baronet
is
noble. Sir George Templemore
assured me that, as lately as last evening. The heralds,
I believe, have quite recently established that fact to
their own satisfaction.
I am glad of it, dear, returned Eve, with
difficulty
refraining from gaping, as it will be of great
importance to them, in their own eyes. At all events,
I concede that Sir George Templemore, knight or
baronet, big baron or little baron, is a noble fellow;
and what more can any reasonable person desire. Do
you know, sweet coz, that the Wigwam will be full to
overflowing next week?that it will be necessary to
light our council-fire, and to smoke the pipe of many
welcomes?
I have understood Mr. Powis, that his kinsman,
Captain Ducie, will arrive on Monday.
And Mrs. Hawker will come on Tuesday, Mr. and
Mrs. Bloomfield on Wednesday, and honest, brave,
straight-forward, literati-hating Captain Truck, on
Thursday, at the latest. We shall be a large
countrycircle
,
and I hear the gentlemen talking of the boats,
and other amusements. But I believe my father has a
consultation in the library, at which he wishes us to
be present; we will join him, if you please.
As Eve's toilette was now completed, the two ladies
rose, and descended together to join the party below.
Mr. Effingham was standing at a table that was
covered
with maps, while two or three
respectable-looking
men, master-mechanics, were at his side. The
manners of these men were quiet, civil, and respectful,
having a mixture of manly simplicity, with a proper
deference for the years and station of the master of
the house; though all but one, wore their hats. The
one who formed the exception, had become refined by
a long intercourse with this particular family; and his
acquired taste had taught him that, respect for himself,
as well as for decency, rendered it necessary to observe
the long-established rules of decorum, in his
intercourse
with others. His companions, though without
a particle of coarseness, or any rudeness of intention,
were less decorous, simply from a loose habit, that is
insensibly taking the place of the ancient laws of
propriety
in such matters, and which habit, it is to be
feared, has a part of its origin in false and
impracticable
political notions, that have been stimulated by the
arts of demagogues. Still, not one of the three
hard-working
,
really civil, and even humane men, who
now stood covered in the library of Mr. Effingham,
was probably conscious of the impropriety of which he
was guilty, or was doing more than insensibly yielding
to a vicious and vulgar practice.
I am glad you have come, my love, said Mr.
Effingham
,
as his daughter entered the room, for I find
I need support in maintaining my own opinions here.
John is obstinately silent; and, as for all these other
gentlemen, I fear they have decidedly taken sides
against me.
You can usually count on my support, dearest
father, feeble as it may be. But what is the disputed
point to-day?
There is a proposition to alter the interior of the
church, and our neighbour Gouge has brought the
plans, on which, as he says, he has lately altered
several
churches in the county. The idea is, to remove
the pews entirely, converting them into what are called
`slips,' to lower the pulpit, and to raise the floor,
amphitheatre
fashion.
Can there be a sufficient reason for this change?
demanded Eve, with surprise. Slips! The word has
a vulgar sound even, and savours of a useless
innovation
.
I doubt its orthodoxy.
It is very popular, Miss Eve, answered
Aristabulus
,
advancing from a window, where he had been
whispering assent. This fashion takes universally,
and is getting to prevail in all denominations.
Eve turned involuntarily, and to her surprise she
perceived that the editor of the Active Inquirer was
added to their party. The salutations, on the part of
the young lady, were distant and stately, while Mr.
Dodge, who had not been able to resist public opinion,
and had actually parted with his moustachios,
simpered
,
and wished to have it understood by the
spectators
,
that he was on familiar terms with all the
family.
It may be popular, Mr. Bragg, returned Eve, as
soon as she rose from her profound curtsey to Mr.
Dodge; but it can scarcely be said to be seemly.
This is, indeed, changing the order of things, by
elevating
the sinner, and depressing the saint.
You forget, Miss Eve, that under the old plan, the
people could not see; they were kept unnaturally
down, if one can so express it, while nobody had a
good look-out but the parson and the singers in the
front row of the gallery. This was unjust.
I do not conceive, sir, that a good look-out, as
you term it, is at all essential to devotion, or that one
cannot as well listen to instruction when beneath the
teacher, as when above him.
Pardon me, Miss; Eve recoiled, as she always
did, when Mr. Bragg used this vulgar and
contemptuous
mode of address; we put no body up or down;
all we aim it is a just equalityto place all, as near
as possible, on a level.
Eve gazed about her in wonder; and then she
hesitated a moment, as if distrusting her ears.
Equality! Equality with what? Surely not
with the ordained ministers of the church, in the
performance
of their sacred duties! Surely not with
the Deity!
We do not look at it exactly in this light, ma'am.
The people build the church,
that
you will allow,
18 *
Miss Effingham; even
you
will allow
this
, Mr.
Effingham
.
Both the parties appealed to, bowed a simple assent
to so plain a proposition, but neither spoke.
Well, the people building the church very
naturally
ask themselves for what purpose it was built?
For the worship of God, returned Eve with a
steady solemnity of manner that a little abashed even
the ordinarily indomitable and self-composed
Aristabulus
.
Yes, Miss; for the worship of God and the
accommodation
of the public.
Certainly, added Mr. Dodge; for the public
accommodation
and for public worship; laying due
emphasis
on the adjectives.
Father, you, at least, will never consent to this?
Not readily, my love. I confess it shocks all my
notions of propriety to see the sinner, even when he
professes to be the most humble and penitent, thrust
himself up ostentatiously, as if filled only with his own
self-love and self-importance.
You will allow, Mr. Effingham, rejoined
Aristabulus
,
that churches are built to accommodate the
public, as Mr. Dodge has so well remarked.
No, sir; they are built for the worship of God,
as my daughter has so well remarked.
Yes, sir; that, too, I grant you
As secondary to the main objectthe public
convenience
,
Mr. Bragg unquestionably means; put in
John Effingham, speaking for the first time that
morning
on the subject.
Eve turned quickly, and looked towards her
kinsman
.
He was standing near the table, with folded
arms, and his fine face expressing all the sarcasm and
contempt that a countenance so singularly calm and
gentlemanlike, could betray.
Cousin Jack, she said earnestly, this ought not
to be.
Cousin Eve, nevertheless this will be.
Surely notsurely not! Men can never so far
forget appearances as to convert the temple of God
into a theatre, in which the convenience of the
spectators
is the one great object to be kept in view!
You
have travelled, sir, said John Effingham,
indicating
by his eye that he addressed Mr. Dodge, in
particular, and must have entered places of worship
in other parts of the world. Did not the simple
beauty of the manner in which all classes, the great
and the humble, the rich and the poor, kneel in a
common humility before the altar, strike you
agreeably
,
on such occasions; in Catholic countries, in
particular
?
Bless me! no, Mr. John Effingham. I was
disgusted
at the meanness of their rites, and really
shocked at the abject manner in which the people
knelt on the cold damp stones, as if they were no
better
than beggars.
And were they not beggars? asked Eve, with
almost a severity of tone: ought they not so to
consider
themselves, when petitioning for mercy of the
one great and omnipotent God?
Why, Miss Effingham, the people
will
rule; and
it is useless to pretend to tell them that they shall not
have the highest seats in the church as well as in the
state. Really, I can see no ground why a parson
should be raised above his parishioners. The
new-order
churches consult the public convenience, and
place every body on a level, as it might be. Now,
in old times, a family was buried in its pew; it could
neither see nor be seen; and I can remember the
time when I could just get a look of our clergyman's
wig, for he was an old-school man; and as for his
fellow-creatures, one might as well be praying in his
own closet. I must say I am a supporter of liberty,
if it be only in pews.
I am sorry, Mr. Dodge, answered Eve, mildly,
you did not extend your travels into the countries
of the Mussulmans, where most Christian sects might
get some useful notions concerning the part of
worship
,
at least, that is connected with appearances.
There you would have seen no seats, but sinners
bowing down in a mass, on the cold stones, and all
thoughts of cushioned pews and drawing-room
conveniences
unknown. We Protestants have improved
on our Catholic forefathers in this respect; and the
innovation of which you now speak, in my eyes is an
irreverent, almost a sinful, invasion of the proprieties
of the temple.
Ah, Miss Eve, this comes from substituting forms
for the substance of things, exclaimed the editor.
For my part, I can say, I was truly shocked with
the extravagancies I witnessed, in the way of
worship
,
in most of the countries I visited. Would you
think it, Mr. Bragg, rational beings, real
bon fide
living
men and women, kneeling on the stone pavement,
like so many camels in the Desert, Mr. Dodge loved
to draw his images from the different parts of the world
he had seen, ready to receive the burthens of their
masters; not a pew, not a cushion, not a single
comfort
that is suitable to a free and intelligent being, but
every thing conducted in the most abject manner, as
if accountable human souls were no better than so
many mutes in a Turkish palace.
You ought to mention this in the Active Inquirer,
said Aristabulus.
All in good time, sir; I have many things in
reserve
,
among which I propose to give a few remarks,
I dare say they will be very worthless ones, on the
impropriety of a rational being's ever kneeling. To my
notion, gentlemen and ladies, God never intended an
American to kneel.
The respectable mechanics who stood around the
table did not absolutely assent to this proposition, for
one of them actually remarked that he saw no great
harm in a man's kneeling to the Deity; but they
evidently
inclined to the opinion that the new-school of
pews was far better than the old.
It always appears to me, Miss Effingham, said one,
that I hear and understand the sermon better in one
of the low pews, than in one of the old high-backed
things, that look so much like pounds.
But can you withdraw into yourself better, sir?
Can you more truly devote all your thoughts, with a
suitable singleness of heart, to the worship of God?
You mean in the prayers, now, I rather
conclude
?
Certainly, sir, I mean in the prayers and the
thanksgivings.
Why, we leave them pretty much to the parson;
though I will own it is not quite as easy leaning on
the edge of one of the new-school pews as on one of
the old. They are better for sitting, but not so good
for standing. But then the sitting posture at prayers
is quite coming into favour among our people, Miss
Effingham, as well as among yours. The sermon is
the main chance, after all.
Yes, observed Mr. Gouge, give me good,
strong preaching, any day, in preference to good
praying. A man may get along with second-rate
prayers, but he stands in need of first-rate
preaching
.
These gentlemen consider religion a little like a
cordial on a cold day, observed John Effingham,
which is to be taken in sufficient doses to make the
blood circulate. They are not the men to be
pounded
in pews, like lost sheep, not they?
Mr. John will always have his say; one
remarked
:
and then Mr. Effingham dismissed the party,
by telling them he would think of the matter.
When the mechanics were gone, the subject was
discussed at some length between those that
remained
all
the Effinghams agreeing that they would
oppose
the innovation, as irreverent in appearance,
unsuited to the retirement and self-abasement that best
comported with prayer, and opposed to the delicacy
of their own habits; while Messrs. Bragg and Dodge
contended to the last that such changes were loudly
called for by the popular sentimentthat it was
unsuited
to the dignity of a man to be `pounded,' even
in a churchand virtually, that a good, `stirring'
sermon, as they called it, was of far more account,
in public worship, than all the prayers and praises
that could issue from the heart or throat.
CHAPTER XIV.
We'll follow Cadewe'll follow Cade.
Mob
.
The
views of this Mr. Bragg, and of our old
fellow-traveller
,
Mr. Dodge, appear to be peculiar on
the subject of religious forms, observed Sir George
Templemore, as he descended the little lawn before
the Wigwam, in company with the three ladies,
Paul Powis, and John Effingham, on their way to
the lake. I should think it would be difficult to
find another Christian, who objects to kneeling at
prayer.
Therein you are mistaken, Templemore,
answered
Paul; for this country, to say nothing of one
sect which holds it in utter abomination, is filled with
them. Our pious ancestors, like neophytes, ran into
extremes, on the subject of forms, as well as in other
matters. When you go to Philadelphia, Miss
Effingham
,
you will see an instance of a most ludicrous
nature
ludicrous,
if there were not something painfully
revolting mingled with itof the manner in which
men can strain at a gnat and swallow a camel; and
which, I am sorry to say, is immediately connected
with our own church.
It was music to Eve's ears, to hear Paul Powis
speak of his pious ancestors, as being American, and
to find him so thoroughly identifying himself with her
own native land; for, while condemning so many of
its practices, and so much alive to its absurdities and
contradictions, our heroine had seen too much of
other countries, not to take an honest pride in the real
excellencies of her own. There was, also, a soothing
pleasure in hearing him openly own that he belonged
to the same church as herself.
And what is there ridiculous in Philadelphia, in
particular, and in connection with our own church?
she asked. I am not so easily disposed to find fault
where the venerable church is concerned.
You know that the Protestants, in their horror of
idolatry, discontinued, in a great degree, the use of
the cross, as an outward religious symbol; and that
there was probably a time when there was not a single
cross to be seen in the whole of a country that was
settled by those who made a profession of love for
Christ, and a dependence on his expiation, the great
business of their lives?
Certainly. We all know our predecessors were
a little over-rigid and scrupulous on all the points
connected
with outward appearances.
They certainly contrived to render the religious
rites as little pleasing to the senses as possible, by
aiming
at a sublimation that peculiarly favours spiritual
pride and a pious conceit. I do not know whether
travelling has had the same effect on you, as it has
produced on me; but I find all my inherited
antipathies
to the mere visible representation of the cross,
superseded by a sort of solemn affection for it, as a
symbol, when it is plain, and unaccompanied by any
of those bloody and minute accessories that are so
often seen around it in Catholic countries. The
German
Protestants, who usually ornament the altar with
a cross, first cured me of the disrelish I imbibed, on
this subject, in childhood.
We, also, I think, cousin John, were agreeably
struck with the same usage in Germany. From
feeling
a species of nervousness at the sight of a cross, I
came to love to see it; and I think you must have
undergone a similar change; for I have discovered
no less than three among the ornaments of the great
window of the entrance tower, at the Wigwam.
You might have discovered one, also, in every
door of the building, whether great or small, young
lady. Our pious ancestors, as Powis calls them,
much of whose piety, by the way, was any thing but
meliorated with spiritual humility or Christian charity,
were such ignoramuses as to set up crosses in every
door they built, even while they veiled their eyes in
holy horror whenever the sacred symbol was seen in
a church.
Every door! exclaimed the Protestants of the
party.
Yes, literally every door, I might almost say;
certainly every panelled door that was constructed
twenty years since. I first discovered the secret of
our blunder, when visiting a castle in France, that
dated back from the time of the crusade. It was a
chteau
of the Montmorencies, that had passed into
the hands of the Cond family by marriage; and the
courtly old domestic, who showed me the curiosities,
pointed out to me the stone
croix
in the windows,
which has caused the latter to be called
croises
, as a
pious usage of the crusaders. Turning to a door, I
saw the same crosses in the wooden stiles; and if you
cast an eye on the first humble door that you may
pass in this village, you will detect the same symbol
staring you boldly in the face, in the very heart of a
population that would almost expire at the thoughts
of placing such a sign of the beast on their very
thresholds.
The whole party expressed their surprise; but
the first door they passed corroborated this account,
and proved the accuracy of John Effingham's
statements
.
Catholic zeal and ingenuity could not have
wrought more accurate symbols of this peculiar sign
of the sect; and yet, here they stood, staring every
passenger in the face, as if mocking the ignorant and
exaggerated pretension which would lay undue stress
on the minor points of a religion, the essence of which
was faith and humility.
And the Philadelphia church? said Eve, quickly,
so soon as her curiosity was satisfied on the subject
of the door; I am now more impatient than ever, to
learn what silly blunder we have also committed
there.
Impious would almost be a better term, Paul
answered. The only church spire that existed for
half a century, in that town, was surmounted by a
mitre
, while the
cross
was studiously rejected!
A silence followed; for there is often more true
argument
in simply presenting the facts of a case, than
in all the rhetoric and logic that could be urged, by
way of auxiliaries. Every one saw the egregious
folly, not to say presumption, of the mistake; and at
the moment, every one wondered how a
commonsense
community could have committed so indecent a
blunder. We are mistaken. There was an
exception
to the general feeling in the person of Sir George
Templemore. To his church-and-state notions, and
anti-catholic prejudices, which were quite as much
political as religious, there was every thing that was
proper, and nothing that was wrong, in rejecting a
cross for a mitre.
The church, no doubt, was Episcopal, Powis,
he remarked, and it was not Roman. What better
symbol than the mitre could be chosen?
Vol. I.  19
Now I reflect, it is not so very strange, said
Grace, eagerly, for you will remember, Mr.
Effingham
,
that Protestants attach the idea of idolatry to the
cross, as it is used by Catholics.
And of bishops, peers in parliament, church and
state, to a mitre.
Yes, but the church in question I have seen; and
it was erected before the war of the revolution. It
was an English rather than an American church.
It was, indeed, an English church, rather than
an American; and Templemore is very right to
defend
it, mitre and all.
I dare say, a bishop officiated at its altar?
I dare saynay, I know, he did; and, I will
add, he would rather that the mitre were two
hundred
feet in the air, than down on his own simple,
white-haired, apostolical-looking head. But enough
of divinity for the morning; yonder is Tom with the
boat, let us to our oars.
The party were now on the little wharf that served
as a village-landing, and the boatman mentioned lay
off, in waiting for the arrival of his fare. Instead of
using him, however, the man was dismissed; the
gentlemen
preferring to handle the oars themselves.
Aquatic excursions were of constant occurrence in
the warm months, on that beautifully limpid sheet of
water, and it was the practice to dispense with the
regular boatmen, whenever good oarsmen were to be
found among the company.
As soon as the light buoyant skiff was brought to
the side of the wharf, the whole party embarked; and
Paul and the baronet taking the oars, they soon
urged the boat from the shore.
The world is getting to be too confined for the
adventurous spirit of the age, said Sir George, as he
and his companion pulled leisurely along, taking the
direction of the eastern shore, beneath the forest-clad
cliffs of which the ladies had expressed a wish to be
rowed; here are Powis and myself actually rowing
together on a mountain lake of America, after having
boated as companions on the coast of Africa, and on
the margin of the Great Desert. Polynesia, and
Terra Australis, may yet see us in company, as hardy
cruisers.
The spirit of the age is, indeed, working
wonders
in the way you mean, said John Effingham.
Countries of which our fathers merely read, are
getting
to be as familiar as our own homes to their sons;
and, with you, one can hardly foresee to what a pass
of adventure the generation or two that will follow
us may not reach.
Vraiment, c'est fort extraordinaire de se trouver sur
un lac Americain
, exclaimed Mademoiselle Viefville.
More extraordinary than to find one's self on a
Swiss lake, think you, my dear Mademoiselle
Viefville
?
Non, non, mais tout aussi extraordinaire pour une
Parisienne
.
I am now about to introduce you, Mr. John
Effingham
and Miss Van Cortlandt excepted, Eve
continued
,
to the wonders and curiosities of this lake
and region. There, near the small house that is
erected over a spring of delicious water, stood the
hut of Natty Bumppo, once known throughout all these
mountains as a renowned hunter; a man who had
the simplicity of a woodsman, the heroism of a
savage
,
the faith of a Christian, and the feelings of a poet.
A better than he, after his fashion, seldom lived.
We have all heard of him, said the baronet,
looking round curiously; and must all feel an
interest
in what concerns so brave and just a man. I
would I could see his counterpart.
Alas! said John Effingham, the days of the
`Leather-stockings' have passed away. He preceded
me in life, and I see few remains of his character
in a region where speculation is more rife than
moralizing
,
and emigrants are plentier than hunters.
Natty probably chose that spot for his hut on account
of the vicinity of the spring: is it not so, Miss
Effingham
?
He did; and yonder little fountain that you see
gushing from the thicket, and which comes glancing
like diamonds into the lake, is called the `Fairy
Spring,' by some flight of poetry that, like so many
of our feelings, must have been imported; for I see
no connection between the name and the character
of the country, fairies having never been known, even
by tradition, in Otsego.
The boat now came under a shore where the trees
fringed the very water, frequently overhanging the
element that mirrored their fantastic forms. At this
point, a light skiff was moving leisurely along in
their own direction, but a short distance in advance.
On a hint from John Effingham, a few vigorous
strokes of the oars brought the two boats near each
other.
This is the flag-ship, half whispered John
Effingham
,
as they came near the other skiff, containing no
less a man than the `commodore.' Formerly, the
chief of the lake was an admiral, but that was in
times when, living nearer to the monarchy, we
retained
some of the European terms; now, no man
rises higher than a commodore in America, whether
it be on the ocean or on the Otsego, whatever may be
his merits or his services. A charming day,
commodore
;
I rejoice to see you still afloat, in your
glory.
The commodore, a tall, thin, athletic man of
seventy
,
with a white head, and movements that were
quick as those of a boy, had not glanced aside at the
approaching boat, until he was thus saluted in the
well-known voice of John Effingham. He then turned
his head, however, and scanning the whole party
through his spectacles, he smiled good-naturedly, made
a flourish with one hand, while he continued paddling
with the other, for he stood erect and straight in the
stern of his skiff, and answered heartily
A fine morning, Mr. John, and the right time of
the moon for boating. This is not a real scientific
day for the fish, perhaps; but I have just come out to
see that all the points and bays are in their right
places.
How is it, commodore, that the water near the
village is less limpid than common, and that even up
here, we see so many specks floating on its
surface
?
What a question for Mr. John Effingham to ask
on his native water! So much for travelling in far
countries, where a man forgets quite as much as he
learns, I fear. Here the commodore turned entirely
round, and raising an open hand in an oratorical
manner
,
he added,You must know, ladies and
gentlemen
,
that the lake is in blow.
In blow, commodore! I did not know that the
lake bore its blossoms.
It does, sir, nevertheless. Ay, Mr. John, and its
fruits, too; but the last must be dug for, like
potatoes
.
There have been no miraculous draughts of
the fishes, of late years, in the Otsego, ladies and
gentlemen
;
but it needs the scientific touch, and the
knowledge
of baits, to get a fin of any of your true game
above the water, now-a-days. Well, I have had the
head of the sogdollager thrice in the open air, in my
time; though I am told the admiral actually got hold
of him once with his hand.
The sogdollager, said Eve, much amused with
the singularities of the man, whom she perfectly
remembered
to have been commander of the lake, even
in her own infancy; we must be indebted to you
for an explanation of that term, as well as for the
meaning of your allusion to the head and the open
air.
19 *
A sogdollager, young lady, is the perfection of a
thing. I know Mr. Grant used to say there was no
such word in the dictionary; but then there are many
words that ought to be in the dictionaries that have
been forgotten by the printers. In the way of salmon
trout, the sogdollager is their commodore. Now,
ladies
and gentlemen, I should not like to tell you all I
know about the patriarch of this lake, for you would
scarcely believe me; but if he would not weigh a
hundred when cleaned, there is not an ox in the county
that will weigh a pound when slaughtered.
You say you had his head above water? said
John Effingham.
Thrice, Mr. John. The first time was thirty
years ago; and I confess I lost him, on that
occasion
,
by want of science; for the art is not learned in
a day, and I had then followed the business but ten
years. The second time was five years later; and I
had then been fishing expressly for the old gentleman,
about a month. For near a minute, it was a matter
of dispute between us, whether he should come out
of the lake or I go into it; but I actually got his gills
in plain sight. That was a glorious haul!
Washingington
did not feel better the night Cornwallis
surrendered
,
than I felt on that great occasion!
One never knows the feelings of another, it
seems. I should have thought disappointment at the
loss would have been the prevailing sentiment on that
great occasion, as you so justly term it.
So it would have been, Mr. John, with an
unscientific
fisherman; but we experienced hands know
better. Glory is to be measured by quality, and not
by quantity, ladies and gentlemen; and I look on it
as a greater feather in a man's cap, to see the
sogdollager's
head above water, for half a minute, than
to bring home a skiff filled with pickerel. The last
time I got a look at the old gentleman, I did not try
to get him into the boat, but we sat and conversed
for near two minutes; he in the water, and I in the
skiff.
Conversed! exclaimed Eve, and with a fish,
too! What could the animal have to say!
Why, young lady, a fish can talk as well as one
of ourselves; the only difficulty is to understand what
he says. I have heard the old settlers affirm, that the
Leather-stocking used to talk for hours at a time, with
the animals of the forest.
You knew the Leather-stocking, commodore?
No, young lady, I am sorry to say I never had
the pleasure of looking on him even. He
was
a great
man! They may talk of their Jeffersons and
Jacksons
,
but I set down Washington and Natty Bumppo
as the two only really great men of my time.
What do you think of Bonaparte, commodore?
inquired Paul.
Well, sir, Bonaparte had some strong points
about him, I do really believe. But he could have
been nothing to the Leather-stocking, in the woods!
It's no great matter, young gentleman, to be a great
man among your inhabitants of citieswhat I call
umbrella people. Why, Natty was almost as great
with the spear as with the rifle; though I never
heard that he got a sight of the sogdollager.
We shall meet again this summer, commodore,
said John Effingham; the ladies wish to hear the
echoes, and we must leave you.
All very natural, Mr. John, returned the
commodore
,
laughing, and again flourishing his hand in
his own peculiar manner. The women all love to
hear the echoes, for they are not satisfied with what
they have once said, but they like to hear it over
again. I never knew a lady come on the Otsego, but
one of the first things she did was to get paddled to
the Speaking Rocks, to have a chat with herself. They
come out in such numbers, sometimes, and then all
talk at once, in a way quite to confuse the echo. I
suppose you have heard, young lady, the opinion
people
have now got concerning these voices.
I cannot say I have ever heard more than that
they are some of the most perfect echoes known;
answered Eve, turning her body, so as to face the
old man, as the skiff of the party passed that of the
veteran fisherman.
Some people maintain that there is no echo at all,
and that the sounds we hear come from the spirit of
the Leather-stocking, which keeps about its old haunts,
and repeats every thing we say, in mockery of our
invasion of the woods. I do not say this notion is
true, or that it is my own; but we all know that
Natty
did
dislike to see a new settler arrive in the
mountains
,
and that he loved a tree as a muskrat loves
water. They show a pine up here on the side of the
Vision, which he notched at every new-comer, until
reaching seventeen, his honest old heart could go no
farther, and he gave the matter up in despair.
This is so poetical, commodore, it is a pity it
cannot be true. I like this explanation of the `
Speaking
Rocks,' much better than that implied by the name
of `Fairy Spring.'
You are quite right, young lady, called out the
fisherman, as the boats separated still farther; there
never was any fairy known in Otsego; but the time
has been when we could boast of a Natty Bumppo.
Here the commodore flourished his hand again,
and Eve nodded her adieus. The skiff of the party
continued to pull slowly along the fringed shore,
occasionally
sheering more into the lake, to avoid some
overhanging and nearly horizontal tree, and then
returning
so closely to the land, as barely to clear the
pebbles of the narrow strand with the oar.
Eve thought she had never beheld a more wild or
beautifully variegated foliage, than that which the
whole leafy mountain-side presented. More than half
of the forest of tall, solemn pines, that had veiled the
earth when the country was first settled, had already
disappeared; but, agreeably to one of the mysterious
laws by which nature is governed, a rich second
growth, that included nearly every variety of
American
wood, had shot up in their places. The rich
Rembrandt-like hemlocks, in particular, were
perfectly
beautiful, contrasting admirably with the
livelier
tints of the various deciduous trees. Here and
there, some flowering shrub rendered the picture
gay, while masses of the rich chestnut, in blossom,
lay in clouds of natural glory among the dark tops of
the pines.
The gentlemen pulled the light skiff fully a mile
under this overhanging foliage, occasionally
frightening
some migratory bird from a branch, or a
water-fowl
from the narrow strand. At length, John
Effingham
desired them to cease rowing, and managing
the skiff for a minute or two with the paddle which
he had used in steering, he desired the whole party
to look up, announcing to them that they were beneath
the `Silent Pine.'
A common exclamation of pleasure succeeded the
upward glance; for it is seldom that a tree is seen to
more advantage than that which immediately
attracted
every eye. The pine stood on the bank, with its
roots embedded in the earth, a few feet higher than the
level of the lake, but in such a situation as to bring
the distance above the water into the apparent height
of the tree. Like all of its kind that grows in the
dense forests of America, its increase, for a thousand
years, had been upward; and it now stood in solitary
glory, a memorial of what the mountains which were
yet so rich in vegetation had really been in their days
of nature and pride. For near a hundred feet above
the eye, the even round trunk was branchless, and
then commenced the dark-green masses of foliage,
which clung around the stem like smoke ascending in
wreaths. The tall column-like tree had inclined
towards
the light when struggling among its fellows,
and it now so far overhung the lake, that its summit
may have been some ten or fifteen feet without the
base. A gentle, graceful curve added to the effect
of this variation from the perpendicular, and infused
enough of the fearful into the grand, to render the
picture sublime. Although there was not a breath
of wind on the lake, the currents were strong enough
above the forest to move this lofty object, and it was
just possible to detect a slight, graceful yielding of
the very uppermost boughs to the passing air.
This pine is ill-named, cried Sir George
Templemore
,
for it is the most eloquent tree eye of mine
has ever looked on!
It is, indeed, eloquent, answered Eve; one
hears it speak even now of the fierce storms that have
whistled round its topsof the seasons that have
passed since it extricated that verdant cap from the
throng of sisters that grew beneath it, and of all that
has passed on the Otsego, when this limpid lake lay,
like a gem embedded in the forest. When the
Conqueror
first landed in England, this tree stood on the
spot where it now stands! Here, then, is at last,
an American antiquity!
A true and regulated taste, Miss Effingham,
said Paul, has pointed out to you one of the real
charms of the country. Were we to think less of
the artificial, and more of our natural excellencies,
we should render ourselves less liable to criticism.
Eve was never inattentive when Paul spoke; and
her colour heightened, as he paid this compliment to
her taste, but still her soft blue eye was riveted on
the pine.
Silent it may be, in one respect, but it is, indeed,
all eloquence in another, she resumed, with a
fervour
that was not lessened by Paul's remark. That
crest of verdure, which resembles a plume of
feathers
,
speaks of a thousand things to the
imagination
.
I have never known a person of any poetry, who
came under this tree, said John Effingham, that
did not fall into this very train of thought. I once
brought a man celebrated for his genius here, and,
after gazing for a minute or two at the high, green
tuft that tops the tree, he exclaimed, `that mass of
green waved there in the fierce light when Columbus
first ventured into the unknown sea.' It is, indeed,
eloquent; for it tells the same glowing tale to all who
approach ita tale fraught with feeling and
recollections
.
And yet its silence is, after all, its eloquence,
added Paul; and the name is not so misplaced as
one might at first think.
It probably obtained its name from some fancied
contrast to the garrulous rocks that lie up yonder,
half concealed by the forest. If you will ply the
oars, gentlemen, we will now hold a little communion
with the spirit of the Leather-stocking.
The young men complied; and in about five
minutes
,
the skiff was off in the lake, at the distance of
fifty rods from the shore, where the whole
mountainside
came at one glance into the view. Here they
lay on their oars, and John Effingham called out to
the rocks a good morning, in a clear distinct
voice. The mocking sounds were thrown back
again, with a closeness of resemblance that actually
startled the novice. Then followed other calls and
other repetitions of the echoes, which did not lose the
minutest intonation of the voice.
This actually surpasses the celebrated echoes of
the Rhine, cried the delighted Eve; for, though
those do give the strains of the bugle so clearly, I do
not think they answer to the voice with so much
fidelity.
You are very right, Eve, replied her kinsman,
for I can recall no place where so perfect and
accurate
an echo is to be heard as at these speaking
rocks. By increasing our distance to half a mile,
and using a bugle, as I well know, from actual
experiment
,
we should get back entire passages of an
air. The interval between the sound and the echo,
too, would be distinct, and would give time for an
undivided attention. Whatever may be said of the
`pine,' these rocks are most aptly named; and if the
spirit of Leather-stocking has any concern with the
matter, he is a mocking spirit.
John Effingham now looked at his watch, and
then he explained to the party a pleasure he had in
store for them. On a sort of small, public
promenade
,
that lay at the point where the river flowed
out of the lake, stood a rude shell of a building that
was called the gun-house. Here, a speaking
picture
of the entire security of the country, from foes
within as well as from foes without, were kept two
or three pieces of field artillery, with doors so open
that any one might enter the building, and even use
the guns at will, although they properly belonged to
the organized corps of the state.
One of these guns had been sent a short distance
down the valley; and John Effingham informed his
companions that they might look momentarily for its
reports to arouse the echoes of the mountains. He
was still speaking when the gun was fired, its muzzle
being turned eastward. The sound first reached the
side of the Vision, abreast of the village, whence the
reverberations reissued, and rolled along the range,
from cave to cave, and cliff to cliff, and wood to
wood, until they were lost, like distant thunder, two
or three leagues to the northward. The
experiment
was thrice repeated, and always with the same
magnificent effect, the western hills actually
echoing
the echoes of the eastern mountains, like the dying
strains of some falling music.
Such a locality would be a treasure in the vicinity
of a melo-dramatic theatre, said Paul, laughing, for
certainly, no artificial thunder I have ever heard has
equalled this. This sheet of water might even
receive
a gondola.
And yet, I fear one accustomed to the boundless
horizon of the ocean, might in time weary of it,
answered
John Effingham, significantly.
Paul made no answer; and the party rowed away
in silence.
Yonder is the spot where we have so long been
accustomed to resort for Pic-Nics, said Eve, pointing
out a lovely place, that was beautifully shaded by old
oaks, and on which stood a rude house that was much
dilapidated, and indeed injured, by the hands of man.
John Effingham smiled, as his cousin showed the
place to her companions, promising them an early
and a nearer view of its beauties.
By the way, Miss Effingham, he said, I
suppose
you flatter yourself with being the heiress of that
desirable retreat?
It is very natural that, at some day, though I
trust a very distant one, I should succeed to that
which belongs to my dear father.
Both natural and legal, my fair cousin; but you
are yet to learn that there is a power that threatens
to rise up and dispute your claim.
What powerhuman power, at leastcan
dispute
the lawful claim of an owner to his property?
That Point has been ours ever since civilized man
has dwelt among these hills; who will presume to rob
us of it?
You will be much surprised to discover that there
is such a power, and that there is actually a
disposition
to exercise it. The publicthe all-powerful,
omnipotent, overruling, law-making, law-breaking
publichas a passing caprice to possess itself of your
Vol. I.  20
beloved Point; and Ned Effingham must show
unusual
energy, or it will get it?
Are you serious, cousin Jack?
As serious as the magnitude of the subject can
render a responsible being, as Mr. Dodge would say.
Eve said no more, but she looked vexed, and
remained
almost silent until they landed, when she
hastened
to seek her father, with a view to communicate
what she had heard. Mr. Effingham listened to his
daughter, as he always did, with tender interest; and
when she had done, he kissed her glowing cheek,
bidding
her not to believe that which she seemed so
seriously
to dread, possible.
But, cousin John would not trifle with me on such
a subject, father, Eve continued; he knows how
much I prize all those little heir-looms that are
connected
with the affections.
We can inquire further into the affair, my child,
if it be your desire; ring for Pierre, if you please.
Pierre answered, and a message was sent to Mr.
Bragg, requiring his presence in the library.
Aristabulus appeared, by no means in the best
humour
,
for he disliked having been omitted in the late
excursion on the lake, fancying that he had a
community-right
to share in all his neighbour's
amusements
,
though he had sufficient self-command to
conceal
his feelings.
I wish to know, sir, Mr. Effingham commenced,
without introduction, whether there can be any
mistake concerning the ownership of the Fishing
Point on the west side of the lake.
Certainly not, sir; it belongs to the public.
Mr. Effingham's cheek glowed, and he looked
astonished
;
but he remained calm.
The public! Do you gravely affirm, Mr. Bragg,
that the public pretends to claim that Point?
Claim, Mr. Effingham! as long as I have resided
in this county, I have never heard its right disputed.
Your residence in this county, sir, is not of very
ancient date, and nothing is easier than that
you
may
be mistaken. I confess some curiosity to know in
what manner the public has acquired its title to the
spot. You are a lawyer, Mr. Bragg, and may give
an intelligible account of it.
Why, sir, your father gave it to them in his
life-time
.
Every body, in all this region, will tell you as
much as this.
Do you suppose, Mr. Bragg, there is any body in
all this region who will swear to the fact? Proof,
you well know, is very requisite even to obtain
justice
.
I much question, sir, if there be any body in all
this region that will not swear to the fact. It is the
common tradition of the whole country; and, to be
frank with you, sir, there is a little displeasure,
because
Mr. John Effingham has talked of giving
private
entertainments on the Point.
This, then, only shows how idly and
inconsiderately
the traditions of the country take their rise.
But, as I wish to understand all the points of the case,
do me the favour to walk into the village, and inquire
of those whom you think the best informed in the
matter, what they know of the Point, in order that I
may regulate my course accordingly. Be particular,
if you please, on the subject of title, as one would not
wish to move in the dark.
Aristabulus quitted the house immediately, and Eve,
perceiving that things were in the right train, left her
father alone to meditate on what had just passed.
Mr. Effingham walked up and down his library for
some time, much disturbed, for the spot in question
was identified with all his early feelings and
recollections
;
and if there were a foot of land on earth, to
which he was more attached than to all others, next
to his immediate residence, it was this. Still, he could
not conceal from himself, in despite of his opposition
to John Effingham's sarcasms, that his native country
had undergone many changes since he last resided in
it, and that some of these changes were quite sensibly
for the worse. The spirit of misrule was abroad, and
the lawless and unprincipled held bold language, when
it suited their purpose to intimidate. As he ran over
in his mind, however, the facts of the case, and the
nature of his right, he smiled to think that any one
should contest it, and sat down to his writing, almost
forgetting that there had been any question at all on
the unpleasant subject.
Aristabulus was absent for several hours, nor did
he return until Mr. Effingham was dressed for dinner,
and alone in the library, again, having absolutely lost
all recollection of the commission he had given his
agent.
It is as I told you, sirthe public insists that it
owns the Point; and I feel it my duty to say, Mr.
Effingham, that the public is determined to maintain
its claim.
Then, Mr. Bragg, it is proper I should tell the
public that it is
not
the owner of the Point, but that
I
am its owner, and that I am determined to maintain
my
claim.
It is hard to kick against the pricks, Mr.
Effingham
.
It is so, sir, as the public will discover, if it
persevere
in invading a private right.
Why, sir, some of those with whom I have
conversed
have gone so far as to desire me to tell you
I trust my motive will not be mistaken
If you have any communication to make, Mr.
Bragg, do it without reserve. It is proper I should
know the truth exactly.
Well, then, sir, I am the bearer of something like
a defiance; the people wish you to know that they
hold your right cheaply, and that they laugh at it.
Not to mince matters, they defy you.
I thank you for this frankness, Mr. Bragg, and it
increases my respect for your character. Affairs are
now at such a pass, that it is necessary to act. If
you will amuse yourself with a book for a moment, I
shall have further occasion for your kindness.
Aristabulus did not read, for he was too much filled
with wonder at seeing a man so coolly set about
contending
with that awful public which he himself as
habitually deferred to, as any Asiatic slave defers to
his monarch. Indeed, nothing but his being sustained
by that omnipotent power, as he viewed the power of
the public to be, had emboldened him to speak so
openly to his employer, for Aristabulus felt a secret
confidence that, right or wrong, it was always safe in
America to make the most fearless professions in
favour
of the great body of the community. In the
mean time, Mr. Effingham wrote a simple
advertisement
against trespassing on the property in question,
and handed it to the other, with a request that he
would have it inserted in the number of the
village
paper that was to appear next morning. Mr.
Bragg took the advertisement, and went to execute
the duty without comment.
The evening arrived before Mr. Effingham was
again alone, when, being by himself in the library
once more, Mr. Bragg entered, full of his subject.
He was followed by John Effingham, who had gained
an inkling of what had passed.
I regret to say, Mr. Effingham, Aristabulus
commenced, that your advertisement has created
one of the greatest excitements it has ever been my
ill-fortune to witness in Templeton.
All of which ought to be very encouraging to us,
Mr. Bragg, as men under excitement are usually
wrong.
Very true, sir, as regards individual excitement,
but this is a public excitement.
I am not at all aware that the fact, in the least,
20 *
alters the case. If one excited man is apt to do silly
things, half a dozen backers will be very likely to
increase
his folly.
Aristabulus listened with wonder, for excitement
was one of the means for effecting public objects, so
much practised by men of his habits, that it had never
crossed his mind any single individual could be
indifferent
to its effect. To own the truth, he had
anticipated
so much unpopularity, from his unavoidable
connexion with the affair, as to have contributed
himself
in producing the excitement, with the hope of
choking Mr. Effingham off, as he had elegantly
expressed it to one of his intimates, in the vernacular
of the country.
A public excitement is a powerful engine, Mr.
Effingham! he exclaimed, in a sort of
politicopious
horror.
I am fully aware, sir, that it may be even a
fearfully
powerful engine. Excited men, acting in masses,
compose what are called mobs, and have committed
a thousand excesses.
Your advertisement is, to the last degree,
disrelished
;
to be very sincere, it is awfully unpopular!
I suppose it is always what you term an
unpopular
act, so far as the individuals opposed are
concerned
,
to resist aggression.
But they call your advertisement aggression, sir.
In that simple fact exist all the merits of the
question. If I own this property, the public, or that
portion of it which is connected with this affair, are
aggressors; and so much more in the wrong that they
are many against one; if
they
own the property, I
am not only wrong, but very indiscreet.
The calmness with which Mr. Effingham spoke
had an effect on Aristabulus, and, for a moment, he
was staggered. It was only for a moment, however,
as the pains and penalties of unpopularity presented
themselves afresh to an imagination that had been so
long accustomed to study the popular caprice, that it
had got to deem the public favour the one great
good of life.
But
they
say,
they
own the Point, Mr. Effingham.
And
I
say, they do
not
own the Point, Mr. Bragg;
never
did
own it; and, with my consent, never
shall
own it.
This is purely a matter of fact, observed John
Effingham, and I confess I am curious to know how
or whence this potent public derives its title. You
are lawyer enough, Mr. Bragg, to know that the
public can hold property only by use, or by especial
statute. Now, under which title does this claim
present
itself.
First, by use, sir, and then by especial gift.
The use, you are aware, must be adverse, or as
opposed to the title of the other claimants. Now, I
am a living witness that my late uncle
permitted
the
public to use this Point, and that the public accepted
the conditions. Its use, therefore, has not been
adverse
,
or, at least, not for a time sufficient to make
title. Every hour that my cousin has
permitted
the
public to enjoy his property, adds to his right, as well
as to the obligation conferred on that public, and
increases
the duty of the latter to cease intruding,
whenever he desires it. If there is an especial gift, as
I understand you to say, from my late uncle, there
must also be a law to enable the public to hold, or a
trustee; which is the fact?
I admit, Mr. John Effingham, that I have seen
neither deed nor law, and I doubt if the latter exist.
Still the public
must
have some claim, for it is
impossible
that every body should be mistaken.
Nothing is easier, nor any thing more common,
than for whole communities to be mistaken, and
more particularly when they commence with
excitement
.
While his cousin was speaking, Mr. Effingham
went to a secretary, and taking out a large bundle
of papers, he laid it down on the table, unfolding
several
parchment deeds, to which massive seals, bearing
the arms of the late colony, as well as those of
England
,
were pendent.
Here are my titles, sir, he said, addressing
Aristabulus
pointedly; if the public has a better, let it
be produced, and I shall at once submit to its claim.
No one doubts that the King, through his
authorized
agent, the Governor of the colony of New-York,
granted this estate to your predecessor, Mr.
Effingham
;
or that it descended legally to your immediate
parent; but all contend that your parent gave this
spot to the public, as a spot of public resort.
I am glad that the question is narrowed down
within limits that are so easily examined. What
evidence
is there of this intention, on the part of my late
father?
Common report; I have talked with twenty people
in the village, and they all agree that the `Point' has
been used by the public, as public property, from time
immemorial.
Will you be so good, Mr. Bragg, as to name
some of those who affirm this.
Mr. Bragg complied, naming quite the number of
persons he had mentioned, with a readiness that
proved
he thought he was advancing testimony of weight.
Of all the names you have mentioned, returned
Mr. Effingham, I never heard but three, and these
are the names of mere boys. The first dozen are
certainly the names of persons who can know no
more of this village than they have gleaned in the last
few years; and several of them, I understand, have
dwelt among us but a few weeks; nay, days.
Have I not told you, Ned, interrupted John
Effingham, that an American `always' means
eighteen
months, and that `time immemorial' is only since
the last general crisis in the money market!
The persons I have mentioned compose a part of
the population, sir, added Mr. Bragg, and, one and
all, they are ready to swear that your father, by some
means or other, they are not very particular as to
minuti, gave them the right to use this property.
They are mistaken, and I should be sorry that
any one among them should swear to such a
falsehood
.
But here are my titleslet them show better,
or, if they can, any, indeed.
Perhaps your father abandoned the place to the
public; this might make a good claim.
That he did not, I am a living proof to the
contrary
;
he left it to his heirs at his death, and I myself
exercised full right of ownership over it, until I went
abroad. I did not travel with it in my pocket, sir, it
is true; but I left it to the protection of the laws,
which, I trust, are as available to the rich as to the
poor, although this is a free country.
Well, sir, I suppose a jury must determine the
point, as you seem firm; though I warn you, Mr.
Effingham, as one who knows his country, that a
verdict
,
in the face of a popular feeling, is rather a
hopeless
matter. If they prove that your late father
intended
to abandon or give this property to the public,
your case will be lost.
Mr. Effingham looked among the papers a moment,
and selecting one, he handed it to Mr. Bragg, first
pointing out to his notice a particular paragraph.
This, sir, is my late father's will, Mr. Effingham
said mildly; and, in that particular clause, you will
find that he makes a special devise of this very
`Point,' leaving it to his heirs, in such terms as to
put any intention to give it to the public quite out of
the question. This, at least, is the latest evidence I,
his only son, executor, and heir possess of his final
wishes; if that wondering and time-immemorial
public
of which you speak, has a better, I wait with
patience that it may be produced.
The composed manner of Mr. Effingham had
deceived
Aristabulus, who did not anticipate any proof
so completely annihilating to the pretensions of the
public, as that he now held in his hand. It was a
simple, brief devise, disposing of the piece of property
in question, and left it without dispute, that Mr.
Effingham
had succeeded to all the rights of his father, with
no reservation or condition of any sort.
This is very extraordinary! exclaimed Mr.
Bragg, when he had read the clause seven times,
each perusal contributing to leave the case still clearer
in favour of his employer, the individual, and still
stronger against the hoped-for future employers, the
people. The public ought to know of this bequest
of the late Mr. Effingham.
I think it ought, sir, before it pretended to deprive
his child of his property; or, rather, it ought to be
certain, at least, that there was no such devise.
You will excuse me, Mr. Effingham, but I think
it is incumbent on a private citizen, in a case of this
sort, when the public has taken up a wrong notion,
as I now admit is clearly the fact as regards the
Point, to enlighten it, and to inform it that it does not
own the spot.
This has been done already, Mr. Bragg, in the
advertisement you had the goodness to carry to the
printers, although I deny that there exists any such
obligation.
But, sir, they object to the mode you have chosen
to set them right.
The mode is usual, I believe, in the case of
trespasses
.
They expect something different, sir, in an affair
in which the public isisisall
Wrong, put in John Effingham, pointedly. I
have heard something of this out of doors, Ned, and
blame you for your moderation. Is it true that you
had told several of your neighbours that you have no
wish to prevent them from using the Point, but that
your sole object is merely to settle the question of
right, and to prevent intrusions on your family when
it is enjoying its own place of retirement?
Certainly, John, my only wish is to preserve the
property for those to whom it is especially devised,
to allow those who have the best, nay, the only right
to it, its undisturbed possession, occasionally, and to
prevent any more of that injury to the trees that has
been committed by some of those rude men, who
always
fancy themselves so completely all the public,
as to be masters, in their own particular persons,
whenever the public has any claim. I can have no
wish to deprive my neighbours of the innocent
pleasure
of visiting the Point, though I am fully
determined
they shall not deprive me of my property.
You are far more indulgent than I should be, or,
perhaps, than you will be yourself, when you read
this.
As John Effingham spoke, he handed his kinsman
a small handbill, which purported to call a meeting,
for that night, of the inhabitants of Templeton, to
resist
his arrogant claim to the disputed property. This
handbill had the usual marks of a feeble and vulgar
malignancy about it, affecting to call Mr. Effingham,
one
Mr. Effingham, and it was anonymous.
This is scarcely worth our attention, John, said
Mr. Effingham, mildly. Meetings of this sort
cannot
decide a legal title, and no man who respects
himself will be the tool of so pitiful an attempt to
frighten a citizen from maintaining his rights.
I agree with you, as respects the meeting, which
has been conceived in ignorance and low malice, and
will probably end, as all such efforts end, in ridicule.
But
Excuse me, Mr. John, interrupted Aristabulus,
there is an awful excitement! Some have even
spoken of Lynching!
Then, said Mr. Effingham, it does, indeed,
require
that we should be more firm. Do
you
, sir, know
of any person who has dared to use such a menace?
Aristabulus quailed before the stern eye of Mr.
Effingham, and he regretted having communicated so
much, though he had communicated nothing but the
truth. He stammered out an obscure and
half-intelligible
explanation, and proposed to attend the
meeting
,
in person, in order that he might be in the way
of understanding the subject, without falling into the
danger of mistake. To this Mr. Effingham assented,
as he felt too indignant at this outrage on all his
rights, whether as a citizen or a man, to wish to
pursue
the subject with his agent that night. Aristabulus
departed, and John Effingham remained closeted with
his kinsman until the family retired. During this long
interview, the former communicated many things to
the latter, in relation to this very affair, of which the
owner of the property, until then, had been profoundly
ignorant.
END OF VOL. I.